  Seems to be barring evidence to the contrary that Koresh was simply another deranged fanatic who thought it neccessary to take a whole bunch of folks with him children and all to satisfy his delusional mania. Jim Jones
DM> Fact or rumor....?  Madalyn Murray O\Hare an atheist who eliminated the DM> use of the bible reading and prayer in public schools 15 years ago is now DM> going to appear before the FCC with a petition to stop the reading of the DM> Gospel on the airways of America.  And she is also campaigning to remove DM> Christmas programs songs etc from the public schools.  If it is true DM> then mail to Federal Communications Commission 1919 H Street Washington DC DM> 20054 expressing your opposition to her request.  Reference Petition number  DM> 2493.  False.  This story has been going around for years.  There\s not a drop of truth.  Note that I don\t care for O\Hare (O\Hair?) myself
There has been a lot of discussion about Tyre.  In sum Ezekiel prophesied that the place would be mashed and never rebuilt; as there are a lot of people living there it would appear that Ezekiel was not literally correct.  This doesn\t bother me at all because I understand the language Ezekiel used differently than do so-called Biblical literalists.  For example it sometimes happens that someone says My grandson is the cutest baby! and then turns around and sees the granddaughter and says Oh!  Isn\t she the cutest thing!?  This person is not literally claiming to have lined up all the babies in the world according to cuteness and discovered his own grandchildren tied for first.  Rather he is trying to express his emotions using words that are very object-oriented.  Because this example is one that is common to many people nobody misunderstands the intent of the statements; the Bible however is often at the mercy of people who assume that everything within must be exactly literally true.  For those people the existence of Tyre is a problem; for me it is not.   Turning to the latest person trying to defend Ezekiel we read this from John E King:   No it implies nothing of the kind.  If you had nothing but the prophecy from Ezekiel and you were told you interpret it literally you would never say Oh he means that there will be houses and businesses and plants and stuff like that.  You would read I will make you a bare rock and You will never be rebuilt and you\d conclude that Tyre would be a bare rock.  The only way to get from `fishing nets\ to `houses and buildings and a medium-large population\ is if you KNOW that all that latter stuff is there.  In other words your answer means that Ezekiel misled everybody who read the prophecy at the time it was written.  There is no way that given a literal reading they could read this passage and conclude medium-size city.  You seem to feel that Never be rebuilt means be rebuilt -- maybe so but it is hardly a `clear implication\.     Well no.  That\s only a bit less than the population of Annapolis where I\m from.  You know the Naval Acadamy the state capital George Washington resigned his commission in the statehouse?  Annapolis may not be New York but it\s at least a two-horse town.  But supposing 22000 people is a small town -- it\s still 22000 people MORE than Ezekiel predicted.   And you\ve said nothing about the other problem.  In chapter 26 Ezekiel predicts that Nebuchadnezzar will will destroy Tyre and loot all their valuables.  However Nebuchadnezzar did NOT destroy Tyre and in chapter 29 Ezekiel even quotes God as saying he and his army got no reward from the campaign he led against Tyre.  Let\s ignore Alexander for a moment and just pay attention to chapter 26. Ezekiel says N. would destroy Tyre and N. did NOT destroy Tyre.  Ezekiel says that N. would plunder their valuables but N. did NOT plunder their valuables.  Regardless of what you think about Tyre _now_ the fact is that N. died before the place was destroyed.  Ezekiel said N. was going to do it and N. did not.   *  This post is of course pointless.  Inerrantists have an amazing ability to rewrite the Bible as needed to fit whatever they want it to say.  For example I expect Mr King to respond to the comments about Ezekiel 26 by pulling some clear implications out of hat.  When Ezekiel said that N. would demolish your towers that clearly implied that the walls would still be standing so people would know where the towers used to be.  And when Ezekiel said that N. would demolish your fine houses and throw your stones timber and rubble into the sea that clearly implied that N. would never set foot on the island.  And when Ezekiel wrote that N. would build a ramp up to your walls that clearly implies that N. would spend 13 years stomping around on the mainland and never get close to the walls.  See?  A few clear implications that are totally contrary to the text
Russell Turpin as is his wont has raised some interesting issues  in his struggle with the Christian texts and the Christians.  Unfortunately he seems to be hoping for simplicity where it is  not available. The lukewarm stew he detects may well be an inevitable  result of the divine mixing himself up with a bunch of losers such  as humanity.   Also unfortunately (perhaps) I have a deadline in two weeks the  responsibility for which prevents me in good conscience  from writing a more considered response and fully entering the fray as it were.   Let me then say what I can briefly.  -----   This point for the net.browsers who also still read books is pursued throughly in Kaufmann Critique_of_Religion_and_Philosophy.   This is a theological statement worthy of Barth. Dr Turpin (DD) may wear the black robe of Geneva yet! :-)   This requires the assumption that all interpretations are equally valid that there is no way of reasonably distinguishing among them. I wouldn\t make that assumption; I don\t think it is a reasonable assumption.    Michael and I and others read \the Bible\ with Christian glasses. Among the things that this should imply is that the NT informs the OT even to the point of dominanting it. Some points in the OT (ceremonial & dietary laws) are explicitly  abrogated by the NT texts. To drive Russell Turpin\s point with adequacy one needs to begin with NT texts (probably from Matthew and probably about damnation) (Just trying to help :-) )  This part is I discover what most moves me to post:  mls> I am a radical Christian *only* in that I take the gospel seriously.   Russell Turpin\s \No\ here is misplaced not to say inappropriate. Michael\s self-description much govern.  The equation of radical = liberal  which seems implied by Russell Turpin  is wrong.  Radical conservatives are  possible (if sadly lacking in numbers at present). Thomas Merton was a radical even though conservative in some ways. St Francis was a radical similarly. How many examples are needed?  mls> ... Why don\t I and the (myriads of) other Christians like me mls> tell you something about Christianity? ...  Michael\s question gets to a heart of the matter (Klingons have two hearts so my metaphor is not mixed just extraterrestrial :-) ) Russell Turpin (in an earlier post) had said that Michael (Michael\s theological positions actually) didn\t tell him much about Christianity; Dean Simeon responds (this time gently): \What do you mean?\ More direct perhaps would have been: \What could you possibly mean?\ The implied rhetorical effort to separate Michael from the  tradition is a failure. Michael is in the tradition. If your idea of the tradition doesn\t include him Change your idea of the tradition!   How can one answer this while staying on the more general issue? I\m on the other side of the interpretive fence (from Michael) on this issue yet \*nothing*\ is a hideous overstatement.  One verse is enough to refute it; I\ll offer two from Paul (of all people):  \In Jesus Christ there is neither male nor female...\(Galatians 3:28 {I don\t quote single verses as a rule and I don\t carry  them in my head}) and \*Nothing* shall separate us from the glory of God...\  (roughly from Romans). [If Russell would promise to convert based on these or any other verses  I\d promise to get the full context for any that he requires :-) :-)]   This conclusion does not follow even in short from the argument that goes before. A surprising logical ellipsis.  Dave Davis
 \tPlease do! And if you don\t want to post it here
   You might be sure
 I will clarify my earlier quote.  God\s laws were originally written for  the Israelites.  Jesus changed that fact by now making the Law applicable to all people not just the Jews.  Gentiles could be part of the kingdom of Heaven through the saving grace of God.  I never said that the Law was made obsolete by Jesus.  If anything He clarified the Law such as in that quote you made.  In the following verses Jesus takes several portions of the Law and expounds upon the Law giving clearer meaning to what God intended.  If you\ll notice He also reams into the Pharisees for mucking up the Law with their own contrived interpretations.  They knew every letter of the Law and followed it with their heads but not their hearts.  That is why He points out that our righteousness must surpass that of the Pharisees in order to be accepted into the kingdom of Heaven.  People such as the Pharisees are those who really go out of their way to debate about the number of angels that can dance on the head of a pin. They had become legalistic rule-makers - religious lawyers who practiced the letter of the Law but never really believed in it.    I think you will agree with me that there are in today\s world a lot of modern-day Pharisees who know the bible from end to end but do not believe in it.  What good is head knowledge if there is nothing in the heart?  Christianity is not just a set of rules; it\s a lifestyle that changes one\s perspectives and personal conduct.  And it demands obedience to God\s will. Some people can live by it but many others cannot or will not.  That is their choice and I have to respect it because God respects it too.  God be with you
Sorry
 Very easily. Show them pictures of crime scenes perpetrated by Christian terrorists in this country if that doesn\t convince them have them talk to the victims of Christian terrorism.   A brutal act of terrorism inspired by Christian propoganda was recently commited on your very campus.   Its very simple religious extremists of all religions put no value on human life. Christian and Islamic fundamentalists put advancing there religion above all else even if doing so violates the religion itself.  P.S. I\m not saying all Christians are terrorists
Rick Anderson replied to my letter with...  ra> In article <C5ELp2.L0C@acsu.buffalo.edu> ra> ra> >     Well Jason it\s heretical in a few ways. The first point is that ra> >     this equates Lucifer and Jesus as being the same type of being. ra> >     However Lucifer is a created being: Thou [wast] perfect in thy ra> >     ways from the day that thou wast created till iniquity was found in ra> >     thee. (Ezekiel 28:15). While Jesus is uncreated and the Creator of ra> >     all things: In the beginning was the Word and the Word was with ra> >     God and the Word was God.  The same was in the beginning with God. ra> >     All things were made by him; and without him was not any thing made ra> >     that was made. (John 1:1-3) And he is before all things and by ra> >     him all things consist. (Colossians 1:17) ra> ra>    Your inference from the Ezekiel and John passages that Lucifer was ra> created and that Jesus was not depends on a particular interpetation of ra> the word create -- one with which many Christians may not agree. ra> Granted the Mormon belief that all of God\s children (including Christ ra> and Lucifer) are eternally existent intelligences which were organized ra> into spirit children by God the term creation can apply equally well ra> to both of those passages.       Just briefly on something that you mentioned in passing. You refer to      differing interpretations of create and say that many Christians may      not agree. So what? That is really irrelevant. We do not base our faith      on how many people think one way or another do we? The bottom line is      truth regardless of popularity of opinions.       Also I find it rather strange that in trying to persuade that created      and eternally existent are equivalent you say granted the Mormon      belief... You can\t grant your conclusion and then expect the point to      have been addressed. In order to reply to the issue you have to address      and answer the point that was raised and not just jump to the      conclusion that you grant.       The Bible states that Lucifer was created.  The Bible states that Jesus      is the creator of all. The contradiction that we have is that the LDS      belief is that Jesus and Lucifer were the same.  ra> >     Your point that we all are brothers of Jesus and Lucifer is also ra> >     heretical since we are not innately brothers and sisters of Christ. ra> >     We are adopted For ye have not received the spirit of bondage ra> >     again to fear; but ye have received the Spirit of adoption whereby ra> >     we cry Abba Father. (Romans 8:15); and not the natural children ra> >     of God. It is only through faith that we even enter the family of ra> >     God; For ye are all the children of God by faith in Christ Jesus. ra> >     (Galatians 3:26). And it is only through the manifestation of this ra> >     faith in receiving Jesus that we are become the sons of God.  But ra> >     as many as received him to them gave he power to become the sons of ra> >     God [even] to them that believe on his name: Which were born not ra> >     of blood nor of the will of the flesh nor of the will of man but ra> >     of God. (John 1:12-13) ra> ra>    Has it occured to you Robert that being born of someone or being ra> of that person (or Person)\s family may be a symbolic term in the New ra> Testament?  Mormons believe that we are adopted into the House of ra> Israel through baptism and faith in Christ although some have expressed ra> belief that this does evince a physical change in our bodies.       The Mormon belief is that all are children of God. Literally. There is      nothing symbolic about it. This however contradicts what the Bible      says. The Bible teaches that not everyone is a child of God:            The field is the world; the good seed are the children of the            kingdom; but the tares are the children of the wicked [one];           (Matthew 13:38)            I speak that which I have seen with my Father: and ye do that which            ye have seen with your father. (John 8:38)            Ye do the deeds of your father. Then said they to him We be not            born of fornication; we have one Father [even] God.  Jesus said            unto them If God were your Father ye would love me: for I            proceeded forth and came from God; neither came I of myself but he            sent me.  Why do ye not understand my speech? [even] because ye            cannot hear my word.  Ye are of [your] father the devil and the            lusts of your father ye will do. He was a murderer from the            beginning and abode not in the truth because there is no truth in            him. When he speaketh a lie he speaketh of his own: for he is a            liar and the father of it. (John 8:41-44)            And said O full of all subtilty and all mischief [thou] child of            the devil [thou] enemy of all righteousness wilt thou not cease            to pervert the right ways of the Lord? (Acts 13:10)            Wherein in time past ye walked according to the course of this            world according to the prince of the power of the air the spirit            that now worketh in the children of disobedience: (Ephesians 2:2)            In this the children of God are manifest and the children of the            devil: whosoever doeth not righteousness is not of God neither he            that loveth not his brother. (1 John 3:10)       One becomes a child of God...            But as many as received him to them gave he power to become the           sons of God [even] to them that believe on his name: (John 1:12)            Behold what manner of love the Father hath bestowed upon us that           we should be called the sons of God: therefore the world knoweth us           not because it knew him not.  Beloved now are we the sons of God           and it doth not yet appear what we shall be: but we know that when           he shall appear we shall be like him; for we shall see him as he           is. (1 John 3:1-2)       ...when he is born again through faith in Jesus Christ:            Which were born not of blood nor of the will of the flesh nor of           the will of man but of God. (John 1:13)            Having predestinated us unto the adoption of children by Jesus           Christ to himself according to the good pleasure of his will           (Ephesians 1:5)            Of his own will begat he us with the word of truth that we should           be a kind of firstfruits of his creatures. (James 1:18)            For as many as are led by the Spirit of God they are the sons of           God. For ye have not received the spirit of bondage again to fear;           but ye have received the Spirit of adoption whereby we cry Abba           Father. The Spirit itself beareth witness with our spirit that we           are the children of God: (Romans 8:14-16)            Beloved let us love one another: for love is of God; and every one           that loveth is born of God and knoweth God. (1 John 4:7)            Whosoever believeth that Jesus is the Christ is born of God: and           every one that loveth him that begat loveth him also that is           begotten of him. (1 John 5:1)            For ye are all the children of God by faith in Christ Jesus.           (Galatians 3:26)  ra> >     We are told that And this is life eternal that they might know ra> >     thee the only true God and Jesus Christ whom thou hast sent. ra> >     (John 17:3). Life eternal is to know the only true God. Yet the ra> >     doctrines of the LDS that I have mentioned portray a vastly ra> >     different Jesus a Jesus that cannot be reconciled with the Jesus of ra> >     the Bible. They are so far removed from each other that to proclaim ra> >     one as being true denies the other from being true. According to the ra> >     Bible eternal life is dependent on knowing the only true God and ra> >     not the construct of imagination. ra> ra> ra>    Robert with all due respect who died and left you Chief Arbiter of ra> Correct Biblical Interpretation?  I don\t mean to be snotty about this ra> but the fact is that the Bible is so differently interpreted by different ra> groups of Biblical scholars (what do you think of the Jehovah\s ra> Witnesses for example?) that to make reference to the Jesus of the ra> Bible is simply ridiculous.  Whose Jesus of the Bible do you mean?       This is really a red herring. It doesn\t address any issue raised but       rather it seeks to obfuscate. The fact that some groups try to read       something into the Bible doesn\t change what the Bible teaches. For       example the fact that the Jehovah\s Witnesses deny the Deity of Christ       does not alter what the Bible teaches [ Looking for that blessed hope      and the glorious appearing of the great God and our Saviour Jesus      Christ; (Titus 2:13)Simon Peter a servant and an apostle of Jesus      Christ to them that have obtained like precious faith with us through      the righteousness of God and our Saviour Jesus Christ: (2 Peter 1:1)]       on the Deity of Christ.       We first look to the Bible to see what it teaches. To discount or not       even address what the Bible teaches because there are some groups that       have differing views is self-defeating. To see what the Bible teaches       you have to look at the Bible.  ra> >     Our Lord\s mortality was essential to his own salvation (_The ra> >     Promised Messiah_ p. 456) He had to work out his own salvation by ra> >     doing the will of the Father in all things (ibid. p.54) he had ra> >     to be baptized to gain admission to the celestial kingdom (_Mormon ra> >     Doctrine_ p.71). ra> ra>    Welcome to the wonderful world of Mormon paradoctrine Robert.  The ra> above books are by the late Bruce R. McConkie a former general authority ra> of the LDS Church.  Those books were not published by the Church nor do ra> they constitute offical doctrine.  They consist of his opinions.  Now ra> does that mean that what he says is not true?  Not at all; I\ll have to ra> think about the idea of Christ\s personal salvation before I come to any ra> conclusions myself.  The conclusions I come to may seem heretical to ra> you but I\m prepared to accept that.       I find this rather curious. When I mentioned that the Mormon belief is      that Jesus needed to be saved I put forward some quotes from the late      apostle
 Actually
 [...Dr. England\s story deleted it was a nice read the first time  through...]]   \tIt isn\t so much a matter of \interpretation\ of Bible texts  that sets Mormonism apart from orthodoxy as it is a matter of  *fabrication*.  \tAbout 20 years ago _National Lampoon_ had some comic strips  in them that were drawn by Neal Adams. They were called Son o\ God comics.  It was a parody of the Jesus in the Bible. In the comic there were a  group of thirteen Jewish kids from Brooklyn and when one of them said  the magic word he turned into Son o\ God. He went from a myopic  curly headed yarmulke wearing boy to a replica of the stylizied  portraits of Jesus --- with long flowing brown hair and gentile  features.\t  \tNow if someone were to profess faith in this NatLamp Jesus  and claim that they were a Christian because they believed in this  NatLamp Jesus we would have to say that this was fallacious since  this Jesus was a fabrication and did not really exist.  \tThis is the exact same thing that the LDS do when they claim  that they are Christian. They profess faith in Jesus
    Well when you crosspost to talk.origins
     Do you question the existence of Alexander the Great Tilgrath Pilisar III Nero Caligula Josephus Cyrus the Great Artexerxes?   Their documents have decayed to dust too.  Brian why another excuse?    Peter wrote a bit of the Bible.  What Peter says about God is what the Bible says.      Consider the Bible a court recording.  Over the period of thousands of years various people come up and testify of their experience with the living God.  Up comes Abraham the wealthy rancher.  Up comes Moses once the high official of Egypt.  Up comes Elijah a priest.  Up comes David a mere shepherd who became King.  Up comes the pagan King  Nebuchanezzar.  Up comes the pagan King of Persia Cyrus.  Up comes Nehemiah cupbearer to the King of Persia.  Then Matthew an IRS agent takes the stand.  Up comes Luke an M.D.  Then Paul a Jew who use to kill Christians for fun.  Up comes John a 17 year old boy.  Up comes Peter a fishermen.  Up comes James the brother of Jesus himself. Up comes hundreds of others.  You hear testimony from fishermen IRS agents priests Kings.  The court hearing lasts thousands of years with people coming up and testifying about the God who calls himself I am.   While you are listening to all this stuff you realize that King David could have never known John Solomon could have never known Matthew Nehemiah could have never known Peter.  You realize that all these people are independent witnesses and so you rule out collaboration.  Yet all of the witnesses tell of the same God.   Each testifier tells of his own experiences with the living God.  Each experience is different but each experience has enough cross-over to unmistakenly reveal that each one of these people is talking about the very same God. What Daniel did not know about God the 3rd Highest Official of Babylon God revealed to John 600 years later--but with a different perspective.  No two testimonies are identical.  Each testimony dares to venture off what is already known.  Yet each witness\s testimony even though different from those prior consistently describes harmoniously fitting facets of the character of the same God.    Now.  As we stare gazing at the computer you got this seeming fanatic on the other end of the net saying
  \tIf given a definite definition of God it is sometimes possible to  falsify the existance of that God.  \tBut when one refuses to give an immutable definition
 I understand and sympathize with your pain.  What happened in Waco was a very sad tradgedy.  Don\t take it out on us Christians though.  The Branch Davidians were not an organized religion.  They were a cult led by a ego-maniac cult leader.  The Christian faith stands only on the shoulders of one man the Lord of Lords and King of Kings Jesus Christ.   BTW David Koresh was NOT Jesus Christ as he claimed.  God be with you
: : :::Didn\t Christ tell his disciples to arm them selves shortly  :::before his crusifiction? (I believe the exact quote was along the :::lines of If you have [something] sell it and buy a sword.) : ::This from a guy who preached love deference of power to God and ::renunciation of worldly life in exchange for a life of the spirit? If ::Jesus did in fact command his disciples to arm themselves I would ::take that as yet another reason to reject Christian doctrine for ::whatever it\s worth.  Like most religions the doctrine has good and bad in it.  I would  certainly reject the current implementations of the doctrine. : :No.  The above is a classic example of taking a scripture out of context. :It\s taken from Luke 22:36.  But note vs 37; For I tell you that this :which is written must be accomplished in me namely \and he will be reckoned :with lawless ones\....  He then stated that two swords were enough :for the group to carry to be counted as lawless.    So having more than the politically correct number of weapons was cause to be arresed and killed even then huh?  :Jesus\ overiding message was one of peace (turn other cheek; live by  :sword die by sword; etc).  Yes of course
[constitution sacrificed to the bandwidth gods]  im glad i finally have heard exactly what the OTO is all about.  i finally know that i can stop looking content i the knowlege that im not interested. it\s tough enough listening to all the religions who refer to themselves as the One Truth.  How can i possibly accept it from a magical order?  We have all the Answers and will give them to those who join us (and pay dues)? Scary.  Besides
The trouble with trying to find out the truth is that Roehm and his buddies were ACCUSED OF being flaming faggots one of the pretexts for the Night of Long Knives in which Roehm and most of the SA wing of the NSDAP were purged.  Since the accusers thereafter controlled the records anything bearing on the subject -- true or not -- has to be considered tainted evidence.  The available data suggest that Roehm and his crowd the SA -- Sturmabteilung Storm Troopers -- left the world a better place when they departed

     Gong!  Take a moment and look at what you just wrote. First you defined an objective morality and then you qualified this objective morality with subjective justifications. Do you see the error in this?  Sorry you have just disqualified yourself
\t\t\t\t      ^^^^^ \tNo: It is old. You said AMORC *IS* not *was*... :-) Nothing personal OK? Good! :-)  \tMaybe you didn\t know that it\s over by now. There is no more pending legal actions from no where period. So yes there was a situation and it has been resolved by BOTH parties. As long as humans  handle anything it is subjected to breaking :-)  \tBTW
 Glad to hear this just a note Osiris Mithras and many other cult gods resurrected as well so there\s a good chance for all of us to maybe end up in a virtual reality simulator and live forever hurrah!  Sorry this was a joke some sort of one anyway. I\m the first that connected Osiris with a virtual reality personality database. Time to write a book.   Cheers
Sorry the San Jose based Rosicrucian order is called A.M.O.R.C  I don\t remember for the time being what the A.M. stand for but O.R.C is Ordo Rosae Crucis in other words latin for Order of the Rose Cross. Sigh seems l\m loosing more and more of my long term memory.  Otherwise their headquarters in San Jose has a pretty decent metaphysical bookstore if any of you are interested in such books. And my son loves to run around in their Egyptian museum.  Cheers

-*----  The two commandments *are* rules; they are merely rules that are so vague that they are practically devoid of meaning.  Michael Siemon acknowledges this every time he writes that the resolution of an argument over them turns on secular and cultural assumptions that are independent of these rules.    The commandment to love your neighbor as yourself can be viewed in part as reminding man that he is not God and cannot act as if he has ultimate responsibility. Indeed many traditions present an interpretation where believers are supposed to interpret loving one\s neighbor as following various other rules and relying on their god to make things come out right precisely because it would be wrong for man to assume such ultimate responsibility. Once again we are confronted with good sounding goo that means whatever the reader wants it to mean.    And who is to say that this interpretation is twisted?  There are many passages in the Bible that in their most straightforward reading show the Christian god behaving in just this way. Michael cannot refer to base claims or base commandments to show that such readings are twisted because this divergence in understanding occurs even in trying to interpret the base claims and commandments.  In addressing conservative Christians Michael will necessarily draw upon secular and cultural notions that these conservative Christians will reject.     But these base commandments are too vague to serve as  a principle for the CRITIQUE of ethical systems. The meaning of these base commandments for any believer derives from the secular and cultural notions that the believer brings to them from how the believer mixes their demands with straightforward readings of other Biblical passages from a particular sectarian tradition or from some combination of these things.  These commandments lack sufficient substance in themself to serve as a basis for criticizing ethical systems.  What meaning they have comes from the ethical system the believer brings to these commandments.    Jesus explicitly states that this summarizes Jewish law which would seem to bring in all of it if we properly understand what it means to love God and love our neighbors.  There are *many* parables and teachings the gospels attribute to Jesus that are straightforwardly read as ethical commandments.  The Pauline epistles are similarly full.  If it is not clear that these all come together in a sensible understanding of ethical behavior the problem is *not* a lack of raw material.   -*----  No Michael the conservative Christians also take the gospel  seriously.  What differentiates you is the way you interpret the gospel.   In a sense the wide variety of interpretations does tell us something about Christianity.  It tells us that the New Testament authors left a sufficiently vague hodge-podge that it can serve as the source text for many vastly different beliefs about the nature of the Christian god and about what men should and shouldn\t do.   The irony here is that there is *nothing* in Christianity per se that Michael can use to support the cause of lesbians and gays.  *Every* Christian principle he turns to this cause is effective only through the extra-Christian principles through which Michael interprets his religion and the homophobes apply the *same* Christian principles with equal justification to their cause.  In short it is the extra-Christian principles that make Michael\s Christianity beneficial and I suspect they would be as beneficial perhaps moreso without being filtered by Christian interpretation.    Michael paints a picture of standard American atheism as the rejection of the evil in many conservative Christian interpretations of the Bible.  But I think it is even more damaging to Christianity to note that the New Testament presents such a vague hodge-podge of notions about the nature of God and the nature of the good (except of course when it is ordered by an interpretation that relies on extraneous principles).  Here I think we should apply a Christian parable where a cold drink can have its value and a hot drink can have its value
  You are correct. See today\s (4/21) Washington Post. The gas the FBI used is most certainly fatal in high concentrations. Of course non-toxic tear gas is an oxymoron; the whole point of tear gas is that it is toxic
  Let us explore this interesting paragraph point by point sentence by sentence.   1) We are talking about origins not merely science.  Origins of what?  Are we speaking of the origins of life the human species the universe physical law biological diversity or what?  2) Science cannot explain origins.  This is a false statement unless it is carefully qualified.  It depends on what origins we are talking about.  3) For a person to exclude anything but science from the issue of origins is to say that there is no higher truth than science.  Again this is a false statement.  To begin with the notion of higher truth is distinctly dubious.  Many people believe that there are ways to ascertain truth that are not in the repetoire of science; they even believe that there are ways that are more reliable and certain.  Many believe that there are truths that cannot be expressed using the language of science.  Let it be so.  These truths are neither higher or  lower; they are simply true.  More to the point restricting one\s discussion of origins to science does not reject other sources of knowledge; it simply restricts the scope of discussion.  4) This is a false premise.  If this is intended as asserting that the previous sentence was false then (4) is actually true.  However the context identifies it as another false [or at least theologically unsound] statement.  5) By the way I enjoy science.  On the evidence Mr. Rawlins lacks sufficient understanding of science to enjoy science in any meaningful sense.  One might just as well say that one enjoys literature written in a language that one cannot read. However one cannot mark this sentence as false -- to follow the analogy perhaps he likes the pretty shapes of the letters.  6) It is truly a wonder observing God\s creation.  Let us not quibble; count this one as true.  7) Macroevolution is a mixture of 15 percent science and 85 percent religion [guaranteed within three percent error :) ]  Still another false statement.  However one can make it come out true with the following contextual modification:  Macroevolution as misunderstood by Rawline is a mixture of 15 percent of what Rawlins erroneously thinks of as science
 #In <mcclaryC5snpq.KB1@netcom.com> mcclary@netcom.com (Michael McClary) #        Just thought I\d clear up a few of the murky areas... # #>Actually after surviving being driven out of Nauvoo and later Carthage #>the Mormons DID fortify Utah.  They still arm themselves to defend the #>faith and stockpile food as well.  They have been involved in quite a #>lot of illegal activity - including multiple (and often underage) wives #>for the leaders - a practice still in vogue with some splinters of their #>sect.  The parallels between Koresh and Joseph Smith are striking. #                                         ^^^^^^^^^^^^  By they you mean the leaders of the lds church?  I grant you that when Joseph Smith was still alive plenty of accusations were filed most of which had little bearing with reality as evidenced by various verdicts. I have studied lds history for 15 years now and I have yet to see prove that the lds leadership was involved in quote: illegal activities. Plural marriage yes but your charge of underage wives sounds like it could have originated from a tabloid and discredits the high moral standards which characterized these leaders and families unlike as it appears those of David Koresh.  #        Joseph Smith started the sect.  After he and his brother Hyram #were murdered in a Nauvoo Il. jail cell church membership split over #who to follow.  Initially Smith was considered a prophet (just like #Mohammed a rather interesting parallel considering Muslims consider #Christ to be a prophet the same as Jews I\m led to understand.  Make #no mistake this was no messiah we\re talking about in Smith).  The  And neither did he claim he was.  As the church reflects the moral aptitude of its leaders (and especially those of Joseph Smith) I have nothing but the highest respect for this inspired man whose only crime was that he refused to deny that he had seen a vision...  Many have tried to explain the Smith phenomenon away but the bold presence of an 8.5 million member strong church stands as a witness that Joseph Smith\s testimony had enough resilience and power to carry on the message.  #thought at the time was that the gift of prophecy was to be handed #down father to son.  After Joseph Smith died his son was only #entering his teens.  Brigham Young and a few others claimed to have #been bequeathed the gift and leadership prior to his death.  The #Council of Twelve the Church governing body wasn\t of much help #here and this basic conflict is still a wedge between the sects. #Brigham Young took his followers to Salt Lake.  The rest waited #for Smith Jr. to grow up enough to assume leadership.  The other #claimants to the leadership were soon ignored like Mike Dukakis. ;-)  The rest were apostates and excommunicated members of the Church while the great majority of the membership the Twelve and the various auxiliary organizations chose to accept Brigham Young as the new prophet and leader of the Church.  If you knew your lds scriptures and doctrine you would have known that Brigham Young was the FIRST in line to fill the prophet Joseph Smith\s vacancy: he was the senior apostle in the Quorum and various comments made by Joseph indicated that it was Brigham who would lead the latter-day exodus to the West.  Other rightful heirs were either dead (Hyrum Smith) or excommunicated (Oliver Cowdery) and while persecutions abounded and intensified Joseph Smith had already given orders to look for a new place an empty land beyond the boundaries of the United States (at that time).  This Rekhabite principle (pseudographia) was well understood and antipated by the great majority of lds faithful and was not questioned by them.  Granted a couple of do-it-yourselfers stayed behind unwilling to sacrifice and to undertake the perilous journey to the unknown but this also was necessary to separate the tares from the wheat.  The church benefitted from this purification process: they became even more unified and willing to carry out their mission to the world.  #        Both sects practiced the 1-year food stockpile doctrine #and this being frontier and farming country most carried or at #least owned weapons.  There is little evidence that they were a #militaristic sect given that they tended to move on rather than #face large-scale opposition.  Brigham Young having suffered a #great deal getting to Salt Lake seems to have been quite #justified in making military training a good thing.  Remember #this was far beyond where even the US Army went and these people #had nobody to turn to save themselves. # #        Just a little context to put this all in perspective.  BTW since when is the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (one of the largest denominations in the country) a sect???  It didn\t splinter from any other religion as did say the Southern Baptists or Methodists.  #>So what did the Mormons get?  It seems that J. Edgar Hoover was very #>impressed with the way they kept secrets.  (They\re pledged to defend #>secrets with their lives and atone for sin with blood.  Many actually #>do - even to the point of suicide.)  What a balloney.  Suicide is sinful and against the law of God.  I am not comfortable with this alleged cosiness with Mammon: I assure you that *many* among us reject this attitude categorically.  Period.  Our ONLY true allegiance is to our God and to the leaders which He has appointed to represent Him.  In any regard to read this TRASH (about suicide and atone for sins with blood) is yet another insulting misrepresentation of what my church believes in and stands for...  # #        The RLDS the Reorganized LDS are friendly rivals of the LDS #and delight in telling stories about them which generates quick retorts #from the LDS members and everybody has a grand time.  At no time have #I ever even heard this hinted at.  I\m taking it with a salt block.  Make it a really big salt mountain with a glacier on top.  #>  So he hired virtually no one but #>Mormons until the FBI was almost exclusively staffed by members of the #>Church of Later Day Saints.  Though J. Edgar is finally gone the FBI #>personnel (especially the field agents) are still heavily Mormon. #>I have often wondered how this might affect the FBI\s treatment #>of religious organizations a Mormon would consider heretical.  Preposterous.  Even if this were true (reliable data please) I am convinced that those officers would perform to the highest codes of honor and conduct (that\s why they were selected for in the first place remember?).  Besides one of our Articles of Faith STRONGLY states the principle of freedom of religion and that all people are free to worship *how* *where* or *what* they may.  #        If it\s true there would be little affect.  LDS and RLDS #philosophy is that all other religions have strayed from the true #Church as set down by Jesus but that God will judge each on his #own merits.  In addition the RLDS also contend (and the LDS may #as well) that ignorance of the True Way (tm) is an excuse.  You #can only be condemned if you had been tought the way and rejected #it.  In short LDS and RLDS suffer everybody from Lutherans to #Buddhists secure in the knowledge that though they are wrong they #will not be penalized for ignorance.  It is more likely that Hoover #liked them because of their rather strict upbringings which forbade #alcohol tobacco hot drink (like coffee or tea) and the like. #These people are the salt of the Earth and as such are more #easily made to follow orders and have few vices to be used against them.  A good explanation I can accept that.  You are right that lds people are sometimes a little too cosy with Mammon\s orders (the late president Kimball for example was an exception with his strong opposition of the selection of the MX Peace Keeper missile maze in Utah).  #        That\s my somewhat educated guess anyway.  Both sects have #splinter groups that don\t mirror the masses but these are small #and rare and hardly worth noting their common ancestry. # #        None of this has any relevance to guns though.  When a #man\s religion is used to deny him the right of self-protection with #the weapons suitable for the job he\ll find an ally in me. # #< Dan Sorenson DoD #1066 z1dan@exnet.iastate.edu viking@iastate.edu > #<  ISU only censors what I read not what I say.  Don\t blame them.  > #<     USENET: Post to exotic distant machines.  Meet exciting
Jim Brown wrote :  [ deleted ] [ deleted ]    Unfortunately it\s not that simple.  The KJV is preferred by the majority of fundamentalists (at least here).  The second part of your argument fails as well
 Well looking at the videos it seems that this fire started in various places at the same time which would indicate that this was a planned action. I\m sure FBI and BATF didn\t *deliberately* start a possible fire having a sniper kill Korresh would have been a far easier  method. Looking at the careful operation and use of tear gas that as I know don\t start fires it is less likely that this  was the case.  Sorry but my bets are on fanatical people keen to start Armageddon -- theirs.  Cheers
 I guess the San Jose Mercury news is wrong then and if so
 \tSo if I were to assert that there are no thousand year old  invisible pink unicorns* residing in my walls I need to support this with  evidence? I think the _lack_ of evidence shall suffice.   \t* Who happen to like listening to satanic messages found in playing  Beethoven\s 45th symphony backwards. ---          FBI officials said cult leader David Koresh may have           forced followers to remain as flames closed in. Koresh\s           armed guard may have injected as many as 24 children with           poison to quiet them.          -                  And God saw everything he had made and behold
Jesus:     Black and white.  A spade is a spade.  There is no hidden agenda behind this so stop trying to look for one.   It is an easy and as straight forward as it reads.  Kent I am not accusing you of evil things.  Jesus is accusing you. And it is not only you that He is accusing.  He is accusing everyone. Me you and everyone in the world is guilty.  Whether one sees the light or does not seen the light has nothing to do with  whether we do evil things.  We do them regardless.    Jesus uses the word men.  I am included.  Jesus is not soloing you out. Jesus is making a general statement about out the sad state of man. Christians are not immuned from doing evil things.  A Christian  is just a person in whom the Holy Spirit indwells.  A Christian  can see the evil he is doing--because his evil has been brought out into the light.  Jesus is not saying that just because evil has been exposed that the Christian will stop doing evil.  If you haven\t seen Jesus\s light your evil deeds simply haven\t been exposed to the His light.  You may shed some light on your own.  Your human spirit shines at perhaps 1 candela.  But the Holy Spirit shines at a Megacandela.  The Holy Spirit can shine light into places inside us where we didn\t even know existed.   So do you see Jesus\s point?  Christians are not perfect.  Nonchristians are not perfect.  Nonchristians do not want to come into the Light of Jesus because they will see all the problems in their lives and they will not like the sight.  It is an ugly thing to see how far we have fallen from Jesus\s perspective.  Do you think you want to know how really ignorant you are?  Do you think Brian Kendig wants to know?  Do you think I want to know?  Ego verses the truth which do you choose?   And I watched Koresh too an imposter who thought he saw the light  who made sure that the 19 children burned to death sadly as part of his delusion.  It is even sadder that the people who died with him chose to die with them and that ignorance was their downfall to death.   And Kent don\t you bury yourself underneath a rock with an excuse like bringing up Koresh--as if Koresh actually had truth in him. David Koresh was no light and no excuse for you to stay away from the real Jesus Christ.  David Koresh who claimed to be Jesus was a fraud.  It was obvious.  David Koresh was born in America. Jesus was born in Bethlehem.  Koresh wasn\t even a good imposter having missed an obvious point as that.  Jesus warned of such imposters in the end-times.  David Koresh wasn\t anything new to Jesus.  Jesus told us to be aware of imposters 2000 years ago.    So the next time an imposter makes a scene and claims to be Jesus.  Ask the obvious.  Where were you born?  Was your mother\s name Mary?  If the Branch Davidians asked that simple question they would have labeled Koresh a liar right from the start.  The wouldn\t have followed Koresh. They wouldn\t have died.  But look what happened.  Their ignorance cost them their lives.  Their choice to be ignorant cost them a lot.  Kent since you studied the Bible under Lutheranism do you not remember what tactic Satan used to try to tempt Jesus?   Did not Satan quote the Bible out of context?  Do you remember what tactic the serpent of Genesis used to tempt Eve?  Did he not misquote God?  What Satan used on Eve and succeeded  was the same ploy he tried on Jesus.  But in Jesus\s case
But he said \tYea rather \tblessed are they \tthat hear the word of God
The primary problem in human nature is a fragmentation of being. Humans are in a state of tension a tension of opposites. Good and evil are the most thought provoking polarities that come to mind.  The Bible provides us with many examples of the fragmentation of being. The warring opposites within us are a product of man\s rebellion against God which is described so vividly in the pages of the Scriptures.  Man was created with the order to become a god. Those were the words of St.  Basil in the fourth century. What he was trying to say was that God created man to be a partaker of the divine nature. In the Eastern Orthodox Church this is called theosis or deification.  One can also say that man was created to be whole i.e. spirit soul and body operating in unison. The story of Adam and Eve is a picture of the archetypal humans before obtaining moral consciousness. Theirs was a harmonious relationship with each other the world and the Creator. That innocent harmony was shattered when they disobeyed God their natural wholeness falling apart into two seemingly irreconcilable halves. Immediately guilt and fear was manifested in their lives. They become bound to hardship toil and suffering.  This is symbolized in their exile from the paradisiac state.  The beast in the jungle does not possess moral consciousness. If it were to receive this self-awareness the knowledge of good and evil its paradisiac state would also be destroyed.  Was it the intention of the Creator to leave man in this state of innocence all the days of his existence on earth? Or was the gaining of self-awareness carefully staged by God who did not desire that His masterpiece mankind be a blissful idiot?  God must have known that for mankind to achieve any kind of moral value he must pass through a confrontation with the opposites. There is no other way to achieve union with God.  Jesus Christ is the answer to the problem of the warring polarities. He was the perfectly integrated individual reconciling the opposites and making it possible for us to be integrated i.e. to become God not in His essence

 John:  \tIt not good netiquette to quote a complete article :-) NOTHING PERSONAL
II SAMUEL 24: And again the anger of the LORD was kindled against Israel and he moved David against them to say Go
Question for those of you who seem to be fundamentalists (Stephen Tice the Cotera Joe Gaut et al)(apologies if I\ve mislabelled any of you I\ve only started reading t.r.m since the BD disaster.  But I know the Cotera is a fundy) and are defending Koresh and his beliefs as an example of True Christianity under persecution from the the Big Bad Secular State: what is your opinion of his reported sexual habits? If the reports are accurate what IYO does this say about the quality of his Christianity?  Or are the allegations just part of the Big Cover-Up?  (I remain deliberately neutral on the cause of the fire: I wouldn\t put it past Koresh to have torched the place himself.  On the other hand if the propane-tank-accident story is correct I wouldn\t put it past the FBI to try to cover its ass by claiming Koresh did it.  I hope your government does a VERY thorough investigation of the whole debacle and I\ll be disappointed if a few heads don\t roll.  The authorities seem to have botched the original raid and in the matter of the fire are guilty of either serious misjudgement
  Well there is a fair amount of evidence floating around that indicates that OTO has been around since at least the late 1800s long before Crowley ever heard of it how long has AMORC been around? (yes I know that they claim to have existed as an organization clear into prehistory but I doubt that they have any organizational paperwork as a non-profit that can be carbon-dated to 20
  Finally brethern whatever is true whatever is honorable whatever is right whatever is pure whatever is lovely whatever is of good repute if there is any excellence and if anything worthy of praise
 I\m sorry
 Do you consider Neo-Nazis and white supremists to be Christian?  I\d hardly classify them as Christian.  Do they follow the teachings of Christ?  Love one another.  Love your neighbour as yourself.  Love your enemies.  Is Jesus Christ their Lord and Saviour?  By the persecution of Jews they are violating all the precepts of what Christ died for.  They are in direct violation of the teachings of Christ.  Even Jesus who was crucified by the Jewish leaders of that time loved His enemies by asking the Father for forgiveness of their sins.  I am a Christian and I bear no animosity towards Jews or any one else. The enemy is Satan not our fellow man.  God be with you
  If you were able to prove that morality is objective then it would be correct to do so. The problem is by the very meaning of the words in question to do so is oxymoronic. Of course you could redefine the words

In response to: Whitten@Fwva.Saic.Com (David Whitten):    And you responded:   Of course.  The feast WAS the Seder and the accounts of it are very clear on this point.  The difference is the connection between the bread and wine and the body and blood of god.  This is an old association of the Tammuz/Osiris/Mithras line and not really related to Judaism.  In any case I didn\t really intend to argue the point.  I saw a possible association and pointed it out
  I think the passage you\re looking for is the following.  Matthew 5:17    Think not that I have come to abolish the law and the  prophets; I have come not to abolish them but to fulfil them.  Matthew 5:18   For truly I say to you till heaven and earth pass away  not an iota not a dot will pass from the law until all is accomplished.  Matthew 5:19   Whoever then relaxes one of the least of these commandments  and teaches men so shall be called least in the kingdom of heaven; but he  who does them and teaches them shall be called great in the kingdom of  heaven.  Matthew 5:20   For I tell you unless your righteousness exceeds that of  the scribes and Pharisees you will never enter the kingdom of heaven.   There are several problems with this.  The most serious is that the Law was regarded by Jews at the time (and now) as binding on Jews but not on Gentiles.  There are rules that were binding on all human beings (the so-called Noachic laws) but they are quite minimal.  The issue that the Church had to face after Jesus\ death was what to do about Gentiles who wanted to follow Christ.  The decision not to impose the Law on them didn\t say that the Law was abolished.  It simply acknowledged that fact that it didn\t apply to Gentiles.  This is a simple answer which I think just about everyone can agree to. (A discussion of the issue in more or less these terms is recorded in Acts 15.)  However there\s more involved.  In order to get a full picture of the role of the Law we have to come to grips with Paul\s apparent rejection of the Law and how that relates to Jesus\ commendation of the Law.  At least as I read Paul he says that the Law serves a purpose that has been in a certain sense superceded.  Again this issue isn\t one of the abolition of the Law.  In the middle of his discussion Paul notes that he might be understood this way and assures us that that\s not what he intends to say.  Rather he sees the Law as primarily being present to convict people of their sinfulness.  But ultimately it\s an impossible standard and one that has been superceded by Christ.  Paul\s comments are not the world\s clearest here and not everyone agrees with my reading.  But the interesting thing to notice is that even this radical position does not entail an abolition of the Law.  It still remains as an uncompromising standard from which not an iota or dot may be removed. For its purpose of convicting of sin it\s important that it not be relaxed.  However for Christians it\s not the end -- ultimately we live in faith not Law.  While the theoretical categories they use are rather different in the end I think Jesus and Paul come to a rather similar conclusion.  The quoted passage from Mat 5 should be taken in the context of the rest of the Sermon on the Mount where Jesus shows us how he interprets the Law.  The not an iota or dot would suggest a rather literal reading but in fact that\s not Jesus\ approach.  Jesus\ interpretations emphasize the intent of the Law and stay away from the ceremonial details.  Indeed he is well known for taking a rather free attitude towards the Sabbath and kosher laws.  Some scholars claim that Mat 5:17-20 needs to be taken in the context of 1st Cent. Jewish discussions.  Jesus accuses his opponents of caring about giving a tenth of even the most minor herbs but neglecting the things that really matter: justice mercy and faith and caring about how cups and plates are cleaned but not about the fact that inside the people who use them are full of extortion and rapacity.  (Mat 23:23-25) This and the discussion later in Mat 5 suggest that Jesus has a very specific view of the Law in mind and that when he talks about maintaining the Law in its full strength he is thinking of these aspects of it. Paul\s conclusion is similar.  While he talks about the Law being superceded all of the specific examples he gives involve the ceremonial law such as circumcision and the Sabbath.  He is quite concerned about maintaining moral standards.  The net result of this is that when Paul talks about the Law being superceded and Jesus talks about the Law being maintained I believe they are talking about different aspects of the Law.  Paul is embroiled in arguments about circumcision.  As is natural in letters responding to specific situations he\s looking at the aspect of the Law that is currently causing trouble: the Law as specifically Jewish ceremonies.  He certainly does not intend to abolish divine standards of conduct.  On the other hand when Jesus commends the Law he seems to be talking the Law in its broadest implications for morals and human relationships
COCHRANEJAMES SHAPLEIGH writes   This group killed itself to fulfill its interpretation of prophecy and to book a suite in Paradise taking innocent kids along for the ride. I hardly think the feds were motivated by persecution. If they were all Koresh would have had to do was surrender quietly to the authorities without firing a shot to get the American people behind him and put the feds in the hot seat. But no God told him to play the tough guy. There\s great strength in yielding
 Too many clues not enough substance.  You ask a lot of good questions though but they are questions *you* should be worried about
 I agree which is why I\ve asked for help with it.  The reason I\m working on this list is because I\ve recently had one too many Christians tell me the Bible contains no contradictions whatsoever.  They believe that it\s true and that it describes reality perfectly and even predicts history before it happens.  Before I can carry on any sort of meaningful conversation with these people I\ve got to SHOW them with concrete evidence that the Bible is not nearly as airtight as they thought.  I hope to do that with this list.  Specifically: when I bring up the fact that Genesis contains two contradictory creation stories
 Now take a good look at at an tell me man there is no Christian Devil? There is is real is a virus a meme infecting and possessing the good people and keep \em from becoming human beings with emphasis on the being! Is not a matter of good people an evil people is all good people see but some good people vexed of the Christian Devil. An it can\t be burn out or lynch out or rape out. Only wise up let I rise up. Christian Devil is real man how else can you explain five hundred years of history even more? Can only be explained by Christians invoke Christian Devil.  you keep on knocking but you can\t come in i got to understand you\ve been living in sin but walk right in and sit right down i\ll keep on loving you i\ll play the clown but bend down low let i tell you what i know yah  i\ve been \buked brothers and i\ve been stoned woe woe woe now i\m hung by a tree in the the ganging on a few woe woe woe it doesn\t matter who the man is who lives the life he loves it doesn\t matter what the man does or the honest life he loves i want somewhere i want somewhere hallelujah hallelujah somewhere to lay my head woe is me  only ska beat in \eaven man  stiff necked fools you think you\re cool to deny me for simplicity yes you have gone for so long with your love for vanity now yes you have got the wrong interpretation mixed up with vain imagination so take jah sun and jah moon and jah rain and jah stars and forever yes erase your fantasy yeah the lips of the righteous teach many but fools die for want of wisdom the rich man\s wealth is in his city the righteous wealth is in his holy place so take jah sun and jah moon and jah rain and jah stars and forever yes erase your fantasy destruction of the poor is in their poverty destruction of the soul is vanity yeah but i don\t want to rule ya i don\t want to fool ya i don\t want to school ya things you you might never know about yes you have got the wrong interpretation mixed up with vain vain imagination stiff necked fools you think you\re cool to deny me for oh simplicity  love to see when yah move in the rhythm love to see when you\re dancing from within it gives great joy to feel such sweet togetherness everyone\s doing and they\re doing their best it remind i of the days in jericho when we trodden down jericho wall these are the days when we\ll trod true babylon gonna trod until babylon fall  then I saw the angel with the seven seals saying
Fact or rumor....?  Madalyn Murray O\Hare an atheist who eliminated the use of the bible reading and prayer in public schools 15 years ago is now going to appear before the FCC with a petition to stop the reading of the Gospel on the airways of America.  And she is also campaigning to remove Christmas programs songs
 [...stuff deleted...]  Andy-- I think we do agree given your clarification of how we were  each using the terms fact and theory.  I\ll only add that I think perhaps I feel more strongly about separating them though your usage is quite valid.   I\ll add here that any falsification or rejection does not in any way reduce its current usefulness.  So long as it accurately predicts or  describes things we can observe.  Not to be a pain in the ass but is there any reason you don\t just say _the theory of evolution_ rather than the _fact of evolution is still a theory_.  I\m asking because this whole thread got started because I was bothered by a post that referred to _the fact of evolution_ basically leaving off the phrase _is still a theory_.  Without a  clarification like the one you just gave just saying _the fact of evolution_ has a very different meaning to me.  I\m not sure I agree here.  Again it may be because I feel stronger about separating terms.  I was trying to say that the _theories_ proposed to explain the _mechanisms_ and the _mechanisms_ themselves are the only realities here.  It is the existence of mechanisms not  the things themselves that are so predictive as to be considered  fact (as you would say).  There aren\t really little planetary particle  systems called atoms out there.  Or I should say and more to my original  point it would be a leap of faith to say there are because we observe only  the mechanisms.  There is no need to _believe_ there are _actually_ atoms out there as we have decided to think about them.  It\s enough to discuss the mechanisms.  At any rate I\m not sure I am being  any clearer than before but I thought it was worth a shot.  The bottom line though is I think we agree on two fundamental ideas:     1. --evolution is a theory supported by observational evidence (my way)       --the fact of evolution is a theory supported by observational         evidence (your way)     2. --creation is just an opinion.  If a theist wants to call it         a theory then he can.  I won\t:  it has no supporting evidence  \tand it neither predicts nor supports any observations that can         be made.  With no mechanisms to talk about
 Well there are two approaches we can take here.  One is to ask you what this objective morality is assuming it\s not a secret.  The other is to ask you what you think is wrong with relativism
:  : Seriously though Griffen didn\t save the lives of children and he did : destroy the life of a man so on the most superficial of levels he\s scum. :   I almost agree but Griffen is not scum.  Scum has no guilt or freedom to choose anything.  Griffen does.  God did not make scum when he made Griffen. He made a precious person and this person chose to do wrong.  The same goes for Dr. Gunn.  : But if you are to examine it more closely Griffen would have preferred that : these children were born -- yet AFTER their birth did Griffen have any  : assistance to offer them?  Did Griffen intend to support them educate them : raise them up to be useful citizens?  Did he have any intent whatsoever : to help these children after birth? :   Here\s the real problem.  Americans have become so insensitive to the needs of others and so completely wrapped up in themselves that they cannot see straight or think clearly enough to make even the slightest and most obvious moral decisions based on reality.  If a man abandons a woman to care for their child on her own he is not considered to be a very respectable or decent man by anyone.  This man has fled his responsibility has behaved like a lazy coward and has turned away from his responsibility to his wife and child.  However if a woman decides to kill her unborn child to release her burden she is not thought of in the same way.  When the man abandons the woman suffers but the child is free to grow up and live a happy and normal life. When the woman abandons the child is diced or killed with saline or vacuumed out and the man has no choice and the man sometimes suffers so badly that he wishes he could trade places with his child.  Ths root of this whole problem is selfishness--the arrogance that says My feelings and desires are supreme and your well being is not worth dung. And when you come down to it this is the substance of what hell is made of. It\s the reason a loving God can throw selfish people to the devil and his demons for all of eternity.  Let any one of us unrepentant into heaven and we\ll ruin it the first chance we get.  : Now I don\t really know the answer to these questions but I\ve got a real : good guess. :   And it\s probably right.  : And I wouldn\t call *that* \benevolent\ either. :   It is a move in the right direction.  As it is now we don\t see our responsibility because we kill it and get it out of sight.  The media backs us completely.  Real responsibility does not sell.  The only responsibility that sells in the marketplace is that which is just enough to make us feel responsible without showing anything that might show us our own true irresponsibility.  We want to feel like good people but we want nothing with *being* good people.  Just give me the freedom to say I\m good and the rest of the world can burn. Rape and kill my children and throw my parents to the places where poor old folks rot until they\re dead.  I\ll hate my brother and sister if I wish and I\ll cheat on my wife or husband.  Screw the government because it screws me and don\t talk to me about giving to the church because church people are all a bunch of money grubbing hypocrites. But I\m a good person.  At least I admit what I do.  At least I love myself and we all know that is the greatest love in the world--not that a man lay down his life for his brother...That sounds too christian.  At the root this is the substance of what hell is made of.  We\ve become a self indulgant backslidden society no longer responsible to our children to our parents to our families to our government or to our God.  This is the root behind justification of every evil of every corruption in government of every slanderous remark of every lie and of every murder.  Society cannot continue to live like this long.  it will have to destroy itsself soon and perhaps in the end that will be the biggest blessing this world can hope to see.  Why do people see so much evil in trying to turn this situation around?  -- ----------------------------------------------------------------------- \tI deplore the horrible crime of child murder... \t We want prevention not merely punishment. \t We must reach the root of the evil... \t It is practiced by those whose inmost souls revolt \t from the dreadful deed... \t No mater what the motive love of ease \t\tor a desire to save from suffering the unborn innocent
Frank I tried to mail this but it bounced.  It is fast moving out of t.a scope but I didn\t know if t.a was the only group of the three that you subscribed to. Apologies to regular t.a folks.    You must be using \values\ to mean something different from the way I see it used normally.  And you are certainly using \Science\ like that if you equate it to the real world.  Science is the recognition of patterns in our perceptions of the Universe and the making of qualitative and quantitative predictions concerning those perceptions.  It has nothing to do with values as far as I can see. Values are ... well they are what I value. They are what I would have rather than not have - what I would experience rather than not
 Another dodge.  Oh well.  I\m no match for your amazing repertoire of red herrings and smoke screens.    You asked for an apology.  I\m not going to apologize for pointing out that your straw-man argument was a straw-man argument.  Nor for saying that your list of bible contradictions shows such low standards of scholarship that it should be an embarrassment to anti-inerrantists just as Josh McDowell should be an embarrassment to the fundies.  Nor for objecting various times to your taking quotes out of context.  Nor for pointing out that they do it too is not an excuse. Nor for calling your red herrings and smoke screens what they are.  I\m still not sure why you think I\m a hypocrite.  It\s true that I haven\t responded to any of Robert Weiss\ articles which may be due in part to the fact that I almost never read his articles.  But I have responded to both you and Frank DeCenso (a fundie/inerrantist.)  Both you and Frank have taken quotes out of context and I\ve objected to both of you doing so.  I\ve criticized bad arguments both when they were yours and I agreed with the conclusion (that the Bible is not inerrant) and when they were Frank\s and I disagreed with the conclusion.  I\ve criticized both you and Frank for evading questions and for trying to explain me away without addressing the objections I raise (you by accusing me of being hypocritical and irrational Frank by accusing me of being motivated by a desire to attack the Bible.) I don\t see that any of this is hypocritical nor do I apologize for it.  I do apologize however
: Marian CATHOLIC high school outside of chicago: :  : 666 south ASHLAND avenue. :  Actually
: >: >> Gilligan = Sloth : >: >> Skipper = Anger : >: >> Thurston Howell III = Greed : >: >> Lovey Howell = Gluttony : >: >> Ginger = Lust : >: >> Professor = Pride : >: >> Mary Ann = Envy : > : >Assorted Monkeys= Secular Humanism :  : Assorted Headhunters - Godless Heathen Savagery : Russian Agent who looks like Gilligan - Godless Communism : Japanese Sailor - Godless Barbarism : Walter Pigeon - Godless Bird Turd : The Mosquitos (Bingo Bango Bongo Irving) - Godless Rock\n\Roll : Harold Heckuba (Phil Silvers) - Hollywood Hedonism : John McGiver - Butterfly flicking : Tonga the Fake Apeman - Deceit Lust : Eva Grubb - Deceit
I produced an error last week about CHORION:   I abhor publishing trash (I abhor it of myself even more than I do from others but since I do not present myself as an authority on the subject I do not feel dishonest though I do openly admit ignorance and incompetence in this example).  Thus I felt honor bound to do a better set of research specifically on the word.  First it should be noted that Greek grammar is not as tough as I first assumed (it is not nontrivial by any means and I still am not competent with it but it is not as opaque as I had thought).  It turns out that while the Index for the Bauer-Arndt-Gingrich Greek Lexicon renders each verse in order each word within a verse is put in greek alphabetical order.  Thus while the the meaning of the verse is decipherable the syntax is far from clear.  On the other hand a Greek-English Intralinear Bible makes things a lot more comprehendable.  And yes the word for field in Acts 1:18 is indeed chorion.   Now I\ve checked several Greek-English lexicons:  \tGreek English Lexicon of the New Testament Louw and Nida \tRobinson\s Greek and English Lexicon of the New Testament \tGreek English Lexicon of the New Testament Grimm \tWord study Concordance Tynsdale \tA Greek English Lexicon of the New Testament and other  \t early Christian Writings Bauer-Arndt-Gingrich \tThe New Analytical Greek Lexicon Perschbacher  In each case the meaning of the word Chorion was given variously as:  \tA space place region district field area country place  \tland farm estate a bit of tillage and similar meanings.  Nowhere do any of these books mention anything about grave. As some of these  books go into great detail I would be very surprised to find that these books  are all inadequate and Mr Archer is the only competent scholar in Greek.  I  think it more likely that Mr Archer\s investigations into contradictions to  be once again as your friend said it lacking in substance and thus Archer  is again shown worthless as an expert witness (By the way Mr DeCenso I would  have honorably presented my results on this matter even if I had found them to support Mr Archer\s contentions).   By the way among these lexicons (eg: Robinson\s) is the definition of agros the word used in Matthew 27 to describe the field bought.  The word agros is defined as a field in the country. Chorion is specifically noted as a synonym to agros.  This is significant as it is evidence of how silly Bullinger\s exegisis was which stated that the word for field in Matthew (ie: agros) is different from the word for field in Acts (ie: chorion) and thus we must be talking about two different fields (Of course you already admit how stupid Bullinger\s exegisis is but this was a small serendipity which drives the point home).   So as of now unless Mr DeCenso show compelling reasons to believe otherwise (eg: a reputable scholar with reputable references) I consider this  particular issue closed.  See Mr DeCenso now you can go on to answer questions about the denials of Peter the day of the Crucifixion Tyre and  the fact that the author of Matthew quoted from the wrong prophet in discussing the Potter\s Field.   \t\t\t\tLater
   Naw the owners of WordPerfect are Mormons and by Tony Rose\s and Robert Weiss\ standards
 Where does it say in the bible that Christians are supposed to persecute Jews?  Isn\t it love your enemies instead?  They may say they are Christian but do their actions speak differently?  Do you believe what everyone tells you?  I don\t.  I came to believe in God by my own investigation and conclusions. And ultimately by my own choice.  Salvation however was granted only through the grace of God.   To be a Christian is to model oneself after Jesus Christ as implied by the very name Christian.  If you say you believe in your head but do not feel in your heart what does that say of your belief?   White supremists and Neo-Nazis are NOT any brand of Christian.  If you hate your whom you can see then how can you love God whom you cannot  see?  What does this belief entail?  Believing in Christ and having your sins forgiven in His name does NOT give a Christian a free licence to sin.  To repent of a sin is to ask forgiveness of that sin and TRY NOT to do it again.  I am a Christian but if you lump me in with racists and accuse me of being such then are you not pre-judging me?  BTW I am of Chinese racial background and I know what it is to be part of a visible minority in this country.  I don\t think that I would be favourably looked upon by these White supremist Christians as you call them.  Anyone can say what they believe but if they don\t practice what they preach then their belief is false.  Do you concur?    Nazis and racists in general are the ones that come to my immediate attention. What I believe is that such people may be using the bible to mask their racial intolerance and bigotry.  They can do as they do and hide behind Christianity but I tell you that Jesus would have nothing to do with them.   No arguement there.   The only point I\m trying to make is that those who call themselves Christian may not be Christian.  I ask that you draw your own conclusions by what they do and what they say.  If they are not modelled after the example of Jesus Christ then they are NOT Christian.  If they have not repented of their sins and accepted Jesus Christ as their personal Lord and Saviour then they are  NOT Christian.  These are the only criteria to being a Christian.  May God be with you
He sounds really cute Morte!  Kinds like _pete\s dragon_ maybe smaller maybe a different species.. winge\d?  (shakespear wing-ED)  I\ve always hat a horde of mice to turn to for fun & sort of that kind of mouse in Cinderella (walt disney).  I grew up sort of as an only child part time.. my siblings were 10-8-6 years older than me so i was pretty commonly a different sort of charater in their games (read: non speaking hot cocoa-goffer stand in (still silent) bad guy/good guy/etc) so my mice were playmates more than advisors.  Could curt or whomever has a good list of books please post such list in all sorts of fields like jungian condensed buddist/etc philosophies multiple personailty disorders
frank@D012S658.uucp (Frank O\Dwyer) writes ...  To the degree that relativism is a more accurate decription of the truth than is objectivism it provides more power and ability to control events.  Assuming for the moment that morals _are_ relative then two relativists can recognize that neither has a lock on the absolute truth and they can proceed to negotiate a workable compromise that produces the desired results.  Assuming that there is an absolute morality two disagreeing  objectivists can either be both wrong or just one of them right; there is no room for compromise.  Once you beleive in absolute morals you must accept that you are amoral or that everyone who disagrees with you is amoral.  Given a choice between a peaceful compromise or endless contention
  Well dozens of children left the compound between the original BATF assualt and the FBI assault 7 weeks later. So if Koresh really wanted to kill children

 I\ve asked your god several times with all my heart to come to me.  I really wish I could believe in him \cos no matter how much confidence I build up on my own the universe *is* a big place and it would be so nice to know I have someone watching over me in it...  I\ve gone into this with an open mind.  I\ve layed my beliefs aside from time to time when I\ve had doubt and I\ve prayed to see what good that would do.  I don\t see what more I can do to open myself to your god short of just deciding to believe for no good reason.  And if I decide to believe for no good reason why not believe in some other god?  Zeus seems like a pretty cool candidate...  All I know is that in all my searching even though I\ve set aside my pride and decided that I want to know the truth no matter how difficult it may be to accept I have never had any encounter with any deity
   Dr. Tahir Ijaz comments on Esam Abdel-Rahem\s statement:    Mr. Jawad Ali then comments on Tahir Ijaz\s statement:    The converse would be that the problem is that Muslims dont consider Ahmadies to be Muslims  Which is a wrong statement. In the light of Dr. Ijaz\s statement the above statement should be corrected: .......................................is that (some) non-Ahmadi Muslims don\t consider Ahmadi-Muslims as Muslims  So the problem does not get solved:-) Who is a muslims and who is not? Humans cannot decide. Humans may not declare others faiths. Its that  simple. I don\t understand why the mere use of the word ISLAM is becomming such a big issue. I have seen numorous postings on the net on this subject and all they say No NO you cannot use ISLAM as  the name of your newsgroup. ??   I haven\t seen a single posting stating what right do they have in declaring the name of other\s faiths? Who gives them this authority? Quran? or Hadith? or something else? I want to know this!   Just a small reminder to all my Muslim Brothers Did _EVER_ the  Holy Prophet of Islam (Muhammad PBUH) say to anyone who called himself a Muslim:  No You are not a Muslim ! ???????  NEVER! I challenge all my Muslim brothers to produce a single  such evidence from the history of Islam!  Hence if the Prophet Muhammad could never do that to anyone how could the Muslims Mullahs or even Governments of today do it to anyone. Do you consider yourself above the Holy Prophet  Muhammad (PBUH) ??    Sincerely
 \tTake a second look at non-toxic non-flammable:  \t\tMACE (sold tothe public) is supposedly nontoxic. \t\tWhatthey do not tell you is that if you get mace directly \t\ton the linings of the lungs (such as a direct snort to \t\tthe face) above certain quantities it reacts similarly \t\tto a mustard gas inhalation.  \t\t\tI know:  my father and grandfather were exposed \t\t\tto poison gas in WWI and WWII; Dad went through \t\t\tthe side effects of any WEAPON including those \t\t\tnon-toxic aerosols.  \t\tWHat the label ACTUALLY means is ::  \t\t\tusually it wont kill you \t\t\tit may give you permanent CSS asthsma \t\t\tbut that\s better than blowing a hole in your \t\t\t\thead ...  \t\tALL aerosols are flammable IF YOU HAVE ENOUGH OXYGEN \t\tAND HIT IT WITH THE RIGHT IGNITER.  SOme of the most \t\tnon-flammable substances known will BOOM or SEARFLAME \t\tif you hit it with the right combo.   \t\tLet\s take one:  a trash can fire.  Makes black smoke; \t\talready burned right?  Can\t go boom right?  Wrong.  \t\tSuck that smoke (made up of paper that has carbonized \t\tor burned about 35\% of the fuel in it) into an air \t\tconditioning return mix with about 5:1 air and light \t\ta match.  200 feet of conduit is about the same when \t\tfilled with that smoke mixture as oh say 200 pounds TNT  \t\t\tTHAT is why the fire codes say NO OPEN CEILING \t\t\tTILES IN BUILDINGS.  Because 3-5 stories of \t\t\ta building have blown OUT by nonflammable _smoke_  \tSo: \t\tTake a little nonflammable aerosol \t\tMix with gasoline or kerosene fumes  \t\t\tNO electricity remeber?  A bit of heating \t\t\ton the WACO plains?  Boil water to drink \t\t\tsince the water was cut off?  \t\tliberally mix and allow to settle for 1-4 hours  \t\tFumes vent down into the bus underground and the Davidians \t\tmove the children UPSTAIRS to a saferoom (they had one \t\tarmor plated remember?) to BREATH because kids get sick \t\tand die from tear gas.  \t\tand along comes a tracer a spark
 Mr. Meritt please state explicitly the inductive argument which leads you to conclude Mr. Tice thinks it OK to take biblical quotes out of context in some other t.r.m. articles.  Also please explain why you rely on inductive reasoning (with its implicit uncertainty) in determining Mr. Tice\s opinions when the man is himself clearly available for questioning.  Finally
On 15 Apr 1993 22:34:40 GMT Eric Sieferman observed:  : Christian:  washed in the blood of the lamb. : Mithraist:  washed in the blood of the bull.  : If anyone in .netland is in the process of devising a new religion : do not use the lamb or the bull because they have already been : reserved.  Please choose another animal
   Sorry but yes he does by your own description.   Humorous this notion of an all-knowing all-powerful god who must attempt to reconcile with his lowly creations.  I realize that it is not possible to penetrate such logic but is there any chance that you might consider that an omnipotent god need not attempt anything and further that an attempt to reconcile implies a lack of omniscience?  What you are doing here is projecting human weaknesses onto your god.    But all humans are sinners thus all pre-Jesus humans should have been punished with death.  We aren\t punished with sin now of course because God has changed.  He required a brutal sadistic sacrifice of his own blood in order to allow us to sin without immediate death.     Yet he does so now.  He has changed.  The sadistic murder of his own son has made him more tolerant of our sins.  Besides his midst is everywhere so your statement is meaningless. He tolerates sin in Hell which surely is in his midst as well.  Also given that he is all-knowing he must have eternal knowledge of who will commit which sins as well as when and where so what does tolerance have to do with anything.  All of this is absolute nonsense unless your god is not indeed all-knowing and all-powerful or unless he doesn\t take the personal interest in everyday affairs that you claim.   Not relevant.  The claim of kindness and lovingness was made by you in reference to your god.  The nature of his creations/victims is not at issue.   I see: an all-knowing god who did not know what the ultimate outcome would be and an all-powerful god who had no choice in the matter. Mindmush.   Did I miss something?  Did you give some indication at to why a KIND and LOVING god should require sadistic human sacrifice to allow his own botched creations to achieve salvation?     I note that your answer physically follows my question but I fail to discern a connection between the two.  By the way for what am I being consoled?    Why not?  By the way I note for the record that you didn\t answer the questions.    Death and/or eternal damnation is your idea of correctional punishment?  I hope you aren\t a parent.   This is quite an elaborate fantasy that you\ve constructed but sadly it lacks a basis in reality.  It also does not address the questions that I raised.   The god that you describe is not a good parent but a tyrant.   Sorry was that the god of the Bible whose rules I am to follow or the god of the Koran?  The Vedas?  The Book of Koresh?  Oh yes
   Nut or not he was clearly a liar.  He said he would surrender after   local radio stations broadcast his message but he didn\t.  Then he   said he would surrender after Passover but he didn\t.    None of which excuses the gross incompetence and disregard for the   safety of the children displayed by the feds.   As someone else   pointed out
Hello Ceci:       My name is Tony and I have a few comments on your rosicrucian adventure. I hereby state that I am not claiming or denying membership in any Order fraternity etc. with or without the word Rosicrucian in the  name of the organization. I only claim having done some homework :-)       This is intended as a friendly article and if at times it seems different it\s my lack of writing skills showing nothing else. Heck English may be my second language! (And then again maybe not by now :-)       I proceed:      Let\s start with the name Rosicrucian. I took me a long time to come to the conclusion that there is a difference between a *member* of a rosicrucian body and BEING *a* ROSICRUCIAN. So when you say that you met some \rosicrucians\ you mean members of a group that calls themselves rosicrucian. At least that is what your observation suggests :-)       I\d prefer if you would have stated up front that it was the Lectorium Rosicrucianum only because they may be confused by some readers of this newsgroup with the Rosicrucian Order AMORC based (the USA Jurisdiction) in San Jose CA; this being the RC org with the most members (last time I looked). Of course most members does not *necessarily* mean best.       Anyway the Lectorium Rosicrucianum claims they descend (at least in part) from what was the Gold-und-Rosenkreuz (Golden and Rosy Cross) from the 18th century. There were two Golden and Rosy Cross the first (chronologically) more alchemical the second with Masonic tinges but their history is the subject of a complete chapter :-).       You\ll have to trust me when I tell you that if that lecture/class/whatever had been presented by AMORC it is unlikely that you would have had the same impression i.e. you\d probably have had a positive impression more likely than a negative one IMHO.        Again instead of R:s it should be Lectorium Rosicrucianum :-). It is curious to know that 3 other RC \orders\ (in the USA) claim to be *non- sectarian*.       The Cathars were a \heretic\ christian sect that directly challenged the \authority\ of the medieval catholic church. They flourished during the 12th century century which saw the religious zeal expressed in the crusades and also the growing disillusion with the catholic church and the worldly ways of its clerics. It was largely in response to the church\s unseemly pomp and splendor that Catharism took root first in northern Italy then throughout the south of France.         I don\t see nothing *fundamentally* wrong with us containing something divine... And yes I don\t like phrases like eternal bliss either! :-)       For a moment I thought you were referring to Madison Ave :-) (Madison avenue in New York City is where the most influential (read $$$) *commercial* advertising is produced here in the USA :-)  Peace
 Very well put.  And in the case of someone who calls himself a Christian brother yet continues in his sin (and claims that his sin is not a sin at  all but perfectly acceptable) what should be done?  Should Christians  just ignore a sinful lifestyle in order to not offend the person?  By  reaffirming that the lifestyle is sinful according to the Bible are  they using a bullwhip to drive people from Jesus?   Frankly
  This is not correct.  The event horizon is not the center of the black hole but merely the distance at which the escape velocity is equal to the speed of light.  That is
 And does it not say in scripture that no man knows the hour of His coming not even the angels in Heaven but only the Father Himself?  DK was trying to play God by breaking the seals himself.  DK killed himself and as many of his followers as he could.  BTW God did save the children.  They are in Heaven a far better place.  How do I know?  By faith.  God be with you

     The problem is your use of the word objective along with values. Both definitions three and four are inherently subjective that is they are particular to a given individual or personal. You see what one person may see as worthwhile another may see as worthless.   Again your form of measurement in this sentence that being of worth is subjective.     When I find that my usage of a word is different than the usage of that word given by another person I try to find a standard against which to judge that usage. In most cases the dictionary is the standard I use. Here is a definiton of objective:  objective ADJ. 1. Of or having to do with a material object as  distinguished from a mental concept. 2. Having actual existance. 3.a. Unenfluenced by emotion or personal prejudice. b. Based on observable phenomenon.  By this definition science does not have an objective worth since the phrase objective worth is an oxymoron. However you asked something a  little differently this time you asked for an objective basis for a notion. The fact that the use of science as an intellectual tool is responsible for changes in our world (the changes are material and thus objective) would provide an objective _basis_ for an argument. However the conclusion arrived at from that argument (that science is  good) is subjective.  I think that the problem here is one of word usage. Take a little time and read the definitions of these words: objective subjective worth value morality good evil. I believe that if you think about the  meaning of them for a while
 No.  There are two problems here:  (1) Peter died two millenia ago.  The original letters he wrote have long since decayed into dust.  If he were alive today and I could question him then this might lend credibility to your claims (but probably not much because after all I\ve heard people claim with all sincerity that they\ve spoken with Elvis recently).  But after his death Peter\s writings were transcribed by monks for centuries and I find it hard to believe that one of them somewhere didn\t decide to change the wording of something to make it (in his opinion) a little easier to understand.  (2) Even if Peter did witness the miracles of Jesus two millenia ago that doesn\t mean that your deity is what the Bible says it is (God might just be Satan trying to convince everyone that he\s a nice guy) or even that your deity is still alive and active in the world today.  Nice try but it just isn\t enough to convince me
   Thanks for the etymology lesson but I actually know what orthodox means. You\re avoiding my question however which was: From what body of theology does your version of orthodoxy come?  You seem to simply be saying that whatever *you* understand the Bible to say is orthodox.     You are obviously mistaken since many many people have read the Bible and many do not agree with you on this point.  Once again Robert is your interpretation the only correct or orthodox one?       This whole string began as a response to your attacks on Mormonism; no one is attacking your personal beliefs only your tendency to present them as orthodoxy.  I don\t much care *what* you believe about the Bible; just don\t present you personal understanding as the only orthodox one.      I have never attacked your specific beliefs -- that\s *your* approach remember?     Stating that other people who depend solely on the Bible have other views is indeed proof that the Bible can be interpreted many ways which has been my whole point all along.  The specifics of your belief are your business; just don\t pretend that they are anything more than your personal intepretation
  No matter how absurd it is to suggest that a common moral system created by mankind is absolute it is not contrary to reason to suggest that a common moral system created by mankind is sensible. In fact for the Bible to be of any use to mankind as a moral code it must be interpreted by mankind and a workable moral system created for everyday use.  The Jewish Talmud is the result of centuries of Biblical scholars analysing every word of the Torah to understand the morality behind it. The Children of Israel were given a very strict set of Moral Civil Judicial and Ceremonial Laws to follow and yet this was clearly not enough to cover every instance of moral dilemma in their Society. For a Christian the situation is no better.  It seems to me that the only code of morality that we have from the Judeo- Christian God is that which is contained in the Bible (which we can see from the diverse opinions in the Christian newsgroups is not clear). There may well be an absolute morality defined by the Judeo-Christian God for mankind to follow but it seems that we only have a subset simply because the concept was written down by man.  This leads to the problem of defining morality for our society. If we take the divine Morality then we have a code of practice which may be interpreted in many different ways (as an example consider the immolation of heretics in the fifteenth century and the interpretation of the Bible which allows a man to do that to another man under the precept to administer Justice). If we take an agnostic Morality then we have a code of practice that can be modified to suit society (with all the danger that this implies). Alternatively we could take the basis of the Judeo-Christian morality and interpret/extend this to create and justify a code of morality which suits the society we live in and enables the people to live Righteously (as many Christian and Non-Christian philosophers have done).  Whatever the driving force behind the definition of morality for our society
I responded to Jim\s other articles today but I see that I neglected to respond to this one.  I wouldn\t want him to think me a hypocrite for not responding to *every* stupid article on t.r.m.  [dictionary definitions of not disagree and agree deleted]  Oh but I\m weary of trying to wade through Jim\s repertoire of  red herrings and smoke screens.  Let\s see what we get when we run all four articles posted by Jim today through the \discord\ filter (a Markov chain program that Steve Lamont was kind enough to send me):  \tTaking action? A white geese be held \tas an accomplice to be held as \ta decision upon the door \tA black and white goose waddles past \tthe eyes of the door.  \tHits it with the confidence interval for  \tthat individual is held responsible  \tfor that that individual  \tmay be held as a  \tgetaway car may be held  \tas an uncountably large number  \tof the driver of something  \tand agree.  \tA black goose  \twaddles past the person imprisoned?  \tWhite goose waddles past the  \tconfidence interval for the population  \tof geese be axed  \tfine. \tAnd white goose  \twaddles past the door.  Does running Jim\s articles through \discord\ make them more coherent?  Less coherent?  Or has \discord\ turned Jim\s articles into an angst-ridden poem about making choices in a world filled with uncertainty yet being held responsible for the choices we make?  Do the geese symbolize an inner frustration with ambiguity a desire that everything be black and white with no shades of gray?  Does the getaway car tell us that to try to renounce the existential nature of our being is not to get away from responsibility for our actions but rather to take the role of the passive accomplice the driver of the getaway car as it were?  Does the juxtaposition of man and machine car and driver
  Brian K. I am pleased with your honesty.  And to be honest as well I believe you have not asked my god to come to you.  Why do I say this? Because by the things you write on the net and the manner with which you write them you show me that you made up your own god and are attempting to pass him off as the real thing.  I got news for you. Yours doesn\t at all sound like mine.  Your god doesn\t come to you because your god doesn\t exist.   I am sorry Brian but when I read your postings I do not see an open mind. What I do see is misunderstanding lack of knowledge arrogance and mockery.   Be true to yourself then.  Have an open mind.  And so end the mockery.  Gain  knowledge of the real God.  Put your presumptions aside.  Read the Bible and know that there is truly is a reason for everything and there exists a God that has so much love for you that the depth of it goes beyond our shallow worldly experience.  A person who commits himself   to seeking God will find God.  Jesus stands at your door and knocks.  But a person who half-heartedly opens the Bible or opens it with purpose to find  something to mock will find learn and see nothing.  The only thing one will gain with that attitude is folly.  Be careful to not jump the gun for at first glance there are many passages in the Bible that will seem bizarre and absurd.  Be assured that even though they seem alien at first be confident that they are not. Be assured that beyond your present comprehension there lies such deep reasons that once you see them you will indeed be satisfied.  I will personally guarantee that one.  As Jesus put it You will never be thirsty again.  Your cup will even flow over.   From King Solomon (970 B.C. to 930 B.C.):      It is the glory of God to conceal a matter;      to search out a matter is the glory of kings.   Jesus says in John 6:44 & 55:     No one can come to me unless the Father who sent me draws him.   And in John 3:16:     For God so loved the world that he gave his one and only Son    that whosoever believes in him shall not perish but have eternal    life.   You are included in whosoever.  And I also pray that the Father is drawing you which it seems He is doing else you wouldn\t be posting to talk.religion.misc.  Remember Brian you could be a St. Paul in the making.  Paul not only mocked Christians as you do but also had pleasure stoning them.  Yet God showed him mercy saved him and Paul became on of the most celebrated men in the history of God\s church.  You see Brian I myself better be careful and not judge you because you could indeed be the next Paul.  For with the fervor that you attack Christians  one day you might find yourself one and like Paul proclaim the good news of Jesus with that very same fervor or more.  Or you could be the next Peter.  What Jesus said to Peter Jesus would  probably say to you: Satan would surely like to have you.  Why so? Because Peter was hard-headed cynical and demonstrated great moments of stupidity
 ->I addressed most of the key issues in this very long (284 lines) post ->by Dean Kaflowitz in two posts yesterday.  The first was made into the ->title post of a new thread Is Dean Kaflowitz terminally irony-impaired? ->and the second more serious one appeared along the thread ->A Chaney Post and a Challenge
Yes that\s true but you have to be clear exactly what is an uninterpreted observation. It\s pretty low level stuff. \The sun shines\ is already a LOT higher level than that. We can agree that \I perceive brightness\ perhaps.  Huh? What do you mean \all in the same situation?\ Let\s take me and Dennis Kriz as examples. We\re in pretty different situations but I think we can agree as to whether it\s day or night. I don\t think we can agree as to whether or not abortion is morally acceptable. Yet we are certainly in the same difference of situations with respect to each other. Looks like weasel-words to me Frank.   That\s up to you I guess.  This \different situations\ stuff is pretty confusing
 1) Well Mr Koresh allowed other children and adults to leave the compound during the course of the siege; why didnt these children leave then? I dont know myself and certainly havent heard any answers on this here.  2) Yes one simple non-action ie NOT attacking the compound with modified tanks would have prevented this tragedy. I bet you blamed the MOVE people for the deaths that occurred in adjacent row houses in Philadelphia not the government which dropped the firebomb
THE DIVINE MASTERS                              Most Christians would agree and correctly so that            Jesus Christ was a Divine Master and a projection of God            into the physical world God Incarnate.                            But there are some very important related facts that            Christians are COMPLETELY IGNORANT of as are followers of            most other world religions.                             First Jesus Christ was NOT unique John 3:16 NOTWITH-           STANDING.  There is ALWAYS at least one such Divine Master            (God Incarnate) PHYSICALLY ALIVE in this world AT ALL TIMES            a continuous succession THROUGHOUT HISTORY both before and            after the life of Jesus.                      The followers of some of these Masters founded the            world\s major religions usually PERVERTING the teachings of            their Master in the process.  Christians for example added            THREATS of ETERNAL DAMNATION in Hell and DELETED the            teaching of REincarnation.                         Secondly and more importantly after a particular            Master physically dies and leaves this world there is            NOTHING that He can do for ANYbody except for the relatively            few people that He INITIATED while He was still PHYSICALLY            alive.  (THAT IS SIMPLY THE WAY GOD SET THINGS UP IN THE            UNIVERSES.)                                              Therefore all those Christians who worship Jesus and            pray to Jesus and expect Jesus to return and save them from            their sins are only KIDDING THEMSELVES and have allowed            themselves to be DUPED by a religion that was mostly            MANUFACTURED by the Romans.                        And emotional feelings are a TOTALLY DECEIVING            indicator for religious validity.                      These things are similarly true for followers of most            other major world religions including Islam.                       Thirdly the primary function of each Master is to tune            His Initiates into the AUDIBLE LIFE STREAM or SOUND            CURRENT (referred to as THE WORD in John 1:1-5 and as            The River of Life in Revelation 22:1) and to personally            guide each of them thru the upper levels of Heaven while they            are still connected to their living physical bodies by a            silver cord.                      True Salvation which completes a Soul\s cycles of            REincarnation in the physical and psychic planes is achieved            only by reaching at least the SOUL PLANE which is five            levels or universes above the physical universe and this            canNOT be done without the help of a PHYSICALLY-Living Divine            Master.                      One such Divine Master alive today is an American Sri            Harold Klemp the Living Eck Master or Mahanta for the            Eckankar organization now headquartered in Minneapolis            (P.O. Box 27300;  zip 55427).                      Another Divine Master is Maharaj Gurinder Singh Ji now            living in Punjab India and is associated with the Sant            Mat organization.                        One of the classic books on this subject is THE PATH OF            THE MASTERS (Radha Soami Books P.O. Box 242 Gardena CA             90247) written in 1939 by Dr. Julian Johnson a theologian            and surgeon who spent the last years of his life in India            studying under and closely observing the Sant Mat Master of            that time Maharaj Sawan Singh Ji.                      Several of the Eckankar books including some authored            by Sri Paul Twitchell or Sri Harold Klemp can be found in            most public and university libraries and some book stores or            obtained thru inter-library loan.  The book ECKANKAR--THE            KEY TO SECRET WORLDS by Sri Paul Twitchell is ANOTHER            classic.                      Many Christians are likely to confuse the Masters with            the Anti-Christ which is or was to be a temporary world            dictator during the so-called last days.  But the Masters            don\t ever rule even when asked or expected to do so as            Jesus was.                      People who continue following Christianity Islam or            other orthodox religions with a physically-DEAD Master will            CONTINUE on their cycles of REincarnation between the            Psychic Planes and this MISERABLE physical world until they            finally accept Initiation from a PHYSICALLY-LIVING Divine            Master.                                 RE-INCARNATION                           The book HERE AND HEREAFTER by Ruth Montgomery            describes several kinds of evidence supporting REincarnation            as a FACT OF LIFE including HYPNOTIC REGRESSIONS to past            lives [about 50\% accurate; the subconscious mind sometimes            makes things up especially with a bad hypnotist]            SPONTANEOUS RECALL (especially by young children some of            whom can identify their most recent previous relatives            homes possessions etc.) DREAM RECALL of past life experi-           ences DEJA VU (familiarity with a far off land while travel-           ing there for the first time on vacation) the psychic read-           ings of the late EDGAR CAYCE and EVEN SUPPORTING STATEMENTS            FROM THE CHRISTIAN BIBLE including Matthew 17:11-13 (John the            Baptist was the REINCARNATION of Elias.) and John 9:1-2 (How            can a person POSSIBLY sin before he is born unless he LIVED            BEFORE?!).  [ ALWAYS use the KING JAMES VERSION.  Later            versions are PER-VERSIONS! ]                            Strong INTERESTS innate TALENTS strong PHOBIAS etc.            typically originate from a person\s PAST LIVES.  For example            a strong fear of swimming in or traveling over water usually            results from having DROWNED at the end of a PREVIOUS LIFE.             And sometimes a person will take AN IMMEDIATE DISLIKE to            another person being met for the first time in THIS life            because of a bad encounter with him during a PREVIOUS            INCARNATION.                  The teaching of REincarnation also includes the LAW OF            KARMA (Galatians 6:7 Revelation 13:10 etc.).  People would            behave much better toward each other if they knew that their            actions in the present will surely be reaped by them in the            future or in a FUTURE INCARNATION!               2nd COMINGS                 If a Divine Master physically dies (translates)            before a particular Initiate of His does then when that            Initiate physically dies (translates) the Master will meet            him on the Astral level and take him directly to the Soul            Plane.  This is the ONE AND ONLY correct meaning of a 2nd            Coming.  It is an INDIVIDUAL experience NOT something that            happens for everyone all at once.  People who are still            waiting for Jesus\ 2nd Coming are WAITING IN VAIN.                                       PLANES OF EXISTENCE                 The physical universe is the LOWEST of at least a DOZEN            major levels of existence.  Above the Physical Plane is the            Astral Plane the Causal Plane the Mental Plane the Etheric            Plane (often counted as the upper part of the Mental Plane)            the Soul Plane and several higher Spiritual Planes.  The            Soul Plane is the FIRST TRUE HEAVEN (counting upward from            the Physical).  The planes between (but NOT including) the            Physical and Soul Planes are called the Psychic Planes.                      It is likely that ESP telepathy astrological            influences radionic effects biological transmutations [See            the 1972 book with that title.] and other phenomena without            an apparent physical origin result from INTERACTIONS between            the Psychic Planes and the Physical Plane.                      The major planes are also SUB-DIVIDED.  For example a            sub-plane of the Astral Plane is called Hades and the            Christian Hell occupies a SMALL part of it created there            LESS THAN 2000 YEARS AGO by the EARLY CATHOLIC CHURCH by some            kind of black magic or by simply teaching its existence in a            THREATENING manner.  The Christian Heaven is located            elsewhere on the Astral Plane.  Good Christians will go there            for a short while and then REincarnate back to Earth.                                             SOUND CURRENT vs. BLIND FAITH                 The Christian religion demands of its followers an            extraordinary amount of BLIND FAITH backed up by little more            than GOOD FEELING (which is TOTALLY DECEIVING).                         If a person is not HEARING some form of the SOUND            CURRENT (THE WORD THE BANI THE AUDIBLE LIFE STREAM)            then his cycles of REINCARNATION in this MISERABLE world WILL            CONTINUE.                      The SOUND CURRENT manifests differently for different            Initiates and can sound like a rushing wind ocean waves on            the sea shore buzzing bees higher-pitched buzzing sound a            flute various heavenly music or other sounds.  In Eckankar            Members start hearing it near the end of their first year as            a Member.  This and other experiences (such as SOUL TRAVEL)            REPLACE blind faith.                        For more information answers to your questions etc.            please consult my CITED SOURCES (3 books
:  : I am a Mormon.  I believe in Christ that he is alive.  He raised himself : [Text deleted] : : I learned that the concept of the Holy Trinity was never taught by Jesus : Christ that it was agreed to by a council of clergymen long after Christ : was ascended men who had no authority to speak for him. : If Jesus never taught the concept of the Trinity how do you deal with the  following:        Mat 28 18 Then Jesus came to them and said All authority in heaven    and on earth has been given to me.     Mat 28 19 Therefore go and make disciples of all nations baptizing    them in the name of the Father and of the Son and of the Holy Spirit     Mat 28 20 and teaching them to obey everything I have commanded you.    And surely I am with you always to the very end of the age.   Also Jesus speaking:     Act 1 5 For John baptized with water but in a few days you will    be baptized with the Holy Spirit.  I believe that you may have overlooked some key verses
  Because that would contradict your religious beliefs; therefore you feel more comfortable simply accusing his sincerity
 Stop! Hold it! You have a few problems here. Official history says that  the first accusations of homosexuality in the SA came from OUTSIDE of the Nazi  party long BEFORE the Nazis ever came to power. So this objection is a red herring even if established history is wrong on this point. Moreover none of  the histories I\ve read ever made mention of Hitler or anyone else ever using  homosexuality as a pretext for purging Roehm. A point I saw reiterated was that Hitler and the party covered up these accusations. If you are going to accuse official history of being a fabrication you should at least get your facts right. The pretext for purging Roehm was that he was planning to use the SA in a coup against Hitler. Nowhere is there mention of using allegations of homosexuality as a pretext for the purge nor as a justification afterwards (it is possible that the histories I\ve read have not mentioned this but I doubt it - would it be in Hitler\s best interest to admit to the world that his former right hand man was a homosexual?).   Anyway as I said before it is always possible that I have missed references  to the Nazis making use of charges of homosexuality against the SA after the  night of the long knives - but this does not prove that they were false. Even  the Nazis could tell the truth when it was to their advantage. In any case  this does not deal with accusations of homosexuality in the SA during the  1920\s.   Ah yes. I forgot this was being posted to alt.conspiracy. I can smell the paranoia from here. Since the Nazis never officially charged Roehm with  homosexuality (at least not according to what I\ve read) I\d like to know  what tainted evidence you are talking about. Since the accusations were made  by persons outside of the Nazi party long before it came to power and those  accusations were common knowledge to journalists and others in Germany in the  1920\s and 30\s just how would it be possible for the Nazis to go back in  time and plant tainted evidence? How exactly does one doctor newspapers  which were circulated around the world without the discrepancies being  obvious? What actual incidences of Nazi doctoring evidence on this matter do you know about? And what about the testimony of people who were involved in  these matters some of whom were not Nazis? And what is the point of making a  false accusation of homosexuality if you do not publicize it? Since the point  here seems to be to discredit established history then the burden of proof  falls on the revisionist. The revisionists had better do their homework  before making accusations. Otherwise they simply look like conspiracy nuts.   This is just about the *only* thing we agree on.   I suspect that the notion that there might have been bad people - Roehm and  his SA buddies - who were homosexuals must disturb some people. The feeling seems to be that if a nasty individual is accused of homosexuality that this must be an attempt to bash homosexuals. This fear - often justified - is what lies behind this distrust of official history or so it seems to me. But this is not a good justification for trashing accepted accounts of this subject. If  you really think that historians are so incompetent why don\t you write them  and ask where they got their sources on this subject if you can\t tell from  their footnotes? I\m a graduate student in history. Writing to professors and tracking down sources is old hat. But my time is limited and this is not my specialty - and neither you nor anyone else have said anything that would cast one shred of doubt on existing evidence. I\m not going to waste my time trying to debunk someone\s paranoia. Do the research yourself.   Given that you already consider all evidence tainted what on earth would constitute concrete particulars? And since when have concrete particulars been considered shrewd guesses?  I suggest that those who do not trust popular historians (Irving et al) - historians writing for a popular audience do not as a rule provide copious  footnotes - should try instead reading academic historians
    [...]   I think you are mistaken in thinking Tom Scharle to be a atheist. You will find both atheists and Christians among your opponents on t.o. Calling your opponents them Branch Athiests zealots does nothing for your credibility.   Oh yes do.    Dear me. This is taken _so_ out of context that it\s hard to know where to start... The quote starts with material from p 78 and ends with material from page 81!  On page 78 there\s the bit that says (the parts left out in John King\s quote are marked by <>): <...> the doubt that has infiltrated the previous smugly confident certitude of evolutionary biology<\s last twenty years> has inflamed passions <and provoked some very interesting thought and research>.  Eldridge goes on immediately following the butchered quote: In short evolutionary biology has entered a phase of creativity that is the hallmark of good active science.  The material that is on page 81 that is quoted by John King has been butchered even more severely:  <I mention this only to illustrate the> **There is**[these words not in the original text-prl] lack of agreement even within warring camps <: things are really in uproar these days and each of the basic ways of looking at evolutionary biology has its minor variants.> Sometimes it seems as if there are as many variations on each evolutionary theme as there are individual biologists.  Eldridge goes on: But that\s the way it should be; this is how science is supposed to operate.   And just a few sentences down:  When they [creationists] misrepresent the exuberant creative doubt and controversy permeating evolutionary biology these days they are actively promoting scientific illiteracy.  And that John E. King
(hudson) (me)  /(hudson) /So. Why is someone elses will such a big deal if morality is all relative.   I don\t believe I ever said that morality was all relative.  What I said was that I can make my mind up on my own thank you and that  you don\t have the right to tell others what to think.  I think that you will find that in most moral systems there is  a respect for human life and the dignity of the person.  It is all the stuff besides these points that forms the core of the disagreement between  primitive moral absolutists like yourself and the rest of us.    /(hudson) /Maybe (the insane lover of pain might reason) if other people experienced /enough pain they might learn to enjoy it too.    Fine.  There is still the clinical definition of crazy.  And this also involves a violation of free will because the insane lover of your little example would be inflicting pain on a non-willing subject.  Try again.     (hudson) (me)  /(hudson) /You have to have some sort of premise about choice or self-awareness.   No
 I would just go fetch my parents and show them to you and thereby prove quite definitively that my mother is not named Merlyn she is not nine feet tall and my father is quite alive.  Then I would assert quite simply that your deity does not exist
 I became aware of the claim years ago.  So I decided to check it out on my own.  But then that was in BN times (Before Net).  So here are some  references.  See Robin Lane Fox\s _The unauthorized version_ (p.284) where  Lane Fox writes ... the one passage which appears to [comment on Jesus\  career] is agreed to be a Christian addition.  In my Re:Albert Sabin response (C5u7sJ.391@sunfish.usd.edu) to Jim Lippard (21 April 93) I noted that consensus is typically indicated subtly as in Elaine  Pagel\s _The gnostic gospels_ (p.85) to wit:  A comment *attributed* to Josephus reports ... [emphasis mine].  Scholars sometimes do not even mention the two Josephus entries another subtlety reflecting consensus.  So far as I can deduce today\s consensus is built on at least three things:  1) the long passage is way out of context 2) Origen did not know about the long passage and 3) the short and long passages are contradictory.  I don\t know the references wherein the arguments which led to consensus are orginally developed (does anyone?).  Biblical scholars as I defined them include theologians and historians.  The former like the latter incorporate historical social technological and ideological contexts as well as theology.  So the distinction is blurred.  I  didn\t elaborate on that.  Sorry.  (In turn historians are compelled to incorporate theology).  Can\t say about the number of copies.  These were however BG times (Before  Gutenburg).  A hundred first editions seems exceedingly high; counting on one  hand seems more reasonable.  Perhaps those mss. without the long insert (if any because anything is possible) have been destroyed.  Such a practice is  certainly not foreign to religions.  Anyway
  How do you know? Were you there?  While obviously Koresh was a nut case the (typical) inability of the government/media to get its story straight is quite disturbing. On tuesday night NBC news reported that the FBI did not know the place was burning down until they saw black smoke billowing from the building. The next day FBI agents were insisting that they saw Davidians setting the fire. The FBI was also adamantly denying that it was possible their battery of the compound\s wallks could have accidentally set the blaze
 If anyone is interested in the history of AMORC I do think Spencer Lewis published books about the beginning and his mission. The  Alexandria bookstore (that\s the name of the book store operated  by AMORC) should have a selection that should provide the interested reader more insight).   Cheers
[...lots of stuff about intellectual errors deleted...]  This is cute but I see no statement telling me why your church is the true  church. I do presume that you know or at least believe that yours is true.  Attempting to ream my faith without replacing it with something better is  a real good way to loose a person completely from Christ.  This is the greatest reason I see that these attacks are not motivated by  love. They only seek to destroy there is no building or replacing of belief.  This is not something Christ did. He guided and instructed He didn\t  seek to destroy the faith He found
Deuteronmy 20:13 And when the Lord thy God hath delivered it into thine hands thou shalt smite every male thereof with the edge of the sword  Joshua 6:21 And they utterly destroyed all that was in the city bith man and women young and old and ox and sheep and ass
 Let\s see if Alexander destroyed Tyre and people move back and they construct houses and after a while 14000 people live there and still call it Tyre it is not considered to be rebuilt. Instead it\s considered to be \just-some-people-that-got-together-for-fishing- and-they-needed-houses\ place.   Sigh I was never born in a city then (my home town has 10.000 people). I have to consult my city and inform them that it\s from now a fishing village. When this city (Kristinestad) was founded in the 17:th century about 1000 people lived there so the norms were even more bizarre for dumb Swedish queens who founded cities along the coast of Finland.  I would like to know why Paul thought is was worth mentioning the  small fishing place of Tyre in Acts. Again maybe he was a keen fisherman and wanted to visit the shores of Tyre? :-)  Cheers
}>}>}(a) out of context; }>}>Must have missed when you said this about these other promises of god that we keep }>}>getting subjected to.  Could you please explain why I am wrong and they are OK? }>}>Or an acknowledgement of public hypocrisy. Both or neither. }>} }>}So according to you Jim the only way to criticize one person for }>}taking a quote out of context without being a hypocrite is to post a }>}response to *every* person on t.r.m who takes a quote out of context? }> }>Did I either ask or assert that?  Or is this your misaimed telepathy at work again? } }(1)  Stephen said you took a quote out of context }(2)  You noted that Stephen had not replied to some other t.r.m article }     (call it A) that took a quote out of context }(3)  But the lack of evidence for X does not constitute evidence for the }     lack of X  (a common creationist error) }(4)  So the fact that Stephen did not reply to A does not justify the }     conclusion that Stephen condoned taking quotes out of context in A  Excellent.  Now under what conditions could such a conclusion be made other than a direct assertion by his part.  For instance am I to assume that you have no position on eating shit merely because you have not said your position or might a conclusion be made by observing that you do not.  }(7)  I assumed you were being logical and that the sentence that begins }     Could you please explain ... was not a nonsequitur but was intended }     to follow from the sentence that preceded it.  }Is that better Jim?   It\s called an argument.  If you disagree with it }explain why the argument is not sound.  (I admit that my assumption in (7) }may have been a bit hasty.)  If you agree with it
#     Are there any places in the Bible where the commandment Thou  #     shalt not kill is specifically applied?  That is where someone  #     refrained from killing because he remembered the commandment.    No for the excellent reason that there IS no such commandment.    Aside from that please note that the Abrahamic literary tradition   is strong on narrative light on dialog
Dear Rob   Sometimes I do come across condesending and I am sorry I come across that way at times.  Thank you for the reproach I really do appreciate it.  I\ll try to get better.  Rob at the same time I have also learned that some people respond to the gentle approach while others respond only at a harsh rebuke.  Brian K. so far only responds to the latter.  And I am glad he responds at all.   In both cases of approach  my intention is to be loving.  I am making no excuse for myself if I am coming across condesending.  I apologize for that.  Rob sometimes Brian K. comes across as honest. I know this.  But Brian K.  vasillates back and forth.  One post looks honest; the next is an excuse.  Now he wants me to explain the universe in 50 words or less.   I think Brian Kendig is really trying but he is too comfortable with his set of excuses.    I just want Brian K. to be honest with himself.  If he really wants to know he will ask questions and stop asserting irrelevant excuses which have nothing to do with my God.   I wish Brian would read the Bible for himself and come to his own decisions without being sidetracked with the temptation to mock God.  From my perspective Rob when I look at Brian Kendig I see a man standing out in the middle of a highway.  Off into the distance I  see a Mack truck heading right for him but Brian K. is faced away from the oncoming truck.  He doesn\t see it.   Here\s is how I see the dialog:   Me:  Brian K please step aside before you get run over.   BK:  There is no truck.  Me:  Turn around at look.  BK:  No.  Me:  Look!  You will be healthier if you do take a look at      the oncoming truck.  BK:  No. Explain to me why trucks exist.  Me:  Turn around or you will run over.  BK:  No. I won\t because I like hiking and tomorrow is Tuesday.  Me:  You blind fool!  Why do you choose ignorance? You have nothing       to lose if you look.  But if do not look you will certainly lose your life.       I do not want to see you squashed all over the road.  BK:  It is my life to lose.  I rather not look.       Besides a truck running over me will not harm me.       And by the way I really have an open mind.   So is my motivation to belittle Brian or to love Brian the best I know how?     I do not wish to single Brian Kendig out.  Because millions if not billions of people fall into the same category.  Perhaps all people fall have fallen into this category at one time in their lives.  I have. I can now see the truck behind Brian.  My hope is that Brian will look and will see the ramifications of the truck coming towards him.  My hope is that Brian will want to step out of the way.  My fear though  is that Brian will instead choose to glue himself to the middle of the highway where he will certainly get run over.  But if he so chooses he so chooses and there is nothing I can do beyond that to change his mind.   For it is his choice.   But at this very moment Brian hasn\t gotten even that far.  He is still at the point where he does not want to look.  Sure he moves his eyeball to appease me
}For those missing the context of this thrilling discussion between }Jim and I Jim wrote the following to me in e-mail after I pointed out  Hate to shatter your self image of perfection that  you appear to hold but your language is wrong: Jim and me.  }I pointed out that I did in fact agree that both Robert Weiss and }Jim Meritt took quotes out of context.  Hence I find it difficult to }understand why Jim thinks I am a hypocrite.  Needless to say I don\t }have time to reply to *every* article on t.r.m. that takes a quote }out of context.    Of course not - just the ones you disagree with.  Q.E.D.  }>}So according to you Jim the only way to criticize one person for }>}taking a quote out of context without being a hypocrite is to post a }>}response to *every* person on t.r.m who takes a quote out of context? } }Jim replied by saying  }>Did I either ask or assert that? } }But today we find four articles from Jim one of which has the subject  So?  As of then and pointing out a specific instance.  Wrongo again.  }>Is it not the case that in the eyes of the law when someone is aware of }>something and has the capability of taking action and does not that individual }>may be held responsible for that action? } }Which is of course a complete red herring.  Taking quotes out of }context isn\t a crime.  I don\t have time to read every article on }t.r.m. and I\m certainly under no obligation to reply to them all.  So?  Check the newsgroups?  }Does silence is concurrence imply that Jim thinks that because I }didn\t respond to Weiss\ articles I must condone Weiss\ taking quotes }out of context?  Jim doesn\t want to give a direct answer to this }question; read what he has written and decide for yourself.  Telepathy again?  You claim to know what I want.  }But back to the context of my conversation with Jim.  Jim\s next  }gambit was to claim that he was using inductive logic when he }concluded that I was being a hypocrite.  I challenged him to provide }the details of that logic that led him to an incorrect conclusion.  No.  YOu asked specifically what was wrong with yours.  }Today we find another obscure article (posting it twice didn\t help  Maybe to the ignorant.  I accept your classification.  }More red herrings.  Could Jim mean that he has read an uncountably large }number of my articles?    Do you know what uncountably large means?  It does not appear so.  }Could Jim mean that because I axed his articles }but not Weiss\ articles he wants to conclude inductively ... }Well
 Ref: Encyclopedia of Religion Mircea Eliade  MAGI:   [Sneak Preview: Later still eschatology and apocalyptics were a fertile meeting  ground for Iranian and Judeo-Christian religions as can be seen in the famous  _Oracles of Hystaspes_ a work whose Iranian roots are undeniable and which  most likely dates from the beginning of the Christian era probably the  second century CE (Widengren 1968). The Zoroastrian doctrine of the Savior of  the Future (Saoshyant) was the basis for the story of the coming of the Magi  to Bethlehem in the _Gospel of Matthew_ (2:1-12).]    The Old Persian word magu rendered in Greek by magos is of uncertain  etymology. It may originally have meant member of the tribe as in the Avestan compound mogu-tbish (hostile to a member of the tribe). This meaning would have been further resticted among the Medes to member of the priestly tribe and perhaps to priest (Benveniste 1938; Boyce 1982). The term is probably of Median origin given that Herodotus mentions the Magoi as one of the six tribes of the Medes.   For a variety of reasons we can consider the Magi to have been members of a priestly tribe of Median origin in western Iran. Among the Persians they were responsible for liturgical functions as well as for maintaining their knowledge of the holy and the occult. Most likely the supremacy of the Median priesthood in western Iran became established during the time of the Median monarchy that dominated the Persians from the end of the eighth century through the first half of the sixth century BCE until the revolt of Cyrus the Great (550 BCE). The Persians were indebted to the Medes for their political and civil institutions as well. Even if hypotheses have been advanced concerning the existence of Magi of Persian origin in the Achaemenid period (Boyce 1982) we must still maintain that they were of Median origin. This is demonstrated by the eposide of the revolt of Gaumata the Magian mentioned by Darius I (522-486 BCE) in the inscription at Bisutun (Iran) as well as by Greek sources. Indeed Herodotus insists on the idea of the usurpatory power of the Medes against the Persians through the conspiracy of the Magi.   The fact that the Magi may have been members of a tribe that handed down the sacerdotal arts in a hereditary fashion naturally did not exclude the possibility that some of them undertook secular prefessions. This seems to be attested by the Elamite tablets at Persepolis.   There is a theses put forth by Giuseppe Messina that denies that the Magi are members of an ethnic group by suggesting that they are simply members of the priesthood - a priesthood of purely Zoroastrian origin. This thesis is untenable; on the other hand the hypothesis that their name is related to the Avestan term magavan derived from the Gathic maga (Vedic magha gift) is not without foundation (Mole 1963). The meaning of maga can probably be found in conformity with the Pahlavi tradition within the context of the concept of purity or separation of the mixture of the two opposed principles of spirit and matter. The maga which has been erroneously interpreted as chorus from the root mangh which is said to mean sing the magic song (Nyberg 1966) and has been rendered simply by an expression like unio mystica seems to be an ecstatic condition that opens the mind to spiritual vision. In any case though there may be a relation between the Old Persian term magu and the Avestan terms magavan and maga we must maintain a clear distinction between the Magi and the Avestan priesthood. The Avesta ignores the Median or Old Persian term despite a recent hypothesis proposed by H.W. Bailey; Old Persian inscriptions ignore the Avestan term for priest athravan (Vedic athravan) even if this is  perhaps present in an Achaeminid setting in the Elamite tablets of Persepolis  (Gershevitch 1964).   The term magu has been present in Zoroastrianism throughout its history; the Pahlavi terms mogh-mard and mobad represent its continuation. The latter in particular derives from an older form magupati (head of the Magi). During the Sasanid period (third to seventh centuries CE) which saw the formation of a hierarchically organized church the title mobadan mobad (the high priest of high priests) came to be used to designate the summit of the ecclesiastical hierarchy.   The Magi practiced consanguineous marriage or khvaetvadatha (Av.; Pahl. khwedodah). They also performed a characteristic funeral rite: the exposure of the corpse to animals and vultures to remove the flesh and thereby cleanse it. The corpse was not supposed to decompose lest it be contaminated by the demons of putrefaction. This practice later became typical of the entire Zoroastrian community and led to the rise of a complex funeral ritual in Iran and among the Parsis in India. Stone towers known as dakhmas were built especially for this rite. During the time of Herodotus the practice of exposure of the corpse was in vogue only among the Magi; the Persians generally sprinkled the corpse with wax then buried it. The practice was widespread however among the peoples of Central Asia.   The Magi were the technicians of and experts on worship: it was impossible to offer sacrifices without the presence of a Magus. During the performance of a ritual sacrifice the Magus sang of the theogony (the Magi were possibly the custodians of a tradition of sacred poetry but we know nothing about the relationship of this tradition to the various parts of the Avesta) and was called upon to interpret dreams and to divine the future. The Magi were also known for the practice of killing harmful or Ahrimanical animals (khrafstra) such as snakes and ants. They dressed in the Median style wearing pants tunics and coats with sleeves. They wore a characteristic head covering of felt (Gr. tiara) with strips on the sides that could be used to cover the nose and mouth during rituals to avoid contaminating consecrated objects with their breath (Boyce 1982). The color of these caps in conformity with a tradition that is probably of Indo-European origin according to Georges Dumezil was that of the priesthood: white.   In all likelihood during the Achaemenid period the Magi were not in possession of a well-defined body of doctrine and it is probable that they gradually adopted Zoroastrianism; they were most likely a clergy consisting of professional priests who were not tied to a rigid orthodoxy but were naturally inclined to eclecticism and syncretism. Nonetheless they must have been jealous guardians of the patrimony of Zorastrian traditions. By virtue of this they were the educators of the royal princes. The wisest of them was responsible for teaching the prince the magic of Zarathushtra son of Horomazes and thus the cult of the gods. Magi who excelled in other virtues were entrusted with the education of the prince so that he would learn to be just courageous and master of himself.   During the Achaemenid period the Magi maintained a position of great influence although they were certainly subordinate to the emperor. Despite several dramatic events such as the massacre they suffered after the death of Gaumata the Magian - in which according to Herodotus (who calls himself Smerdis) the Persians killed a large number of Magi to avenge the usurpation - the Magi nevertheless managed to maintain their influence at court in Media in Persia and in the various regions of the empire where they were stationed as a consequence of the Persian civilian and military administration.   No priesthood of antiquity was more famous than that of the Magi. They were renowned as followers of Zarathushtra (Zoroaster); as the teachers of some of the greatest Greek thinkers (Pythagoras Democritus Plato); as the wise men who arrived guided by a star at the manger of the newborn savior in Bethlehem; and as the propagators of a cult of the sun in India. But they were also known as the Chaldeans the priesthood of Babylon known for its occultism; this was perhaps the reason that the term magos had a pejorative sense in Greek like goes expert in the magic arts (Bidez and Cumont 1938). Indeed the Chaldeans were experts in all types of magical arts especially astrology and had a reputation for wisdom as well as knowledge.   To understand the reasons for such various and sometimes discordant views it is necessary to distinguish between the Magi of Iran proper and the so-called western Magi who were later hellenized. In the Achaemenid period both must have been at least in part Zoroastrian but the western Magi (those of the Iranian diaspora in Asia Minor Syria Mesopotamia and Armenia) who came in contact with diverse religious traditions must have sooner or later and in varying degrees been influenced by syncretic concepts.   The Greeks were familiar with both kinds of Magi and depending on their varying concerns would emphasize one or the other aspect of them. Classical historians and geographers including Herodotus and Strabo document their customs while the philosophers dwell above all on their doctrines: dualism belief in the hereafter Magian cosmology and cosmogony and their theology and eschatology. Those sources most interested in the doctrines of the Magi even speak of Zarathushtra as a Magus. In doing so they are repeating what the Magi themselves said from the Median and Achaemenid periods when they adopted Zoroastrianism. At that time they embraced Zarathushtra as one of their own and placed themselves under his venerable name.   Zoroastrianism had already undergone several profound transformations in the eastern community by the time of the Acheamenids and was already adapting those elements of the archaic religion that refused to die. It has been said quite often in an attempt to characterize the precise role of the Magi in the Zoroastrian tradition that the Vendidad (from vi-daevo-data the law-abjuring daivas) part of the Avesta should be attributed to them. (This collection of texts from various periods is primarily concerned with purificatory rules and practices.) Nonetheless the hypothesis is hardly plausible since the first chapter of the Vendidad - a list of sixteen lands created by Ahura Mazda the supreme god of Zoroastrianism but contaminated by an attack by Ahriman (Pahl.; Gathic-Avestan Angra Mainyu) the other supreme god and the ultimate source of all evil and suffering - does not mention western Iran Persia or Media (the land of Ragha mentioned in the text cannot be Median Raghiana). Furthermore it has been noted (Gershevitch 1964) that if the authors had been Magi the absence of any reference to western Iranian institutions including their own priesthood would be very strange.   The Magi were above all the means by which the Zoroastrian tradition and the corpus of the Avesta have been transmitted to us from the second half of the first millennium BCE on. This has been their principal merit. We can attribute directly to the Magi the new formulation that Iranian dualism assumed known to us especially from Greek sources and in part from the Pahlavi literature of the ninth and tenth centuries CE. According to this formulation the two poles of the dualism are no longer as in the Gathas Spenta Mainyu (beneficent spirit) and Angra Mainyu (hostile spirit) but Ahura Mazda himself and Angra Mainyu (Gershevitch 1964). [See Ahura Mazda and Angra Mainyu.] This trans- formation was of immense consequence for the historical development of Zoro- astrianism and was most likely determined by the contact of the Magi with the Mesopotamian religious world. In this new dualism - which was that later known to the Greeks (Aristotle Eudemus of Rhodes Theopompus and others) - we can see the affirmation of a new current of thought within Zoroastrianism to which we give the name Zurvanism. [See Zurvanism.]   Thanks to their adherence to Zoroastrianism the Magi played an enormously important role in the transmission of Zarathushtra\s treachings as well as in the definition of the new forms that these would assume historically. Their natural propensity to eclecticism and syncretism also helped the diffusion of Zoroastrian ideas in the communities of the Iranian diaspora. The Greeks began to study their doctrines and to take an interest in them (Xanthus of Lydia Hermodorus Aristotle Theopompus Hermippus Dinon) even writing treatises on the Persian religion of which only the titles and a few fragments have survived. In the Hellenistic period the Magi were seen as a secular school of wisdom and writings on magic astrology and alchemy were lent the authority of such prestigious names as Zarathushtra Ostanes and Hystaspes forming an abundant apocryphal literature. (Bidez and Cumont 1938).   Later still eschatology and apocalyptics were a fertile meeting ground for Iranian and Judeo-Christian religions as can be seen in the famous _Oracles of Hystaspes_ a work whose Iranian roots are undeniable and which most likely dates from the beginning of the Christian era probably the second century CE (Widengren 1968). The Zoroastrian doctrine of the Savior of the Future (Saoshyant) was the basis for the story of the coming of the Magi to Bethlehem in the _Gospel of Matthew_ (2:1-12). [See Saoshyant.]   The Sasanid period saw the Magi once again play a determining role in the religious history of Iran. Concerned to win back the western Magi (de Menasce 1956) and eager to consolidate Zoroastrianism as the national religion of Iran the priests of Iranian sanctuaries in Media and Persia were able to establish a true state church strongly hierarchical and endowed with an orthodoxy based on the formation of a canon of scriptures. The leading figures in the development of a state religion and of Zoroastrian orthodoxy were Tosar and Kerder
   >I recently have become aware that my health insurance includes   >coverage for abortion.  I strongly oppose abortion for reasons of   >conscience.  It disturbs me deeply to know that my premiums may   >be being used to pay for that which I sincerely believe is   >murder.  I would like to request that I be exempted from abortion   >coverage with my health premiums reduced accordingly.  I share Dennis\s outrage over a similar manner.  I have recently become aware that my health insurance includes coverage for illness and injuries suffered by Christians.  It disturbs me deeply to know that my premiums may be used to pay for that which I sincerely believe is divine punishment for their sinful conduct.  In addition these folks are able to avail themselves of such alternative therapies as Lourdes Fatima Morris Cerullo Benny Hinn
I would like to apologize for the typos in the previous post.  In retrospect I would also like to quote another source: Douglas C. Haldeman from his 1991 book _Homosexuality_  THERAPY INEFFECTIVE  Recently the founders of yet another prominent ex-gay ministry Exodus International denounced their conversion therapy procedures as ineffective. Michael Busse and Gary Cooper cofounders of Exodus International and lovers for 13 years were involved with the organization from 1976 to 1979.  The program was described by these men as ineffective . . . not one person was healed.  They stated that the program often exacerbated already prominent feelings of guilt and personal failure among the counselees; many were driven to suicidal thoughts as a result of the failed reparative therapy.  The previous article quoted in the last posting is from THE ADVOCATE June 30 1992 called The Ex-Ex-Gay by Robert Pela.  Some personal thoughts:  It is of no great astonishment that there is a concerted effort by a major portion of the Church to control and mandate change of a minority among its ranks.  This was the momentum behind the Spanish Inquisition only all they required was a confession of faith (after much torture) and then to save their souls they would dispatch them to heaven through death.  Even later the Bible was used vigorously to defend slavery oppression and segragation of African-Americans even to the justification of lynchings. Today\s scholars are just a bit more slick in their approach.  The tool is still coersion but now it is mostly by means of brainwashing and mind control convincing people that they should see themselves as less than God sees them then maintaining a cultic hold on them until it is felt thier mind-conditioning is complete.  Sure no one is physically forced to stay in this reparative therapy but sheer social pressure is enough for many to keep themselves in this new found bondage of self-hate.  As an abolitionist I advocate the abolishment of oppression and persecution against gays in all facets of civil life.  A person should be judged by the contibution or non-contribution to the society in which they live not by some high-brow standard of conformity imposed by those who haven\;t a clue what is in their heart.  For those who seek more information about Gays and groups that accept them please contact your nearest chapter of PFLAG (Parents & Friends of Lesbians And Gays) who will be more than happy to assist you.  This is a group of people comprised of Gays Lesbians and Bisexuals
   Not to worry.  The Masons have been demonized and harrassed by almost  every major Xian church there is.  For centuries now.  And still they  stand.  They wil withstand the miserable Southern Boobtists I am sure. They may even pick up a little support as people start to listen to the  Boobtists and realize that subtracting the obvious lies and claims of  Satanism that the Masons sound pretty good by comparison.  One thing is  known.  A sizable proportion of Southern Babtists are Masons!  And the  Masons have already fired back in their own magazines against the  Boobtist Witch-hunt.   Since the Consrervatives have already been a divisive element with  their war on Boobtist moderates and liberals they may now start in on  their Mason/Boobtist brothers and hasten their own downfall as more and  more Southern Boobtists realize their church can\t stand being run by a  handful of clowns looking for holy civil wars and purity tests and drop  \em out of the leadership positions they have taken over.   So as far as I am concerned the louder ruder and more outrageous  an Anti-Masonic Crusade these old goats mount the better.  Pop some pocorn and get a center row seat.  The circus is about to begin. And
 [horror story about FBI ruining a guy\s life for the hell of it omitted]   So is this a real story or a work of fiction?  How about some sources?  When where
  \tJust wondering do you mean the Lectorium Rosicrucianum? Warning: There is no point in arguing who\s legit and who\s not. *WHICH* Golden Dawn are you talking about?  \tJust for the sake of argument (reflecting NO affiliation) I am going to say that the TRUE Rosicrucian Order is the Fraternitas Rosae Crucis in Quakertown Penn.  \tAny takers? :-)  Fraternally
 First off let me congratulate you for not posting a flame about You sick perverts you are immoral you are all going to hell. which seems to be the usual religious post found on the alt.sex.* hierarchy.  Hopefully you won\t get flamed either.  You will however be argued with.  I personally think that your project is built on unsteady ground.  First I do not believe that there is any way to find an objective morality.  Morality and value are inherently subjective - they represent the beliefs of a person or a group of people.  They can be widely held perhaps even overwhelmingly held but they are never and _can_ never be objective.   Second I do not accept the assumptions that you make here.  If as you say you are trying to be objective then why accept a morality to begin with by using the Christian Bible?  You\re defeating your own purpose by doing so.    Third call me a pessimist but you won\t stop the flamage.  There will always be people who pop upin alt.sex.* to tell us how sick and twisted and evil we all are.  Just out of curiosity do alt.sex readers show up unprovoked in the religion groups to tell you all that you are narrow-minded censoring overbearing totalitarianists?    Hm.  Let me provide an example.  Four people get together over dinner to discuss morality: you me a rather conservative Moslem and a sociopath.  I start off by saying that I think it\s immoral to force people to have sex with you.  You agree but also say that it is immoral to have sex with someone of your own gender.  (Just a note: I really don\t know your views on homosexuality I am just using this as a common view of morality for the purposes of this example.)  The Moslem says that it is immoral for women to have their faces uncovered.  The sociopath who has become bored kills all three of us and eats us but feels no guilt because he has done nothing wrong morally in his own mind.                                                                             \t(Evidence deleted)  I\m not going to accept your evidence for this.  You ask us to accept The Word of God that everything good comes from God.  This is only a valid argument for a person who shares your beliefs.  Still I must say that cataloging the major themes and motifs in erotica could be interesting for other reasons than yours so good luck with this next part.   Hmmm...do I detect just a wee bit of condescence here?                                                                                        ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ \t\t\t\tnot very objective.    One could construe this to mean that beautiful people are better or more good than non-beautiful people.  I would hope that people relize that this is not necessarily true.                                           ^^^^       Might I suggest the word penis? It seems more in line with the tone of your post.              Bravo!  I respect you and your sense of humor sir.                                                     Yes and this theme is usually what the better stories are about.  However they are not always selfish - I could point to examples in the work of Elf Sternberg for example.   It serves the same purpose as it does in pornographic movies: it affirms the virility of the male involved as well as assuring the reader that he (the character) has orgasmed.                         Your Whole Picture [TM] unfortunately only applies to people who accept your church.           In addition if sex is for procreation then  1)\tWhy did God make it pleasurable so that people would want to do it rather than building it in as instinct? 2)\tWhy did God make it fallible?  Not every sexual encounter results in pregnancy even among Catholics.  Does this mean that they have sinned?     Granted.   Pornography would not tend in those directions if there were not a demand for it.  Many people have violent fantasies that they would never act out in real life but will think about and read about and mull over.  Later
 And I maintain:  Some people do not want to enter into the light and the knowledge that they alone are their own masters because they fear it; they are too afraid of having to face the world on their own terms.  And so by their own choice they will remain in darkness sort of like bugs under a rock.  However some people but not many will not like the darkness.  Sometimes it gets too cold and too dark to be comfortable. These people will crawl out from under the rock and although blinded at first will get accustomed to the light and enjoy its warmth.  And after a while now that they can see things for what they really are they will also see the heights which they can reach and the places they can go and they will learn to choose their own paths through the world and they will learn from their mistakes and revel in their successes.  They will see that there is much much more to the world than just the narrow experiences under the rock.  They will discover that life under a rock was incredibly yucky and that life on their own terms is great -- so great that they will want to tell everyone else about it.  Do you see my point?  I think you\re the one under the rock and I\m getting a great tan out here in the sunlight.  My life has improved immesurably since I abandoned theism -- come and join me!  It will be a difficult trip at first until you build up your muscles for the long hike but it\s well worth it!   Look you just practically equated Odin and Zeus?  They\re as much different as your god is from them...  Don\t you see?  I\m not going to accept ANYTHING that I can\t witness with my own eyes or experience with my own senses especially not something as mega-powerful as what you\re trying to get me to accept. Surely if you believe in it this strongly you must have a good *reason* to don\t you?   When did I say that?  I say that I would rather CEASE EXISTING instead of being subject to the whims of a deity but that if the deity decided to toss me into the fiery pits because of who I am then so be it.   Nope -- most people are Christian.  Most people are fond of feeling that they are imperfect of believing that the world is an undesirable place of reciting magical mystical prayers to make the world nice and holy again of doing just as their priests tell them like good little sheep.  You enjoy darkness and you\re proud of it.  You may know the Bible well -- but have you read any of the Koran?  Or Zen writings?  Or Hare Krishna literature?  If you haven\t then how can you say you have an open mind?   Nope.  You make decisions enjoy your successes and accept your failures; then you die.  If you are content with the life you\ve led as you reflect back on it in your final moments then you\ve led a good life.   Please do.   I\m sorry I don\t feel that sacrificing Jesus was something any god I\d worship would do unless the sacrifice was only temporary in which case it\s not really all that important.  Forget the Bible for a minute.  Forget quoting verses forget about who said what about this or that.  *Show me.*  Picture just you and me and a wide open hilltop
And he went out to meet Asa \tAnd said unto him \tHear ye me Asa \tAnd all Judah and Benjamin; \tThe LORD is with you while ye be with him; \tand if ye seek him he will be found of you; \tbut if ye forsake him

  No.  Zeno\s paradox is resolved by showing that integration or an infinite series of decreasing terms can sum to a finite result.   Well suppose a probe emitting radiation at a constant frequency was sent towards a black hole.  As it got closer to the event horizon the red shift would keep increasing.  The period would get longer and longer but it would never stop.  An observer would not observe the probe actually reaching the event horizon.  The detected energy from the probe would keep decreasing but it wouldn\t vanish.  Exp(-t) never quite reaches zero.  I guess the above probably doesn\t make things any more clear
 Superficially a good answer but it isn\t that simple.  An awful lot of the starvation and poverty in the world is directly caused by the economic policies of the Western countries as well as by the diet of the typical Westerner.  For instance some third-world countries with terrible malnutrition problems export all the soya they can produce -- so that it can be fed to cattle in the US to make tender juicy steaks and burgers.  They have to do this to get money to pay the interest on the crippling bank loans we encouraged them to take out.  Fund-raising for Ethiopia is a truly bizarre idea; instead we ought to stop bleeding them for every penny they\ve got.  Perhaps it\s more accurate to say that there\s a Western ethic against Western infanticide.  All the evidence suggests that so long as the children are dying in the Third World we couldn\t give a shit.  And that goes for the supposed Pro-Life movement too.  They could save far more lives by fighting against Third World debt than they will by fighting against abortion.  Hell if they\re only interested in fetuses they could save more of those by fighting for human rights in China.  And besides Suzanne\s answer implies that non-Western countries lack this ethic against infanticide.  Apart from China with its policy of mandatory forced abortion in Tibet
      IF it were\nt for the sin of men none of this killing would have been  necesarry He is KIND and LOVING but also RIGHTEOUS  SIN MUST BE PUNISHED.  Before Jesus man had to take the sins on himself. But Jesus died and took it all upon Him
 Hence we are all above the Law where all in this case refers to Christians.   When was the last time you heard about a Jewish animal sacrifice?   The blood sacrifice of an innocent man?   Then why don\t Christians follow it why don\t they even follow their own Ten Commandments?   So
...  \tBefore or after his kids were shot?   \tThen why make the comment?   \tAs did the Jews against the Nazis in WW II:  do what I say or die.    \tALl humans I hope.   \tOr perhaps they have:  kill first blame the dead ones


/(me)  /(hudson) /Why does that make something immoral?    Because you are not being consistent.  Moral systems must be consistent.  A person who thinks they can inflict pain on others but doesn\t want it  inflicted upon themselves has a double standard.  And double standards are a violation of *any* moral system.      (me)  /(hudson) /Of course we don\t like pain.  I don\t like brussel sprouts.  Are brussel /sprouts immoral?  Pain isn\t immoral stupid.  Pain itself is just a physiological reaction.    What >>is<< immoral is subjecting unwilling individuals to pain.  Or brussel sprouts for that matter.       (hudson) (me)  /(hudson) /Why would it be wrong to make humans undergo the effects of the reactions /if humans are composed only of matter?    What humans are composed of isn\t the qualifying criteria of whether or not something would be wrong.       /(hudson) /Is it wrong to make matter undergo chemical reactions?  Yes if it is sentient matter.    /(me) />Nature is not a sentient force; there is no choice involved.  Therefore />no question of morality.   /(hudson) /I actually heard a geologist entertain the notion that matter had a will. /There is some sentient force out there.    Fine.  I have also heard that the government is encoding the DNA for  a new race of superhumans in ordinary drinking water.    What\s your point?    /(hudson) /If humans are made only of matter then choices are also chemical reactions /so why is choice an important issue.  And if that is the case
Mr. Clinton said today that the horrible tragedy of the Waco fiasco should remind those who join cults of the dangers of doing so. Now I began scratching my head thinking (a bad sign :-) don\t the  mainstream religions (in this case Christianity...or the 7th day  adventist in particular) just keep these guys going ? Isn\t Mr. Clinton  condemning his own religion ? After all

}>}So stop dodging the question.  What is hypocritical about my }>}criticizing bad arguments given that I do this both when I agree }>}with the conclusion and when I disagree with the conclusion?   }> }>You are the one who has claimed to possess the fruits of precognition }>telepathy and telempathy.  Divine it yourself. } }Another dodge.  Oh well.  I\m no match for your amazing repertoire }of red herrings and smoke screens.   } }You asked for an apology.  I\m not going to apologize for pointing out }that your straw-man argument was a straw-man argument.  Nor for saying }that your list of bible contradictions shows such low standards of }scholarship that it should be an embarrassment to anti-inerrantists }just as Josh McDowell should be an embarrassment to the fundies.  Nor }for objecting various times to your taking quotes out of context.  Nor }for pointing out that they do it too is not an excuse. Nor for calling }your red herrings and smoke screens what they are.  How about the following inaccurate unsubstantiated accusations: In 8257@blue.cis.pitt.edu \t- but no threat produced  \t- display of telepathy \t- in spite of no threat produced nor forecast ever happening (precognition?) \t- in spite of claimed threat never being given \t- in spite of it never happening.  telepathy or precognition? \t- unsubstantiated and untrue.  more telepathy?  Or maybe telempathy? \t- unsubstantiated again.  Seems to be a habit...  Having more trouble with reality
 Jews won\t agree with you Malcolm.  Cheers
 /(hudson) /If all morality were relative- big hairy deal.  As I said you appear to be the only person saying that all morality is relative.  Most people I know do hold some absolutes in their moral system.  I >>personally<< believe that the dignity of the individual and the right of free will are absolutes.  I recognize that there are some moral systems around which don\t accept this; I reject them as dangerous and anti-social (nazism some forms of communism fundamentalist xtianity--no that\s not a slam).  But for the most part almost every moral system agrees on these two points.     (me)   /(hudson) /Generally Christians believe in a Creator-Creation distinction.  Other /religions believe in one big whole.   I don\t accept yor premises.  Too bad.  I know I\m right so I get to enforce my view upon you whether you like my premise or not.  And since you can\t prove otherwise there isn\t even an intellectual basis for your resistance to accepting my viewpoint.       /(hudson) /I don\t think so.  once morality becomes relative it degenerates.  I am /saying that reasoning that it is generally evil to hurt other people is bad. /(though I don\t think it is sufficient.)     Well then answer me this:   you seem to be opposed to moral relativism (as you call it) because it has the capacity to degenerate.  Obviously then you would advocate a nonrelative (absolute) moral system.  Whose absolutist moral system do we choose?    How do we come to this decision?  What about people who disagree with the chosen moral system?      /(hudson) /But if morality is considered to /be relative and this rule isn\t based on anything but is just an arbitrary /rule people might abandon it.  Fine.  I can agree with most of what you typed here.  However
  \tIs the so-called material world outside the Kingdom of God? \t  \tAha animals are inferior
(Frank DeCenso)   How incredibly fucking stupid.  Of *course* the text is referring to the city itself (buildings bricks mortar
Long time
 Actually there is one condemnation of lesbian acts in the Bible
  Again you missed Jesus\s point.  If you read the surrounding passages you would understand what Jesus means by life in the world.  But as is you bumbled around asserted your standard axiom that the Bible is bunk and came up with the wrong idea.  Also you do not know exactly what Jesus means by eternal life.    Brian K. do you expect to jump in the middle of the quantum mechanics book and understand Hermite polynomials having not read the surrounding material?  Why do you such with the Bible?  For an idea what Jesus means by the world look up references to it in your concordance.  For a good description the whole Book of Ecclesiastes is game.  For  eternal life check out John 17:3 John 3:15-16.  You will find that eternal life is quite different than what you think.  Eternal life starts NOW--an infinitely high quality of life living in fellowship with God.    If my diety exists you would not just cease to exist.  Jesus talks of hell in Luke 16:19-31.       The truth is is that it is not some sort of magic spell.  The truth is is that you do not understand it
TEXT 45                          trai-gunya-visaya veda                         nistrai-gunyo bhavarjuna                      nirdvandvo nitya-sattva-stho                           niryoga-ksema atmavan    trai-gunya--pertaining to the three modes of material nature; visayah--on the subject matter; vedah--Vedic literatures; nistrai-gunyah--transcendental to the three modes of material nature; bhava--be; arjuna--O Arjuna; nirdvandvah--without duality; nitya-sattva-sthah--in a pure state of spiritual existence; niryoga-ksemah--free from ideas of gain and protection; atma-van--established in the self.                                    TRANSLATION   The Vedas deal mainly with the subject of the three modes of material nature. O Arjuna become transcendental to these three modes. Be free from all dualities and from all anxieties for gain and safety and be established in the self.                                    PURPORT   All material activities involve actions and reactions in the three modes of material nature. They are meant for fruitive results which cause bondage in the material world. The Vedas deal mostly with fruitive activities to gradually elevate the general public from the field of sense gratification to a position on the transcendental plane. Arjuna as a student and friend of Lord Krsna is advised to raise himself to the transcendental position of Vedanta philosophy where in the beginning there is brahma-jijnasa or questions on the supreme transcendence. All the living entities who are in the material world are struggling very hard for existence. For them the Lord after creation of the material world gave the Vedic wisdom advising how to live and get rid of the material entanglement. When the activities for sense gratification namely the karma-kanda chapter are finished then the chance for spiritual realization is offered in the form of the Upanisads which are part of different Vedas as the Bhagavad-gita is a part of the fifth Veda namely the Mahabharata. The Upanisads mark the beginning of transcendental life.   As long as the material body exists there are actions and reactions in the material modes. One has to learn tolerance in the face of dualities such as happiness and distress or cold and warmth and by tolerating such dualities become free from anxieties regarding gain and loss. This transcendental position is achieved in full Krsna consciousness when one is fully dependent on the good will of Krsna.  Bhagavad-Gita As It is Books of A.C. Bhaktivedanta Swami          ---------------------------------------------------------       |                Don\t forget to chant:                   |       |                                                         |       |  Hare Krishna Hare Krishna Krishna Krishna Hare Hare   |       |       Hare Rama Hare Rama Rama Rama Hare Hare          |       |                                                         |       |    Kalki\s Infoline BBS Aiken South Carolina
 Your last remark is a contradiction but I\ll let that pass.  I was addressing the notion of the Great Commission which you deleted in order to provide us with dull little homilies. Thank you Bing Crosby.  Now you go right on back to sleep and mommy and daddy will tuck you in later.  Oh and how convenient his bible must have been to Michael Griffin how convenient his Christianity.  Well I\ll just skip the bit about not murdering people and loving the sinner and hating the sin and all that other stuff for now and concentrate on the part where it says that if someone is doing something wrong you should shoot him in the back several times as he tries to hobble away on his crutches.  I\ll leave the convert or die program of the missionaries and their military escorts in the Americas for Nadja to explain as she knows much more about it than I.  Must be awfully convenient by the way to offer platitudes as you have done David
      The first means that some aspect of reality contains objective values. The second means that values are a reference to some preference of the individual.  In the first case

  Be warned it is not my job to convert you.  That is the job of the Holy Spirit.  And I frankly make a lousy one.  I am only here to testify.  Your conversion is between you and God.  I am out of the loop.  If you decide to follow Jesus of which I indeed would be estatic
Tony     I appreciate the narrow-mindedness of the view expressed in the text you quoted.  I also appreciate your being amused by such determined ignorance.  Without taking anything away from your mirth
Bill Gripp writes    ok but didn\t Jesus figure somewhere into their beliefs? Anyway
 Bill I have taken the time to explain that biblical scholars consider the Josephus reference to be an early Christian insert.  By biblical scholar I mean an expert who in the course of his or her research is willing to let the chips fall where they may.  This excludes literalists who may otherwise be defined as biblical apologists.  They find what they want to find.  They are not trustworthy by scholarly standards (and others).  Why an insert?  Read it - I have a number of times.  The passage is glaringly out of context and Josephus a superb writer had no such problem elsewhere  in his work.  The passage has *nothing* to do with the subject matter in which  it lies.  It suddenly appears and then just as quickly disappears.  Until you can demonstrate how and why the scholarly community is wrong about the Josephus insert your proof is meaningless and it should not be repeated here.  What\s more even if Josephus happened to be legitimate it would prove nothing.  Scholars speak of the weight of evidence.  Far more independent evidence would be required to validate your claim.  Until forthcoming your belief is based on faith.  That\s OK but you exceed your rights when you pass faith off as fact.  As for the gospels there are parallels but there are also glaring inconsistencies and contradictions.  Shouldn\t a perfect canon be perfect?  Shouldn\t there be absolutely no room for debate?  I suggest you read _Gospel  Fictions_ by Randel Helms and _The Unauthorized Version_ by Robin Fox (for  Herb Huston no known kinship or familial relationship but we do indeed share  an evolutionary ancestry).  The fact that there are inconsistencies gaps and contradictions does not deny your position.  On the other hand neither do the gospels prove your faith.  Independent evidence is necessary and I know of none (which we have already discussed and so far you have not provided any).  Until then its faith.  Moreover you have committed a fundamental error in logic.  You have attempted to prove your claim with that which you want to prove.  Its no different than saying I am right because I say so.    Your logic is full of circles.  It reminds me a bit of the 1910 Presbyterian  General Assembly.  The assembly defined five fundamentals (this is where fundamentalist came from) of orthodox Protestant Christianity to wit: 1) Jesus performed miracles 2) Jesus was born of a virgin 3) Jesus was bodily resurrected 4) Jesus\ crucifixion atoned for human sin and - here is the clincher - 5) the bible is the inerrant word of God.  Presbyterians construe inerrant broadly as spritually inerrant.  Fundamentalists take the first four as literally true and then validate them with a literally inerrant bible which contains the first four and which is the only thing known to  contain the first four.    Smoke and mirrors and wands and hand waving if ever there was!  Its faith Bill.  You don\t have any more or better truths than anyone else.  Whatever works for you.  Just don\t foist it on others.   Regards
I\m having trouble receiving News at the moment due to an overloaded News server. I think that I can post out reasonably quickly though.  I\m in a couple of threads at the moment which may be pending replies. If anyone wants a reply from me over something I\ve posted then I suggest sending an e-mail copy of the point to me so that I can reply by News.  This is one way to shut me up!!  Cheers
  (Pleading mode on)  Please!  I\m begging you!  Quit confusing religious groups and stop making generalizations!  I\m a Protestant!  I\m an evangelical!  I don\t believe that my way is the only way!  I\m not a creation scientist!  I don\t think that homosexuals should be hung by their toenails!    If you want to discuss bible thumpers you would be better off singling out (and making obtuse generalizations about) Fundamentalists.  If you compared the actions of Presbyterians or Methodists with those of Southern  Baptists you would think that they were different religions!  Please prejudice is about thinking that all people of a group are the same
 Please please don\t make Barney to a modern martyr/saviour mythical figure. I detest this being and if humans will create a religion in his name then life will be unbearable :-).  Cheers
sandvik@newton.apple.com (Kent Sandvik) writes...    Which Jews KS?   (ex. as a people as a language religiously politically or...)   Do you mean those Jews who are God\s chosen?  {And Malcolm please if you will
In <lsjc8cINNmc1@saltillo.cs.utexas.edu> turpin@cs.utexas.edu (Russell Turpin)   I regard love as no more or less benign than any other Christian does. You are merely expressing approval of the consequences I find therein. Which says more about our politics and cultural trappings than about my (or any) religion.  Love is a highly ambiguous word of which Christians can write both the gentle words Paul uses of it in 1 Corinthians -- in a passage that even the conservatives will quote at you :-) -- and the words of T. S. Eliot in his Pentacost Hymn Love is the unfamiliar Name that wove the intolerable shirt of flame ...  This is in any case rather to the side of what I was attempting to raise in my note as will become more evident below.   blechhh.  I think you are misreading me rather seriously.  Though given my principle that one CANNOT force one\s own notion of sin on another and my unshakeable disestablishmentarianism Russel Turpin and others (believers and unbelievers alike) are under no threat of my legislating my own understanding of Christian love.   You misread.  I can do (and have repeatedly done) a complete bill of accusation against the Inquisition by exhibiting in as thorough a form as anyone might want a demonstration of the harm it has done to human beings (in the first place) and to respect for (let alone love of) God in near succession.  Please go back to my quoted words above:  The possibility that always exists is that I (or to revert to proper time sequence my predecessors over the last several centuries) could persuade Christian B of my case that the Inquisition *does* indeed constitute an egregious violation of the Law of Love.  I must also note that the majority of Christians HAVE been so persuaded.  By Christian argumentation as well as by secular [both Christian and non-Christian] prohibitions.  What Mr. Turpin alludes to is a trickier point:  \tA.  I demonstrate the human pain and violation of love involved \t    in the Inquisition.  \tB.  The Inquisitor responds that Mother Church must however \t    painful this *seems* discipline her children for their \t    own good -- in this case the salvation of their souls (or \t    if the tortured heretic will not recant than by bad example \t    deterring others from the same loss-of-soul.)  \tA.  I point out that this justification of a failure in love \t    depends on a highly speculative construal of texts and of \t    philosophical assertions that are quite undemonstrable.  \tB.  Burns me at the stake.  My rhetoric has failed but the point I am making is sustained.  What is going on here has a *lot* to do with cultural baggage.  In this case the baggage includes a (nearly universal and absolutely secular) belief that an accused person must prove innocence and that testimony is most believable if taken under torture.  The elimination of Inqisitorial practice (in those places where it *has* been eliminated or at least greatly reduced) has very little if anything to do with the discussion of sin in the exchange between A and B.  Mr. Turpin is pointing out that if I am A versus the Grand Inquisitor\s B then my persuasion is not very likely to work.  I know this; and in what- ever personal agony I consign the issue to God and my ghostly defense attorney.  So one possibility fails in this case -- as it will fail in may others.  At the other extreme the persuasion will succeed when it properly SHOULD not if it entails mistaken assumptions I share with the Inquisitor.  And that is potentially an even more troubling case in that many of the victims of Inquisition will have accepted that they were in fact sinful (in such random cases as they may actually have been guilty of charges brought against them.)  The point is that the persuasion breaks down when the parties do NOT share enough to agree on all the cultural baggage -- and given the main thrust of the Inquisition against heresy it is *bound* to break down in precisely the worst cases.  The conservative (I don\t think that is the right word BTW) will take refuge in what I attribute to B above that he is justified in causing harm because he *thinks* that works to a greater good.  But this is a violent and extravagant REFUSAL to follow the gospel as if one\s theories about sin entitled one to cast aside Jesus\ words on dealing with sinners (cf. Matthew 5:39ff).  I am a radical Christian *only* in that I take the gospel seriously.   Well the whole *point* of making these the base commandments is that they *aren\t* reducible to rules.  A set of rules is a moral code or a law code or an algorithm for acting.  Such things can be very helpful to individuals or societies -- but not if they are used *instead* of a personal involvement in and responsibility for one\s actions.  The Great Commandment is more than anything else a call to act *as if you were God and accepting ultimate responsibility* in your every action.  A demand that I like most would rather *not* hear but it keeps popping up nonetheless (along with the reassurance that it is more important that I be open to trying this than succeeding at it).  Conservatives may twist this act as if you were God to mean lay down rules for other people and be as nasty to them as possible if they don\t keep YOUR rules. They are so insistent (and obvious) about this that they have convinced a lot of people (who rightly reject the whole concept!) that such idiocy IS how God acts.  That after all is the standard accusation against God by the atheists here and elsewhere.  That the conservatives have confused THEIR manipulative hoop-jumping notions of coercing other people with the Nature of God is almost the entire content of standard American atheism -- and I quite agree with it on this point.   And different bodies of Christians have from the beginning urged *different* ethical systems (or in some cases none).  As a result it is bizarre to identify any one of these systems however popular (or infamous) with Christianity.  Christianity DOES NOT HAVE A TORAH. It does not have a QU\RAN.  Specifically Christian scripture has very little if anything in the way of commandments -- so little that the Christians who desperately *want* commandments go mining for them with almost no support (and thus almost no obvious limitation :-)) for their efforts.  The one single thing in the gospels which Jesus specifically gives as a commandment to us is love one another.  \t[I will be expanding on this point in a reply to Paul Hudson \t that I hope to get to in a day or so -- it is quite true that \t SOME Christians infer LOTS of commandments from the NT; I\ll \t point out what has to be going on in these inferences and why \t there is a huge amount of cultural baggage involved.]  You are quite right that this is goo if one is looking for an ethical system.  But why should anyone BE looking for an ethical system since our society is eager to hand us one or more no matter what we do?  It may be that we need a principle for the CRITIQUE of ethical systems -- in which case I will profer the _agapate allelou_ once again.   I think you are begging the question. Why don\t I and the (myriads of) other Christians like me tell you something about Christianity? [Nor is this very new in Christianity -- you might want to look up the origins and fundamental doctrines of the Quakers from the 17th century onwards
 No and Im especially unhappy that these 70+ people died in an assault on private property with government armored vehicles.  I am also unhappy (or actually very suspicious) that the FBI was dismissing out of hand any chances that they might have accidentally set the blaze  themselves. I mean I guess we are just supposed to believe that ramming modified tanks into the walls of a building and injecting toxic gases into the building are just routine procedures
JOB 26:7  He stretcheth out the north over the empty  place
/(hudson) /Yes you do.  Who is to say that it is immoral for onesself to experience /pain or to be hurt in some other way.  Maybe unpleasant but that doesn\t /say anything about morality.  It violates free will Hudson.    (me)  /(hudson) /Why is making someone a less productive member of society immoral?  Hudson you are screwing up again.  Morality does not (I say again DOES NOT) define only right and wrong.  It also defines acceptable social behavior without any overtones of good and evil.  Picking up your trash is not really a right/wrong moral issue in the eternal sense of Good and Evil.  Yet it is moral in the sense that it is acceptable social behavior.    Your definition of the word morality is what is causing you to trip over  yourself here.     /(me) /And since />I selfish being that I am want to maximize my gains from society I will />not do anything to another member of society if that action might cut down />on how much benefit I can derive from society.  /(hudson) /Why is your benefit somehow related to morality.  Again your definition is causing you to shoot yourself in the foot.      /(hudson) /What about if someone feels that their own personal benefit is enhanced /more than it would be damaged by depleting the overall resources of society? /Maybe something might hurt society but it would help him immensly?  That is irrational thinking.    There may also be people out there who think that death by atomic  destruction is  a sublime and wonderful thing. I am not going to let them execute that idea just because they want to do it.   Simply because I let people make up their minds about what morals they have doesn\t prevent me from spotting and stopping a madman when I see one Hudson.  And even then I will only stop him when he interferes  with me and my life.  That is the difference between me and you:  you want to interfere in people\s lives even when they aren\t affecting you.        /(hudson) /The central character in Dostoevsky\s novel Crime and Punishment  /(R something or other) reasoned that if killed this old Jewish woman and /stole her money to educate and establish himself financially he could /make a great contribution to society.  He reasoned that she was not of  /much profit to society.  She just collected rents and hoarded money.   One of the central points of any (that\s ANY) moral system is that is has to be internally consistent.    By killing her the character had to accept the premise that the ends justify the means.  If he accepted that premise then (in order to be consistent) he must accept the idea that some day another person may apply the same standard to HIS life.  Now if he is unwilling to accept this premise (which he will not be willing to accept) then he has behaved inconsistently with his own moral standard.      /(me) /[football example deleted]  /(hudson) /Now suppose a freshman on the bench will only get to play if one of the /players in the field/on the court is injured (or killed.)  This freshman /wants to play in the big game so a talent scout can see him.  If he hurts /a player on the team it might slightly lessen the chances of the team to /win but he might gain great personal benefit.  So operating on purely /selfish (immorally selfish) motives he arranges for a sniper to shoot a /team player in the leg.  He gets to play in front of the talent scout.  /Did that freshman behave morally?  /Selfish intentions may sometimes generate (apparently) moral actions but /not always.    Two problems right off the bat:  1.  The problem with your analogy is that it doesn\t address the goal that I started with:  winning the game.  Playing in front of the talent scout != winning the game.  Try creating the same analogy and keep the ultimate goal the same
 If no-one looks at the results or acknowledges their correctness in what meaningful sense can the chip be said to work?? Does flibozity exist? By flibozity I mean a particular extremely complex configuration of  physical phenomena which no-one absolutely NO-ONE cares about in the  slightest. Does it exist Eric?  Getting back to the question of whether the DES chip works doesn\t work  mean something like achieving the desired/expected effect? Note the way  intentionality subtly underlies that definition. Even if we take the  definition as expected instead of desired can you deny that conformance  to expectations is itself a value of sorts namely the scientific values of  accuracy-of-prediction and reproducibility-of-results?  The phenomenologist Husserl for one considered Intentionality to be the primary ontological stuff from which all other ontology was built -- perceptions consciousness thoughts etc. Frank is by no means alone in seeing intentionality (or values as he puts it) underlying all human experience even the so-called objective experiences such as  measurements of the natural world
The following is an introduction as to who is Muhammad SAW as will be covered with this treatise.  MUHAMMAD peace and blessings of Allah be upon him (SAW) is the last prophet of Islam.  He is the Prophet who is revealed the last Holy Scripture Qur\an by Allah SWA (all praise be to Him) through the Arch Angel Gabriel.  He is the seal of all prophets till the day of judgement as stated in the Qur\an by Allah SWA (all praise be to Him).  Muhammad SAW lived between 571-632 AC.  All other prophethoods claimed after Muhammad SAW is a treason against Islam against Qur\an against the message of Allah SWA.  Muhammad SAW is from the seed of Ishmael another messenger of Allah and son of Abraham also a messenger of Allah. He is the Messenger that previous holy scriptures foretold his coming.  The above mentioned verse from the Qur\an is from  Chapter 33 Verse 40 whose rough translation is as follows:  \tMuhammad is not the father of any of your men \tbut (he is) the messenger of Allah and the seal \tof the prophets and Allah has full knowledge of \tall things.  --------------------- Commentary on the above verse:  When a document is sealed it is complete and there can be no further addition.  The  Holy Prophet Muhammad SAW closed the long line of Messengers. Allah\s teaching is and will always be continuous but there has been and will be NO Prophet after Muhammad SAW.  The later ages will want thinkers and revivers not Prophets.  This is not an arbitrary matter.  It is a decree full of knowledge and wisdom for Allah has full knowledge of all things.  ---------------------- DROPLET VOL 1 No 11 Part 2  A   D R O P L E T From The Vast Ocean Of The Miraculous Qur\an  Translations from the Arabic and Turkish Writings of  Bediuzzaman Said Nursi The Risale-i Noor  VOL 1 No 11 Part 2 ------------------------------------------------------------------    \t\t NINETEENTH LETTER    \t\t MU\JIZAT-I AHMEDIYE RISALESI  (A TREATISE ON THE MIRACLES OF MUHAMMED SAW)         (continued from Droplet Vol 1 No 11 Part 1)     SECOND  SIGN:   The  Noble  Messenger  (SAW) declared His prophethood and presented to humanity a decree as the Glorious Qur\an and manifest miracles which number according to the scholars one thousand. The occurrence of those miracles in their entirety is as certain as the fact that He declared himself prophet.  In fact as a shown by the words of the  most obstinate unbelievers quoted in various places of the Wise Our\an even they could not deny the occurrence of His miracles but only called them -hasha wa kella!-(Allah forbids)  sorcery in order to satisfy themselves or to deceive their followers.  The miracles of Muhammad (SAW) have the certainty of confirmation by consensus of Ulema (scholars of Islam) to the hundreth degree.    The Miracle is the conformation by the CREATOR of the universe of His declaration of Prophethood; it has the effect of the words\You have indeed spoken the truth !\    Suppose that you said in the assembly of a ruler while being observed by Him \The true ruler has appointed me to such and such position.  \At a time when you were asked to prove your claim the word \Yes\ uttered by the ruler would sufficiently support you.  Or if the ruler changed his usual practice and attitude at your request this would confirm your claim even more soundly and more definitely than would the word \Yes.\    In the same way ALLAH\s Most Noble Messenger claimed: \I am the envoy of the CREATOR of this universe.  My proof is that He will change His unbroken order at my request and my prayer.  Now look at my fingers:  He makes them run like a fountain with five spigots.  Look at the moon: by a gesture of my finger He splits it in two.  Look at that tree: to affirm me and to bear witness to me it moves and comes near to me.  Look at this food: although it is barely enough for two or three men it satisfies two or three hundred.  \Further he shows hundreds of similar miracles.  However the evidences  of the veracity of this high being and the proofs of his prophethood are not restricted to his miracles.  All his deeds and acts his words and behavior his moral conduct and manners his character and appearance prove to the attentive his truthfulness and seriousness. Indeed many people  such  as  Abdullah  b. Salam  the famous scholar of the Children of Israel came to belief merely by seeing him and said \No lie can hide in this face nor can any fraud be found in it!\    Although many of the  researchers have concluded that the proofs of the prophethood of Muhammad and his miracles number about one thousand there are thousands perhaps hundreds of thousands of proofs  of his prophethood.  And hundreds of thousands of truth-seeking men (muhakkikiin) with varying opinions have affirmed his prophethood in an equal number of ways.    The Wise Our\an alone demonstrates thousands of the proofs of his prophethood in addition to its own forty aspects of miraculousness.  Since prophethood is as a phenomenon of humanity and hundreds of thousands of individuals who claimed prophethood and performed miracles have lived and passed away; then the prophethood of Muhammad (SAW) is of a certanity superior to that of the prophethood of all the others.  For whatever evidences qualities  and attributes  became the means of the prophethood and messengership of all the messengers such as Jesus (AS) and Moses (AS) they are all owned in a more perfect and comprehensive fashion by Muhammad (SAW).  And since the causes and means of prophetic authority exist more perfectly in the person of Muhammad (SAW)
I told some friends of mine two weeks ago that Koresh was dead.  The FBI and the BATF could not let a man like that live.  He was a testimonial to their stupidity and lies.      Now before everyone gets crazy with me let me say that Koresh was crazy as  a bed bug but out government was crazier...and they lied to us.  They told us compound had been under survaillance for quite some time.  Yet  whoever was watching the place failed to see that Koresh went jogging and into town on a regular basis.  Everyone in the area claimed to have seen him and  wondered why they didn\t pick him up then.  There are two possible answers. First they didn\t see him.  What kind of survaillance is that?  Second they didn\t care.  They wanted a confrontation.  They wanted publicity and they got it.  After the first battle they told us that they did not know he knew they were coming.  They also said it would have been foolish to go in knowing that. Well we know now that they intercepted the informants call and went in anyway.  Did they explore all of the possibilities for ending the seige?  According to them they did but according to the Hartford Courant the woman that raised Koresh (His Grandmother) was not allowed to go in and see him.                   The FBI agent who she spoke with was Bob Ricks and according to the paper he  A lot of people think if you just talk to them logically they will come out. His grandmother raised Vernon Howell; (Koresh\s Real name)  she didn\t raise David Koresh.  Someone who raises you and loves you does not speak to you strickly on a logical level.  There is also an emotional level on which they can reach you.  Here\s another one.  All during this operation the FBI has been claiming that they feared a mass suicide and that is one of the reasons that something must be done.  Now they claim they never thought he would do it?  I knew they were going to do something when they started talking about how much money this was costing.  That was the start of the Justification part part of the plan.  That\s when I knew it would come soon.  But back to the plan.  It is considered Cruel and Unusal Punishment to execute criminals in the minds of many people but look at what\s acceptable.  They knew the parents (adults) had gas masks.  They did not know or were not sure if the children had them.  So the plan was to pour the gas into the  compound.  The mothers seeing what the gas was doing to their children were supposed to run out and that would only leave the men to deal with.  I spent two years in the army and like everyother veteran I went through CBR (Chemical Biological Radiological) warfare training.  Part of that training is going into a room filled with the same stuff that the children were subjected to.  To make the stuff really interesting the gas also has a chemical  agent that irritates the skin.  You think its on fire.  I have no doubts the children would become hysterical.  Its not the kind of thing you never want to do again.  This was the plan the final solution.  We waited 444 days for our hostages to come home from Iran.  We gave these people 51 days.    I stated on several occasions that there was absolutely nothing in this whole thing that the government could point to as a success.  Well FBI agent Ricks changed my mind.  Again a newclip from the Hartford Courant:  And while expressing regret at the loss of life he suggested that the operation had been at least a modified success because not a single federal shot had been fired and not a single federal agent had been hurt.  It took 17 dead children to get us that new definition of success.  One more thought.  The government claimed that they believed he had automatic weapons on the premises.                                                                 HE HAD A LICENSE FOR THE 50 CALIBER MACHINE GUN!  THEY KNEW DAMN WELL HE HAD ONE. THEY ALSO KNEW HE HAD IT LEGALLY!  Still
:  (lots of stuff about the Nicene Creed deleted which can be read in the   original basenote.  I will also leave it up to other LDS netters to   take Mr. Weiss to task on using Mormon Doctrine to declare the difinitive   word on what the LDS Church teaches as doctrine.  Hopefully the LDS    netters will be amiable in their explanation.)  Since it would do no good to rebut what Mr. Weiss has stated on the origin of the Nicene Creed and its status as devine and inspired (I say no good because it cannot be proved through discussion or debate as to whether or not  the authors of the Creed were inspired) I leave you (it will be some time  before I post again) with the following thought authored by Eugene England  Professor of English at Brigham Young University.  Mr. England wrote the  following as part of a book review section in This People\s magazine (Spring  1993 edition):    I conclude with a little sermon because I believe we will not be a Mormon--   or human--family until we can get over labeling and rejecting each other    with terms like feminist or patriarchal liberal or conservative (Christian    or non-Christian -- Hal 8^).  When we are tempted to draw a circle around   a set of beliefs and traditions and styles and call it American then exclude   those who don\t fit it may be well to consider that perhaps the most central   defining characteristic of a good American might be one who doesn\t draw   exclusive circles -- that the surest way of excluding ourselves from the    central American ideal is by excluding others.  And when we are tempted to   draw a circle around Mormon or Christian to decide who is orthodox   and who isn\t by how much they agree with us it might be well to consider   that the central pillar of Christ\s orthodoxy is our ability to love   unconditionally those who are different and include them in our family.    I recently spent some time in a Christian bookstore in California. The   service was excellent the clerks and customers all smiling neat and   well-scrubbed and there were the expected wholesome offerings of scriptural   commentaries sentimental fiction and collections of evangelistic sermons.   But I was dismayed to find how much shelf space was given to attacking    others often viciously---whether the political left our modern American   culture or other religions.  A whole section was devoted to Cults and the   Occult and as you might expect Mormonism was right there under the same   rubric and indictment (often by the same authors) as Satanism.  And I found   I could either rent or buy (in English or Spanish) copies of The God Makers   (that absurdly inaccurate even libelous but very popular and dangerous   anti-Mormon film that uses exaclty the same techniques and even accusations   of the Nazi films that scapegoated Jews in the 1930s).    It seems to me one major indication that a person is a genuine convert to   Christ and his redemptive love is his lack of paranoia and anxiety (Perfect   love casteth out fear I John 4:18).  I have always been pleased that the   LDS Church has not engaged in attacks on other faiths though I find a    disheartening increase in willingness of individual Mormons to engage in the   same kinds of stereotyping and scapegoating---and even threats of coercive   action---as the religious right wing has launched this year against the   political left and American cultural and religious styles they don\t like.   It is a fearful irony that in so doing Mormons take common cause with the   very people who have most slanderously attacked Mormons---people who would   if they had power forcefully restrict Mormons\ rights along with those of   others they believe to be evil.   The above sermon was addressed to the LDS audience who usually subscribe to This People\s magazine but would certainly apply to all of us who rely on the mercies and grace of Jesus Christ to bring us back into His arms.    Even though the LDS Church claims devine authority to exercise the principles  of the restored gospel---as in the days of Christ the Church does not claim  perfection and infallibility in how those with authoritative status have or do  now lead the Church.  I for one do not wish to be labelled Christian if  those who profess themselves as Christians attack my beliefs because they are  intollerent (for example) of the way my religion may interpret Biblical  scriptures of the same source to have a different meaning and implication  than mainstream Christianity would give it.  Once again being in the  majority does NOT in and of itself PROVE anything except that your collective  voice is louder.  That\s really all the critics of the LDS Church have to stand on in terms of the kind of Biblical interpretation used as proof to counter  the LDS Church\ interpretation!  Using someone elses biased research of truths  and non-truths (whose to say what the mixture is?) as an authoritative tool to  disprove or discredit is not being fair to anyone least of all themselves.  Let us simply agree to disagree and share beliefs through adult discussion  and conversation
 Precisely.  There\s no objective medicine; some people get marvellous results from alternative therapy others only respond to traditional medicine.  There\s no objective physics; Einstein and Bohr have told us that.  There\s no objective reality.  LSD should be sufficient to prove that.   I consider it to be a useful fiction; an abstract ideal we can strive towards.  Like an ideal gas or a light inextensible string it doesn\t actually exist; but we can talk about things as if they were like it
 Really?  I don\t get it... Genesis first says that God created the earth then the animals
 True except that I\ve known few fundies who had enough sense to be embarrassed by Josh McDowell.  (Okay
Kent:       You say that                        ^^^^^^^^^                         Please don\t!  ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^       Name just three *really* competing Rosicrucian Orders. I have probably spent more time than you doing the same.        None of them are spin-offs from O.T.O. The opposite may be the case.   Study Harder
:  : Can you please point to something anything that proves to me that : the universe cannot possibly be explained without accepting as a fact : the existence of a god in precisely the way your holy book describes? :  : Can you please convince me that your religion is more than a very : cleverly-constructed fable and that it does indeed have some bearing : on my own personal day-to-day life?  Would you consider the word of an eye-witness (Peter) to testify to the events surrounding Jesus\ life?    2Pe 1 16  We did not follow cleverly invented stories when we told you  about the power and coming of our Lord Jesus Christ but we were   eyewitnesses of his majesty.   2Pe 1 17 For he received honor and glory from God the Father when the  voice came to him from the Majestic Glory saying This is my Son whom   I love; with him I am well pleased.   2Pe 1 18 We ourselves heard this voice that came from heaven when we  were with him on the sacred mountain.   2Pe 1 19  And we have the word of the prophets made more certain and  you will do well to pay attention to it as to a light shining in a dark  place until the day dawns and the morning star rises in your hearts.  This is a documented testimony. Perhaps further research on your part is warranted before making more statements. There is considerably more to study in Peters\ two books of testimony regarding the Messiah. It is well worth  your time
Okay I\ll bite. I should probably leave this alone but what the heck...   But didn\t he credit the actual flag design to a party member - some dentist or other? I believe he gives such credit in Mein Kampf.   Well I\m no expert but all of the histories of Nazi Germany assert this. They make reference to several scandals that occurred long before the night of the long knives. The impression that I got was that homosexuality in portions of the SA was common knowledge. Also a book (by a homosexual author whose name escapes me at the moment) called Homosexuals in History asserts that Roehm and Heines were homosexuals as well as others in Roehm\s SA circle.   Well you\re the one who is in Germany. If you don\t believe the history books look up the primary sources yourself. Those of us outside of Germany do not have access to these. You do. It seems to me that there were plenty of documented instances - several scandals the fact that on the knight of the long knives several SA members (including Heines) were found sleeping together etc. Also I believe some people were complaining about the SA\s homosexual activities (seducing young boys etc). The histories that I\ve  read make a very convincing case. None of this sounds like urban legend to me.    I know next to nothing about Irving and nothing about Funk. What precisely do you know that would contradict all of the other history books that I have read concerning the existence of homosexual Nazis? Are you trying to say that  all historians are taking part in an anti-homosexual smear? What about  homosexual writers who agree with the official history? Don\t you think they  would have found out the truth by now if Roehm and Heines were not homosexuals? I would think they would want to disassociate homosexuality from Nazism. No one  should use any connection between the two to bash homosexuals in any case.    If you are going to challenge *all* historians on this point (not just Irving) then the burden of proof is on you. Track down the references. Find out where the stories originate from. Again you are the one in Germany close to archival material - most people on the net are not.   Eh? What is your agenda here? To prove that the Nazis were heterosexuals so that you can bash heterosexuals? Does it bother you that some of the Nazis might have been homosexuals? Does this make all homosexuals bad if this is true? Of course not. And what about bisexuals? Are they half-Nazis?  I don\t know why it would be so difficult to believe that some Nazis were homosexuals. The German officer corps before WW1 for instance was notorious for its homosexuality. There were numerous scandals which rocked the German govt. during the late 19th and early 20th century. Many of the Kaiser\s friends were prosecuted - the Kaiser was no homosexual but the Germany army had a long tradition of tolerating homosexuality going far back into Prussian history - back to Frederick the Great at least who was himself a homosexual. Roehm was a  product of this Prussian officer tradition and the old German army (like the English public school system) being a well known center of homosexuality would have been quite willing to overlook Roehm\s homosexuality.  In addition some Nazis complained of homosexuality in the Hitler Youth. The Hitler Youth swallowed up all pre-Nazi youth groups and some of the various  pre-war Vandervogel Bund and Volkish youth groups were known to promote  homoerotic ideals and friendship and in many cases homosexuality itself. So  it seems to me not unlikely that there were plenty of homosexual Nazis  regardless of the official Nazi dogmas concerning the evils of homosexuality. Why should this suprise anyone? Homosexuality has always existed in all  societies - it would be most unusual if the Nazis were an exception.  No I don\t have any sources for you as I think the only kind of proof you will accept would be citations from archival material and I do not have access  to these. Nor do I intend to reread every book on the Nazis and on modern homosexuality that I have ever read - I don\t have the time. Nothing is stopping you however from chasing down those sources. Until you prove otherwise though
  Speaking as one who knows relativity and quantum mechanics I say:  Bullshit.   Speaking as one who has taken LSD I say:  Bullshit.    How could striving toward an ideal be in any way useful
 Does this organization have an official e-mail address these days? (an address for any of the SF Bay Area Lodges
I was curious to check out how many San Jose Mercury News mentioned Tyre (1990-92). Here\s the outcome from the research (condenced versions copyright San Jose Mercury news):  ---   Bombings in the two largest cities in southern Lebanon killed 11 people and  wounded 80 others. A car bomb blew up in Tyre killing 10 people and wounding  75. A man was killed and five others seriously wounded in an explosion in  Nabatiye. ---   An Israeli navy patrol boat attacked and sank a rubber guerrilla boat off  southern Lebanon early today killing the two men aboard the army command  said.         It said in a communique that a Dvora patrol boat opened fire on the  motorized rubber dinghy north of Tyre after identifying it as hostile. The army  said no one on the Israeli boat was injured. The affiliation of the slain  guerrillas was not immediately known. ---   Rival factions of the guerrilla group led by terrorist mastermind Abu Nidal  battled Sunday in Tyre Lebanon with machine guns and rocket-propelled  grenades killing at least four people and wounding 15 police said. ---  Lebanon\s mainstream Shiite Muslim militia said Thursday that it had  uncovered a network of tunnels in a southern Lebanese village where it said pro- Iranian kidnappers had held Western hostages.         Officials of the militia Amal led local journalists through the catacomb- like alleys and showed them two cells with iron doors at the village  Kawthariyet al Siyad near Tyre the ancient port city about 40 miles south of  Beirut.         The officials said they were certain that U.S. Marine Lt. Col. William R.  Higgins was detained there shortly after he was seized by gunmen on a road  outside Tyre in February 1988. -------------- ...anyway I counted 20 articles during these 3 years of reporting. I also found out the possible reason why the numbers for the inhabitants of the city is defined between 14000 and 24000. It seems that Tyre is one of the places where people from Libanon flee to during more extensive bombings so there\s a constant flow of refugees entering and leaving Tyre (articles mentioned thousands of people entering and leaving this place).  I counted 0 articles for my home town Kristinestad so from now I will consider this place to be a fishing village :-).  Cheers

Most of the key issues in the 284 line post to which I am following up are dealt with in the following post I made on talk.abortion yesterday modified to correct the next to last paragraph.  Message-ID: <nyikos.734890344@milo.math.scarolina.edu>  References: <nyikos.734360987@milo.math.scarolina.edu> <nyikos.734640769@milo.math.scarolina.edu> <1993Apr13.122356.3612@cbnewsj.cb.att.com>     Dean did not.  He called them the Great Commission but this is NOT descriptive of Jesus\s words in Matt. 10:15.  Matt. 10:14 Jerusalem Bible translation:  \tAnd if anyone does not welcome you or listen to what you have \tto say as you walk out of the house or town shake the dust \tfrom your feet.  Matt. 10:15:   \tI tell you solemnly on the day of Judgment it will not   \tgo as hard with the land of Sodom and Gomorrah as with   \tthat town.   > The above is a good description of Kaflowitz who keeps harping on  > shaking the dust off the feet but ignoring what Christ said next.    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^                                ^^^^  The highlighted words refer to Matt 10:14 and 10:15 respectively.  And Dean countered:  Actually this comment of your\s is a perfect example of what an intellectually dishonest little sparrowfart you are since I specifically acknowledged the Great Commission and the entreaty to spread the word.  In fact it is the combination of the two statements I was addressing and not just the one and for you to characterize that as ignoring the instruction to spread the word is a good example of what a dishonest little fellow you are.  Of course Matt 10:15 [quoted above] makes no mention of instruction to spread the word.  All these quotes btw are from:  Message-ID: <1993Apr13.121624.3400@cbnewsj.cb.att.com>   And I claim it correctly because my question went:  Do you too measure the goodness of a post by its entertainment value and care not a whit for such mundane things as truth and falsehood?  and the closest Dean came to an answer was:  Peter Peter Peter.  You\re just so stupid pretentious dull and generally unworthy of the value you place on yourself that the sport is all there is.  Of course this does NOT answer my question which has to do with posts in GENERAL and not my posts in particular.  Surely even Dean knows this yet he brazenly asserts otherwise reinforcing his claim with an insult:  So I now restore the answer to your question that you deleted.  If you\re still unable to figure it out ask a nice kid at the local junior high to help you.  It really doesn\t take much sophistication to understand.  On top of which I doubt that the answer is at all representative of Dean\s true frame of mind.  The insults you have seen quoted thus far are but a small sample of the stream that oozes out of Dean\s  mind throughout the 284-line post from which these quotes were taken. One wonders whether Dean\s mind is so warped as to find sport in all this.  He even dredges up a falsified account of events that transpired earlier on another thread:  You made an ass of yourself by claiming that it \t\t\t\t^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ was in the tradition of Lent to make public announcements of ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ the sins of other individuals. ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^  False.  I said it was the tradition to recall and atone for one\s sins. That I made public announcements of the sins of others --sins BTW that were a matter of public record documented in the posts of others-- is a different matter.  Many of the individuals involved are so nearly amoral that they do not see as sins what morally upright people see as sins so I pointed some of them out.  And I expressly set up a whole thread YOUR TURN to let people point out MY sins to me.  Dean again:  You made an ass of yourself by saying that my statement of the tradition of tzedukkah was somehow an attempt to paint Jews as plaster saints thereby revealing your inability to understand the discussion as well as showing your dislike for people saying positive things about Jews and now you show your intellectual dishonesty by repeatedly ignoring the simple argument being made and then claiming I am ignoring the very argument I acknowledge.  Actually what happened was that Dean made it seem like ANY Jew who gave alms or did other acts of charity in public was a hypocrite according to Jewish customs.  In doing so he was caricaturing Jewish customs as being almost impossibly demanding as well as implicitly slandering all Jews who make public their acts of charity.  I went very easily on Dean for this giving him the benefit of the doubt in a post following my initial crack about plaster saints  suggesting that he had been merely careless in his wording.  In an astonishing act of ingratitude Dean now serves up an incredibly distorted picture of what took place between us
I recently read an article in a local paper written by an Islamic   person who was upset with the way Islam has been portrayed by western media.   When a terrorist action takes place in the middle east it is always played   up as an Islamic Terrorist.  However when the a Serbian terrorist attacks   the Croations its not a Christian terrorist its just a terrorist. \tI have often tried to explain this to some close friends who believe   the press that Islam is somehow tied to violence.  Often times you hear   things like They just don\t value human life like we do... and so on.   I was wondering if anyone out there had any suggestions for how we can   change this image or how I can help my friends to see that this is just    hype.  I would appreciate any serious suggestions or comments via e-mail
 I hope I didn\t award custody Rich.  I purposely used handle in order to  avoid doing so - i.e. that happens to be what religions do (of course there are aberrations like scientific creationism).  I used best in part to indicate  that science currently has a time of it with why and who so these domains are mostly ignored.  I also attempted to be brief which no doubt confused the matter.  As an aside for science I should have written how and when.  Nobody seems to argue over what.   Seems to me that the answer would vary from individual to individual.  I\m not trying to be evasive on this but from a societal perspective religion works. On the other hand sometimes it is abused and misused and many suffer which you know.  But the net result seems positive this from the anthropological perspective on human affairs.  You might call me a neo-Fruedian insofar as I  think the masses can\t get along without religion.  Not that generally they are  incapable; they just don\t and for myriad reasons but the main one seems to  be the promise of immortality.  Very seductive that immortality.  Therefore  it seems that theologians are better equipped than the others you mention for  dispensing answers to who and why.  I suggest that this holds regardless of  the truth in their answers to who and why simply because people believe.   In the end spiritual beliefs are just as real as scientific facts and  explanation (CAUTION TO SOME: DO NOT TAKE THIS OUT OF CONTEXT).     No.  In fact I don\t think it is closed now at least for some individuals.  Isn\t there a group of theoretical physicists who argue that matter was  created from nothing in a Big Bang singularity?  This approach might  presuppose an absence of who and why except that it seems it could be argued  that something had to be responsible for nothing?  Maybe that something doesn\t have to be supernatural maybe just mechanistic.  But that\s a tough one for people today to grasp.  In any case theory without empirical data is not  explanation but then your question does not require data.  In other words  I agree that theorizing (within scientific parameters) is just as scientific  as explaining.  So the answer is who and why are not closed to scientists but  I sense that science in these realms is currently very inadequate.  Data will  be necessary for improvement and that seems a long way off if ever.  Pretty  convoluted here; I hope I\ve made sense.     I agree generally.  But I prefer to put it this way - the *questions* of how  when who and why were not open to inquiry.  During the Enlightenment  reason was reponsible for questioning the theological answers to how and when  and not for the most part who and why.  Science was thus born out of the  naturalists\ curiosity eventually carting away the how and when while largely  leaving behind the who and why.  The ignorant the selfish the intolerant and the arrogant of course still claim authority in all four domains.    Much obliged.  Funny how facts tend to muddle things isn\t it?  Well I am sure there are plenty of scientific creationist rebuttals out there  somewhere even if they have to be created from nothing.  [just for the record again AMH = anatomically modern humans]   Best regards :-)
  There is a rite like this described in Joseph Campbell\s _Occidental_Mythology_.  He also described levels of initiation I think 6?  I don\t know where Campbell got his info but I remember thinking he was being a little eclectic.   Quite a bit.  If you haven\t read Campbell
Just to remark that I have heard that David Koresh has risen from  the dead.  I dont know if it is true or not
 Sorry but it doesn\t matter what _you_ think I am a Christian who happens to belong to the LDS Church.  [The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-Day Saints].  I don\t usually read t.r.m.  It is truly informative to stop by and see that there are still people in the world like those that forced my ancestors into the deserts of Utah and then out of the country entirely.  (My grandmother was born in Mexico where her family had moved to escape religious persecution in the US).  I\m willing to admit that members of other churches are Christians if they believe in Christ and (try to) follow his teachings even though they have different interpretations of  the bible.  And yet these other churches often go out of their way to define whether or not I am considered to be Christian.  Could someone mail me a set of rules/beliefs that must be followed to be a Christian?  Does this set of rules exclude other large bodies of believers?    I know this is a waste of everyone\s time this has probably been discussed N times
 Maybe not to you.  But to those who stand on this base
: Oh yeah?  Well---*I* know of ....  Anyways cannibalism is much more commmon than those who feel that it is wrong (and then point out that the fact that western civilisation doesn\t do it is PROOF positive that we are more advanced) would have us believe.  Cannibalism is often used in funeral ceremonies as a way of keeping the deceased loved one alive.  Many other cultures (including many American Indian cultures) eat/ate the flesh of slain enemies often as a way of showing respect for the valor of the departed.  Hearts are often favored for this as it contains the spirit.  Have you ever read or seen Alive which is the story of the Argentinian boys soccer team that crashed in the Andes and then ate the bodies of those who died in order to survive?  Finger lickin good.  How about the Twighlight Zone episode To Serve Man?  If you want more info on this a good place to start is on sci.anthropology  Now send me $20 and eat my flesh
 Wrong about what?   I think they are correct in thinking that a  well-placed bomb or six would get headlines but I think they are  wrong if they think that you can set off bombs and still be a  Buddhist.  Maybe what we are seeing here is that Chinese cultural genocide against the Tibetans has worked well enough that some Tibetans  are now no longer Buddhist and are instead willing to behave like the Chinese occupiers.   Every action is its own reward.   On the other hand people who are aware of the occupation are mostly full of admiration for the peaceful way that Tibetans have put up with it.   And what does it cost us to admire them?   Zip.   Yes they are and whether this serves them well or not depends on  whether they want Buddhist principles or political independence. And without political independence can they preserve their cultural and religious traditions?   The Chinese would certainly refer to them as terrorists just as the Hitler regime used to refer to European resistance movements as terrorists.   Better off in what way?   As proponents of pacifism or as  proponents of political autonomy?  And better off in what time-scale?   The Soviet Empire practised cultural genocide against something like a hundred small minorities some of which resisted violently and some of which did not but in the end it was the Soviet Empire that collapsed and at least some of the minorities survived.  Now some of the minorities are fighting one another.    Is that because they have to
  (Deletion)   Since this drivel is also crossposted to alt.atheism how about reading the alt.atheism FAQ? The Josephus quote is concidered to be a fake even by Christian historians
  : medtronic.COM (Dale M. Skiba) entirely missed my point in my previous  : COMMENT:  : Shortly after that post I realized two things:  I was running a fever of : over 102 and that I probably should not have gone directly from reading : alt.slack to posting on this august newsgroup.  : >: >it is not ad hominen to point out that Mr Archer willingly prints blatant : >: lies : >: >in defense of Bible inerrancy and thus is worthless as an expert witness.  : >: Okay Im game give us a listing of blatant lies from _Encyclopedia of : >: Biblical Difficulties_ or other Archer writings.  : >That would be interesting.  If only a very short list can be generated : >I think it is more likely that Mr. Archer with his inerancy mindset is : >not always impartial and made a doozy of a mistake.  (IMHO I also think : >that this mindset tends to generate these sorts of mistakes...)  : >On the other hand if a long list can be generated it is more likely : >that Mr. Archer intentionally uses deception in hs books. (Why should : >he be deceptive just with Tyre?)  : So Archer is just sitting around rubbing his hands and plotting how next : to deceive?  OK lets _see_ the list...  This was an open question.  I assumed that if Mr. Archer is a chronic liar someone whould have documented it.   This assumption is based on how talk.origins regulars have documented numerous cases of Creationist deceptions (such as Duane Guish and his friends).  No long list of Archer mistakes has yet been given

What are the consequences of the homophobic ranting of the self-righteous?  Well I just noted this on another group and thought I\d pass it along.  The context is talk.origins and a report of yet another debate that was nothing but an attempt at mindless bullying and factless assertion by a standard-issue Creationist.  The writer reflects that the behavior reported reminds him of some Christian groups he has known.  I believe that the writer is a (non-homosexual) Christian:  +\tThere is a very effective technique used to promote +\tunit cohesion among the Soldiers of the Lord.  It is +\tcalled witnessing...  I\ve seen this process used well +\tand poorly; the near devil worship I mention was a group  +\t... that was using the witnessing to get people lathered +\tup to go kill homosexuals or at least terrorize them off  +\tcampus as it was clearly God\s will that they do so.  I have deleted the specifics of the location as I do not believe it characteristic of the place (a state in which I spent my formative first 10 years) though it *does* have unfortunately
 I live in Colorado and have never heard of such a group.  Obviously claims  that their posters are appearing all over Colorado are a tad overdone...    Hardly.  Saying that homosexuality is a sin is a far cry from  Working for a fag-free America.  Saying that I wouldn\t want  a homosexual babysitting for my kids doesnt mean I endorse  Against Immoral Gross Homosexual Trash.     And now we have homosexual advocates telling us that if we don\t teach  our kids that homosexuality is natural and a perfectly acceptable  alternative lifestyle then they will have it done for us.  No thanks.    Absolutely.  And the message is always go and sin no more.  Not  Go and do whatever feels good.     This sounds real nice but struck me as a little odd.  You\re  presenting yourself as if you were a straight Xian who is sticking his neck out and taking on the challenge of speaking out in support  of gays in the church.  But I was under the impression that you yourself are gay.  That\s all well and fine
sm[?]>a real Christian unless you\re born again is a very fundamental biblical sm[?]>conversion and regeneration are \probably\ part of some small USA-based cult   Some of these cults which seems like a rather dismissive term to me are pretty big here in the USA.  Most of them are quite respectable & neiborly & do not resemble Branch Davidians in the least; confusing them is a mistake.  What about live & let live folks?  I\m sure we can uncover a few extremist loonies who are Catholic -- the anti-abortion movement in the USA seems to have a few hard cases in it for example.   I have to agree Matthew with this; I have certainly encountered a lot of anti-Catholic-religion propaganda & emotion (& some bigotry) from members of certain religious groups here.  They also practice their missionary work with zeal among Catholics in the United States but to someone who is or was raised Catholic such rhetoric is pretty off-putting.  It may work better in an environment where there\s a lot of popular anti-clericalism.  Follow-ups set elsewhere
  Brian have you checked out what your priests told you in the Bible to see whether they were telling you the truth?  Did you know that according to the Bible there shouldn\t even be such things as priests anymore?  Do you know why the preisthood was established in the Old Testament to begin with and the reasons why after Jesus there were no priests--that is until the Roman Catholic Church  300 years later devised the doctrine of transubstantiation by ignoring the whole concept beyond the book of Hebrews?  You said you analyzed the Bible very closely.  I think you are lying.  For if you had
   Brian
   Lev 17:11: For the life of the flesh is in the blood and I have given   it to you upon the altar to make atonement for your souls; for it is   the blood that makes atonement for the soul.  The Old Testament was very big on the eye for an eye business.  It makes sense that Leviticus would support physical injury to repay moral wrongdoing.  I know about sanctification.  I\ve been taught all about it in Sunday school catechism class and theology classes.  But even after all that I still can\t accept it.  Maybe I\m still not understanding it or maybe I\m just understanding it all too well.  From the bottom of my heart I know that the punishment of an innocent man is wrong.  I\ve tried repeatedly over the course of several years to accept it but I just can\t.  If this means that I can\t accept the premise that a god who would allow this is \perfectly good\ then so be it.   If you can explain to me why the death of Jesus was a *good* thing then I would be very glad to hear it and you might even convert me. Be warned however that I\ve heard all the most common arguments before
 The idea of an apostacy did not originate with Lucy Smith or Joseph Smith or the Mormons.  The idea of a restoration was quite common in the early 19th century USA.  Alexander Campbell founder of the group that now survives with the name Disciples of Christ preached that the primitive church had been lost and was attempting to restore it (although not be revelations).  Many Cambellites subsequently became Mormons including co-founder Sidney Rigdon.  Actually you can find such sentiments in many of the early protestants of the reformation such as Martin Luther. --  ---------------------------------------------------------------------------- Gordon Banks  N3JXP      | Skepticism is the chastity of the intellect
Just a few cheap shots a Christianity:  Riddle: What is the shortest street in Jerusalem? Answer: The Street of the Righteous Poles.  Limrick:  There was an archeologist Thostle Who found an amazing fossil By the way it was bent And the knot it the end \twas the penis of Paul the Apostle.  Jingle: Christianity hits the spot Twelve Apostles thats a lot Jesus Christ and a Virgin too Christianity\s the faith for you (with apologies to Pepsi Cola and its famous jingle)  Riddle: How many Christians does it take to save a light bulb. Answer: None
Tony-  I read your post it was nothing new I had seen much the same in other typicalChristian anti-gay sentimental literature.  Gay people are and will con- tinue to be persecuted as long as such propaganda petpetuates.  You may be unaware of all the statistica findings concerning African-Americans that have been published and used by various groups to re-enforce their own bias against African-Americans.  We usually think of the KKK in these instances but there are many other groups.  Of course the vast majority of the public scoff at such findings and documents today but that was not always the case. Fortunately African-Americans had whites who supported their \cause\ and public sentiment was eventually (if not entirely) turned around.  There was even a Civil War and anti-negro sentiment increased.  In fact until laws were put in place to protect the inalienable rights of Blacks it was pretty much legal to discriminate against them.  I know many gays and I will NOT turn my back on them or their right to be free form discrimination.  You may think that I have been deceived or something that is your perogative.  My church Christian Church (Disciples of Christ) openly affirms the rights of oppressed people of all segments of society including gays.  We believe the Gospel message of preaching to all creation and making disciples.  We believe in the Lord\s great commandment to Love and we beleive in standing up for the oppressed even if it is not popular to do so.  I really like my church for last reason the most.  I can find a church almost anywhere in the valley that stands for the Gospel and believes in the commandment of Love (though I\m hard-pressed to find many who actually sho Love) but not many are willing to champion the oppressed especially within their own community.  I may have lost face with the greater Christian community for the unpopularity of my beliefs but so did the abolitionists against the oppression of African-Americans.  Many were even killed and treated as runaway slaves for being nigger-lovers and such.  I guess I\ve decided the challenge is worth it.  In my talks with gay men and women I have heard tragic story after tragic story centering around failed marriages wives and husbands who are straight who have been hurt in the process etc.  Funny thing is I don\t know of one case where the parents ex-wives or even children have continued to reject their gay family member (son daughter ex-husband father etc.) after they began to take part in some form of support group like PFLAG.  I\m apalled by the legislation which passed in Colorado and am equally out0 raged that such slimey people as Louis Sheldon (from the Tradition Values Coalition) have been actively working in the Christian underground to garner support within several (8 I believe) states this coming November for more oppressive legisation against gays.  Perhaps you don\t get it and maybe you never will.  Many didn\t get it in the Middle Ages and the proclaimed God\s will be done as they massacred thousands in witch hunts and inquisitions.  The message that comes through loud and clear by proponents against gay rights and against gays in general is that there is a strong dislike even hatred for gays whether you want to call it such or not (it doesn\t change the results).  The major flaw in all this posturing is that in the end the final effect of posts like that of yours and Mr. Hudson is that YOU have a conditional love for gays.  Condition:  Change and we\ll love you. This is sure strange coming from a group who claim that God has an unconditional love one that calls people just as they are.  Sure there are things that will \naturally\ change and habits (like alcoholism wife beating etc.) that need to be changed through some sort of therapy.  But then there are things like left-handedness etc. that no amount of beating it out of people is going to result in anything more than an outward conforminty to other people\s expectations. In the process this coerced conformity causes many people a great deal of harm especially when it is caused by people who have nothing more to gain from it that to become even more puffed up about their own sense of pseuper-spirituality.  This is sad but I thoroughly believe that one day it will change.  It may be unpopular to cry for justice and equality when the basis has to do with something very personal like \sexuality\ (a taboo subject even today) but I firmly believe in the rights of individuals to be free from impose regulation on thier bedrooms.  It\s funny that most straight people have successfully removed restrictive and oppressive legislation against invasive legislation but we like to maintain this little chestnut of repression...as though it helps us maintain a sense of superiority over at least one segment of society. Gay people are not criminals.  Another interesting thing happened recently.  A very prominent charismatic church in the Silicon Valley (here) had two of it\s pastors arrested for self- admitted charges of pederasty (men having sex with boys).  This had apparently been going on for some time (a couple years?) but since the charges were voluntary and the church worked closely with the police so I imagine that was how they managed to downplay it in the media.  How could such a thing happen when the church itself has an ex-gay ministry?  One of my friends recently told me he was approached by someone who is going through the reparitive therapy there and he was thoroughly convinced that the request for dinner was not an invitation to attend the ministry.  These are difficult times we live in but providing hostile environments and creating and perpetuating an atmosphere that breed hate and violence is not the call of the Christian community.  The results of the passing amendment in Colorado has created an organization who\s posters are appearing all over Colorado called S.T.R.A.I.G.H.T. (I forget the whole definition off hand but the last part was Against Immoral Gross Homosexual Trash) and their motto is Working for a fag-free America with an implicit advocation for violence.  This is sick and it seems to be what you and Mr. Hudson and others are embracing.  We Christians have a LOOOOOOOOOONG tradition of coersion and oppression towards those we feel don\t \measure up\ and constant beratement from organizations like The Christian Research Institute while they do have a good purpose also their major work seems to be finding new and better ways of excluding people.  The Gospel I believe is not so negative rather it seeks ways to include people.  I have several of Dr. Martin\s books and find them quite helpful especially concerning \cults.\ But it seems that CRI
  And I think we ought to hold Christ accoountable for all of his followers  who died at the hand of the Romans also. It was their own fault for believing.  God
  Brian K. guess what?  You missed the point.  On a scale from cold to hot you are at 0 degrees Kelvin.   Then as you understand it what is it?   Yes.  I agree with that.  But what does that have to do with Jesus? Punishment you say?  Jesus did not regard his death as punishment.    Good.  I wouldn\t either--not the way you understand it.     Ask Jesus himself.  He himself said why in John 12:23-32.  It isn\t a mystery to anyone and there certainly is no need for a persuasive argument.   Read Jesus\s own reply to your question.  Jesus gives more reasons in John 16:7.  But one obvious reason why Jesus died (and as with everything else it has nothing do with his punishment) was that he could rise to life again--so that we would stop doubting and believe (John 21:27).  The fact that Jesus rose from the dead is my hope that I too will rise from the dead.  It is an obvious point.  Do not overlook it. Without this obvious point I would have no hope and my faith would be vanity.  Why did Jesus suffer in his death?  Again ask Jesus.  Jesus says why in John 15:18-25.   That\s no mystery either.  The world hates him without reason.  It is a direct proclamation of how far we humans botch things up and thus
 Jehovah\s Witnesses do not believe that Christians are required to observe the Sabbath
   Are you your own master?  Do you have any habits that you cannot break? For one you seem unable to master your lack of desire to understand even the slightest concept of the Bible.  Seems that ignorance has you mastered.  How about sexual sins?  Gotta any of those secret desires in your head that you harbor but can get control of?   Do you dehumanize women when they walk past you?  Do you degrade them to a sex object in your head?  Are you the master of that kind of thinking?  Do you insult people unknowingly then regret it later.  Yet do it again the next time opportunity presents itself?  Are you truly the master of yourself?  I have admitted that I am not the master of my thought life at all times. That I sometimes say things I do want to say and then repeat my mistake unwantingly.  I have admitted to myself that I cannot control every aspect of my being.  There are times I know I shouldn\t say something but then say it anyway.  There are times I simply forget a lesson. I in fact am not my own master.  I need help.  Jesus promised me this help.  And I took him up on his offer.  I have willfully let Jesus be my master because Jesus knows what is better for me than I myself do.  And why not?  Does not the creator know his creation better than the creation?  Does Toyota know what\s better for the Corolla than the Corolla?   Then I guess ignorance is bliss for you.  Because Brian you enjoy not having a clue about the Bible.       Can you witness motherly love with your senses?  How does caring and concern for you register with your senses?  If nothing registers to you other than what you can see taste smell hear and touch then you better become a Vulcan and fast.  You better get rid of your emotions.  And I do have a good reason to believe what I do.    The topic was about my God and your lack of knowledge about what my God says.   My God says that you will not CEASE EXISTING.  You have life forever.  You can choose to either live it in hell in eternal torment where there is no communication whatsoever or can choose to  live it in paradise with God.  That is what my God says.  And that was the issue.  Your made-up theism is what it is--made up.  It\s wishful thinking.    Is this the religion of Kendigianism?  Most people are not Christian.  Most people including Christians  are not fond of feeling that they are imperfect.  Is the world an undesireable place a doctrine of Kendigianism?  It has nothing to do with my God.  Does Kendigism have magical mystical prayers as a part of its worship? Mine doesn\t.  Does Kendigianism believe that the world will be holy again?   Mine doesn\t.  Does Kendigianism also dictate that one must obey what the priest tells them like good little sheep?  Mine doesn\t.  Is this a bunch of lies you tell yourself so that you can justify being  ignorant of the Bible?  Brian following Christ has nothing to do with the doctrines of Kendigianism. You would find any of your doctrines in the Bible.   I don\t follow Kendigianism. I follow Christ.   Also to try to again show you your ignorance of Christ and the Bible in regards to priests  have you not read about the sole Melchizedek priest in Hebrews 7 and 8?  Have you not read what the purpose is of the Old Testament Levitical priesthood and why there should NOT be priests today?  Yes guess what?  The Catholics messed up.  I do not follow Catholicism or any ism.  I follow Christ.   Why would you want to live a good life? To you


 Christian:  washed in the blood of the lamb. Mithraist:  washed in the blood of the bull.  If anyone in .netland is in the process of devising a new religion do not use the lamb or the bull because they have already been reserved.  Please choose another animal
 #Rick Anderson replied to my letter with... # #ra> In article <C5ELp2.L0C@acsu.buffalo.edu> #ra>  (...)  # Just briefly on something that you mentioned in passing. You refer to # differing interpretations of create and say that many Christians may # not agree. So what? That is really irrelevant. We do not base our faith # on how many people think one way or another do we? The bottom line is # truth regardless of popularity of opinions.  It may be irrelevant to you and *your* personal beliefs (or should I say bias?) but it is relevant to me and many others.  You\re right the bottom line IS truth independant from you or anyone else.  Since you proclaim truths as a self-proclaimed appointee may I ask you by what authority you do this?  Because it says so in the Bible?  --Does the Bible say so or is it YOU or someone else who interprets whether a scripture or doctrine conforms to your particular liking or disapproval?  Excuse moi but your line of truths haven\t moved me one bit to persuade me that my beliefs are erroneous.  Of all the preachers of truth on this net you have struck me as a self-righteous member of the wrecking crew with no positive message to me or other latter-day saints whatsoever. BTW this entire discussion reminds me a lot of the things said by Jesus to the pharisees: ye hypocrite(s) . . . ye preach about me with your lips but your hearts are far removed from me...  # Also I find it rather strange that in trying to persuade that created # and eternally existent are equivalent you say granted the Mormon # belief... You can\t grant your conclusion and then expect the point to # have been addressed. In order to reply to the issue you have to address # and answer the point that was raised and not just jump to the # conclusion that you grant.  Sophistry.  Look who\s talking: jumping to conclusions?  You wouldn\t do that yourself right?  All YOU address is your own convictions regardless whether we come up with any Biblical scriptures which supports our points of view because you reject such interpretations without any consideration whatsoever.  # # The Bible states that Lucifer was created.  The Bible states that Jesus # is the creator of all. The contradiction that we have is that the LDS # belief is that Jesus and Lucifer were the same.  A beautiful example of disinformation and a deliberate misrepresentation of lds doctrine.  The former KGB would have loved to employ you. Jesus and lucifer are not the same silly and you know it.  (...)  # The Mormon belief is that all are children of God. Literally. There is # nothing symbolic about it. This however contradicts what the Bible # says. The Bible teaches that not everyone is a child of God:  Correction: it may contradict would YOU think the Bible says.  The Bible indeed does teach that not all are children of God in the sense that they belong to or follow God in His footsteps.  Satan and his followers have rebelled against God and are not children (=followers/redeemed) of God but it doesn\t mean that they were not once created by God but chose to separate themselves from those who chose to follow God and His plan of salvation.  # #        The field is the world; the good seed are the children of the #        kingdom; but the tares are the children of the wicked one; #        (Matthew 13:38)  kingdom are those who have remained valiant in their testimony of Jesus (and have shown works of repentance etc.) and the children of the wicked one are those who rebelled against God and the lamb.  The issue of satan\s spirit-offspring (and those who followed him) has not been addressed in this and other verses you copied from your Bible.  You purposefully obscured the subject by swamping your right with non- related scriptures.  (...lots of nice scriptures deleted (NOT Robert W. copyrighted) though...)  #ra> > We are told that And this is life eternal that they might know #ra> > thee the only true God and Jesus Christ whom thou hast sent. #ra> > (John 17:3). Life eternal is to know the only true God. Yet the #ra> > doctrines of the LDS that I have mentioned portray a vastly #ra> > different Jesus a Jesus that cannot be reconciled with the Jesus of #ra> > the Bible. They are so far removed from each other that to proclaim  Correction: my Jesus is indeed different than your Jesus and CAN be reconciled with the Jesus in the Bible.  --Not your interpretation of Him I concur but I honestly couldn\t care less.  #ra> > one as being true denies the other from being true. According to the #ra> > Bible eternal life is dependent on knowing the only true God and #ra> > not the construct of imagination.  In this single posting of yours I\ve seen more constructs of imagination than in all of the pro-lds mails combined I have read so far in this news group.  First get your lds-facts straight before you dare preaching to us about the only true God whom you interpret according to your own likes and dislikes but whose image I cannot reconcile with what I know about Him myself.  I guess your grandiose self-image does not allow for other faiths believing in the divinity of Jesus Christ but in a different way or fashion than your own.  Not that it really matters the mission and progress of the lds church will go on boldly and nobly and no mob or opponent can stop the work from progressing until it has visited every continent swept every clime and sounded in every ear.  #  This is really a red herring. It doesn\t address any issue raised but #  rather it seeks to obfuscate. The fact that some groups try to read #  something into the Bible doesn\t change what the Bible teaches.  Sigh.  What the Bible teaches?  Or: what the bible teaches according to Robert Weiss and co.?  I respect the former I reject the latter without the remotest feeling that I have rejected Jesus.  On the contrary.  And by the way I do respect your interpretations of the Bible I even grant you being a Christian (following your own image of Him) as much as I am a Christian (following my own image of Him in my heart).  (...)  #  Most of the other replies have instead hop-scotched to the issue of #  Bruce McConkie and whether his views were \official doctrine.\ I don\t #  think that it matters if McConkie\s views were canon. That is not the #  issue.  Were McConkie\s writings indicative of Mormon belief on this #  subject is the real issue. The indication from Rick is that they may #  certainly be.  The issue is of course that you love to use anything to either mis- represent or ridicule the lds church.  The issue of official doctrine is obviously very important.  McConkie\s views have been controversial (e.g. The Seven Deadly Heresies has made me a heretic!  ;-) at best or erroneous at worst (blacks not to receive the priesthood in this dispensation).  I respect him as someone who has made his valuable contribution to the church but I personally do NOT rely on his personal interpretations (his book Mormon Doctrine is oftentimes referred to as McConkie\s Bible in mormon circles) on mormon doctrine.  I rather look to official (doctrinal) sources and... to Hugh Nibley\s books! (The last comment is an lds-insider reference.)  Summarizing: McConkie was a wise man who contributed undoubtedly far more to the kingdom of God than I have but whose views are by no means dogma or accepted doctrine some of it clearly belongs to personal interpretation and speculation.  But having said this
930418  Do what thou wilt shall be the whole of the Law. [Honestly.] The word of Sin is Restriction. [Would I kid you?]   Does one man\s words encompass the majestic vision of thousands of individuals?  Quoting a man is not the same as quoting the Order.  Taken out of context words can be interpreted much differently than had one applied them within the confines of their original expression.  I think this is the case regarding Hymenaeus Beta Frater Superior  of the Order to which I belong.  When he included that bit from Merlinus X\ he did us all a service.  He showed us the extremes to which Order members have been known to go in their fervor. I have little knowledge regarding Reuss\ background but surely he was an unusual man and he was an important force in the Order  for many years.  Yet as people change so do Orders change and while we look back so carefully at the dirty laundry of O.T.O. remember that this is only the surface skim and that many perspectives are now encompassed which extend beyond any one individual.  I hope to show that there was and is much room for a difference of opinion within the Order itself perhaps by testing the limits myself.   Let us examine this issue a bit more closely....  In 1895 Karl Kellner (1850-1905) a wealthy Austrian industrialist and paper chemist as well as a high-grade Mason founded the Ordo Templi Orientis.  Kellner had traveled widely in the East where he met three adepts who instructed him specific magical practices.   Kellner\s efforts to develop the Order were later assisted by Franz Hartmann Heinrich Klein and Theodore Reuss who had worked together prior to joining the O.T.O.  The Order was first proclaimed in 1902 in Reuss\s Masonic publication \Oriflamme\.  On Kellner\s death Reuss succeeded him as Outer Head [O.H.O.].  The \Jubilee\ edition of the \Oriflamme\ published in 1912 announced that the Order taught secret of sexual magic.   Theodore Reuss was an interesting character.  Born June 28 1855 in Augsburg he entered Masonry in 1876.  He was a singer journalist and possibly a spy for the Prussian political police infiltrating the Socialist League founded by Karl Marx\s daughter and her husband.  Reuss was later associated with William Wynn Westcott a leader of the Golden Dawn who later introduced him to John Yarker.  Yarker chartered Reuss to found the Rites of Memphis and Mizraim in Germany.  After several attempts to concretize various Masonic Rites Reuss settled on the development of the O.T.O.  The Order experienced reasonably steady growth under Reuss\ leadership. For example he chartered Papus in France Rudolph Steiner in Berlin and H. Spencer Lewis in the USA.  In 1912 the historic meeting between Reuss and Crowley occurred.  Crowley wrote that Reuss came to him and accused him of revealing Order secrets.  When Crowley looked at it afresh the initiated interpretation of sexual magick unfolded itself to him for the first time.  Reuss appointed Crowley as Supreme and Holy King of all the English speaking world and it was this authorization that he invoked when publishing the material of the Equinox.  Reuss resigned as Outer Head of the Order in 1922 after suffering a stroke and named Crowley his successor.  All was well until 1925 when _The Book of the Law_ was translated into German.  There was a break in the continuity of the Order.  Manyk members split with the new O.H.O. over the book which Crowley was actively promulgating through the Order. He had earlier revise dthe Order rituals at Reuss\s request deeply infusing the doctrines of the New Aeon revelation.  _An Introduction to the History of the O.T.O._ by Ad Veritatem IX\  Within _Equinox III:10_ Edited by    Hymenaeus Beta Frater Superior Rex Summus Sanctissimus     Caliph of the United States of America       Published by Samuel Weiser 1990.    There are many possible reasons that our Frater Superior included this material in _Equinox III:10_.  And this is the real point is it not? Why did he wish to publish such things about the history of his own organization?  Does he represent a dogmatic threat to the principle of Thelema?  Or is he exercising his True Will and putting forth very complex pictures with no easy answers?  A picture which leaves room for very many interpretations.  It is quite easy for me to see for example that all of O.T.O. derived out of the dribble of faltering Masonry purchased by clever hucksters with an ounce of courage and some writing ability to aid them.  And I can take that all the way down to our present Caliph whose feeble support of the \Law of Thelema\ is laughable at best.  Would I be thrown out of the Order for speaking in this way?   Will I?   I think not. Why?  Because my Frater will see it as a perspective an interjection I am using as an example.  My illustration shows that we may express things in the context of a larger work and the true significance of this may be quite difficult to apprehend at first.  So it may be with OTO and Merlinus X\.  Please look O.T.O. more carefully. I do not support Reuss\s words myself as I am not qualified to assess them and I am critical of their pomposity.  If I who am a member of the Order take such a stand and am allowed to continue doing so then what can this say about the health of the Order?  Does it mean that the Order has \gone soft\ and abandoned its moral principles?  Or does it mean that it is strong in its ability to let the will of universal kinship arise on its own not shackled by some dogmatic requirement?  How shall we resolve these two possibilities?   I find a high calibre of individual associated with Ordo Templi Orientis. They are often quite intelligent and sometimes very well versed in arcane or usual information.  They are quite often artists and geniuses.   Having met some 20 longstanding members in the SF Bay Area (many who are or were very heavily involved with the Order) I can vouch for the integrity of the organization as it stands.  I have sometimes questioned the policy of Hymenaeus Beta.  In these moments  I followed my intuition and I\ve found little to stop me from requesting a Second initiation from a different O.T.O. body.  I\m happily participating in social groups (Feasts or Initiations) and have come to know the Gnostic Mass well enough for my tastes.    This doesn\t make me an authority on Order politics and explanations however. I can only hypothesize and relay to you what I understand based on my limited contact with other members.  I urge you not to take the words of Merlinus X too far.  There are many ways to interpret words and many people who have become involved with the Order feel very strongly about the sanctity of personal freedom and the preservation of individual vision.  I welcome other comment on this issue and will be writing more in response to other posts in this thread.   Invoke me under my stars.  Love is the law
 Well if they were Satanists or followers of an obscure religion then I would be sure that Christians would in unison condemn and  make this to a show case. But when we are dealing with a fanatical Revelation preacher that kills ultimately everyone including the innocent children then it seems that we are dealing with Christians  and christians (note the spelling).    And does not this show the dangers with religion -- in order  word a mind virus that will make mothers capable of letting their small children burn to ashes while they scream?  Cheers
  There were many injustices in the middle ages.  And this is truely sad. I would hate to see a day when churches put people to death or torchured them for practicing homosexuality or any other crime.  The church is not called to take over the governments of the world.  It may be that homosexuals treated cruelly today but that does not mean that we should teach  Christians to practice homosexual immorality.  Do you think that we should also teach Christians to practice divination and channelling because the witches in the middle ages were persecuted.    And you accuse me of judging?  When did you look into my heart and see if I have love.  I have been writing that we should not teach Christians to practice homosexual immorality and you pretend to have divine knowledge to look into my heart.  I can\t say that I love homosexuals as I should- I can\t say that I love my neighbor as I should either.  I don\t know very many homosexuals as it is.    But Jesus loves homosexuals just as He loves everyone else.  If His love were conditional I not know Him at all.  Yes.  We should show love to  homosexuals but it is not love to encourage brothers in the church to  stumble and continue in their sin.  That is a very damaging and dangerous  thing.   That is slander.   I could just as easily say  that NAMBLA has been able to implement legislation to make child molesting easier because of the tearing down of societies morality due to people accepting homosexuality as normal and that this is what you are embracing.  I do believe that homosexual sex is immoral that does not mean I endorse using violence against them.  There is a problem of hatred in the church.  But there is also the problem of what has been called unsanctified mercy. Many in the conservative churches have seen the moral breakdown in  this country and the storm on the horizon and have gotten militant in  the flesh.  This is truely sad.  Yet others in other churches have  embraced immorality in society
 Have you informed your wife of this prioritization?  This board will have  Thou hast used my name in vain!  I never coerce.  Ridicule maybe
}>}(a) out of context; }>Must have missed when you said this about these other promises of god that we keep }>getting subjected to.  Could you please explain why I am wrong and they are OK? }>Or an acknowledgement of public hypocrisy. Both or neither. } }So according to you Jim the only way to criticize one person for }taking a quote out of context without being a hypocrite is to post a }response to *every* person on t.r.m who takes a quote out of context?  Did I either ask or assert that?  Or is this your misaimed telepathy at work again?  }>BTW to David Josli:  I\m still waiting for either your public }>acknowledgement of your }>telepathy and precognition (are you a witch?) or an appology and retraction. } }Can you wait without whining? To pass the time maybe you should go }back and read the portions of my article that you so conveniently }deleted in your reply.  You\ll find most of your answers there.    Nope:  In particular: Example of telepathy?  What threat.  Produce it.  More telepathy?  Or maybe just empathic telepathy
 Can we assume from this statement that you are >unequivocally< saying that AMORC is not a spin off of OTO? .. and that in fact OTO may well be a spin off of AMORC?? i would be quite interested in hearing what evidence you have to support this claim.    Study Smarter
 OK here\s at least one Christian\s answer:  Jesus was a JEW not a Christian.  In this context Matthew 5:14-19 makes sense.  Matt 5:17 Do not think that I [Jesus] came to abolish the Law or the Prophets; I did not come to abolish but to fulfill.  Jesus lived under the Jewish law.  However He was the culmination of the promises of the Prophets.  He came to *fulfill* the prophecies and fully obey God\s purposes.  Verse 18 says For truly I say to you until heaven and earth pass away not the smallest letter or stroke shall pass away from the Law until all is accomplished.  The key to this verse IMHO is the last  phrase.  Jesus as the fulfillment of the law accomplished what the  Law was supposed to accomplish.    Verse 19:  Whoever then annuls one of the least of these commandments and so teaches others shall be called least in the kingdom of heaven; but whoever keeps and teaches them he shall be called great in the kingdom of heaven.  Taken in the context of Jesus teaching Jewish  people about living lives under the law this makes sense.  In general it appears that Jesus is responding to some criticism he  must have received about doing away with the Law.  That was not  Jesus\ intent at all.  He had come to earth to live the Law as it  should be lived and fulfill the promises made by God to his  people all the way back to Eve [Gen 3:15-The serpent will bruise your  heel but *He* will bruise his head.]  Jesus appeared to be doing  away with the Law because he did not honor the traditions of men as  equal to the Law of God.  He regularly locked horns with the religious  leaders of the day because he would not conform to *their* rules only  God\s Law.  In the Matthew passage Jesus is defending his dedication to the Law  and defending himself against his accusors.  Almost the entire Sermon  on the Mount (Matt. 5-7) is dedicated to helping the Jewish people  understand the true intent of the Law sweeping away the clutter which  had been introduced by the Pharasees and their traditions.  In Galatians 3:23-26 Paul describes the relationship of Jesus to the  Law in this way:  [23] But before faith came we were kept in custody under the law being  shut up to the faith which was later to be revealed.  [24] Therefore  the Law has become our tutor to lead us to Christ that we may be  justified by faith.  [25]  But now that faith has come we are no  longer under a tutor.  [26] For you are all sons of God through faith  in Christ Jesus.  I believe this says that after Christ was revealed the Law had  served it\s purpose i.e. our tutor to lead us to Christ and now we are no longer under a tutor.  The law has been fulfilled  as Christ said he would do.  God the author of the old Law and the Christ/Man Jesus are the same personality.  Therefore the old Law and the new Testament (the last will and testament of Jesus) are based on the same moral principles.  It makes sense that many of the principles in the old Law are re-expressed in Christianity.   On the other hand now that the Law has fulfilled it\s purpose and  Christians relate to God through Christ not the Law it also makes  sense that new practices and new symbolisms were established to  represent the mysteries of this new relationship.  i.e. Baptism  representing Christ\s death burial and resurrection (Rom. 6:3-8) The Lord\s supper as a memorial to His sacrifice (I Cor. 11:26) and Sunday as a day of worship commemorating His resurrection (Matt 28:1ff Acts 20:7)  OK
  [...stiff deleted...]   [...stiff deleted...]  Speed is a quantifiable measure resulting from a set of methods that will result in the same value measured no matter the reference.  A  bullet with zero velocity sitting on a table on a train moving 60mph will be moving at a speed of          (a) 0mph to someone on the train.         (b) 60mph to someone stationary next to the train.  The reference frame makes the speed relative.  But what\s interesting here is that every person on the train will see a stationary bullet. Every person off a bullet moving 60mph.    I know of no train where all the people on it every time it is filled

...  \tNearly all of them.  Witness LA>  Firemen are among our real \theroes most of the time.  I wonder when they were actually \taasked to come or if they found out about the fire over the \tTV ....   \tShot at by whom?  prove it!   \tWhen law replaces justice the system is dying or dead. \tNote that we had a small revolution 216 years ago on this \tpoint.   \tOr perhaps just wait. \tOr maybeeven send in a few agents who are Christian to \t\tsit down and pray outside the line?  Try affinity \t\trather than subversion?    \tChuckle.  SO would you if someone points a gun at you. \tAt that point you can die or live; and if living means \tstayng in a building to keep badge carrying nuts off your \tkids
Did you by any chance see the pictures of the agents in flak jackets climbing up on the roof and breaking windows.  You call that peaceful?  If you believed as these people did that they would be attacked by evil forces from the outside found the scores of agents breaking into your compound what would you do?  Your beliefs always determine your actions.  The beliefs may be wrong from my point of view but they are yours all the same.  To make it more practical.  If I attempted to stick you with a needle you would try to stop me because you believe it would hurt or that I do not have that right.  If you did not you would ignore me.  You certainly would it you saw me sticking the needle in a tree.  Koresh may have been misguided only God knows.  But the Jews at Masada died for what they believed the three Hebrews preferred to die in the furnace rather than bow down Daniel preferred to die in a lion\s den rather than stop praying to his God

  OK: So you were a naive teen.   \tWrong: 1915 and if you do your homework
But as many as received him \tto them gave he power \tto become the sons of God
 no sheesh didn\t you know 666 is the beast\s apartment?  667 is across the hall from the beast
\tNor to point out the obvious are the deluded siege-mentality followers of a religious nut-case who thought he was Jesus Christ or possibly The Big Guy. \tPersonally much as I regard the BATF and FBI as ConDupes I\ll take their word over a bunch of silly pinks who were stoopid enough to lock themselves up with a goofball like David Koresh in a makeshift arsenal. \t************************************************************ \t*  \tThe_Doge of South St. Louis\t\t\t   * \t*\t\tDobbs-Approved Media Conspirator(tm)\t   * \t*\tOne Step Beyond  -- Sundays

  Isn\t that interesting?!  In the Jewish tradition you are incredibly wrong!  They originate in the Torah and with Jewish ancestors specifically the Patriarch Abraham (zl).  That knowledge was sent East to India and China when Abraham gave gifts (the commentators to Jewish scripture say this was the knowledge of the occult arts) to all the rest of his children when he sent them away to the East.  This assured that Isaac only who remained with Abraham would inherit his most important spiritual gifts what eventually became Judaism.  So you see other religions can have very parochial views too.  By the Jewish view you are very mistaken your scripture are not scripture your gods are not gods your practices a jumble of errors that lead people to idol worship and away from God.  That doesn\t stop us from respecting you to the extent of not trying to convert you or proselytize you and being willing to dialog in a respectful manner.  We\re content to let you live the way you care to live as long as you leave us be.  We are happy to co-exist as long as you give us the same right.  But your incredible rudeness and violent nature seems to preclude that. Too bad.  Is this typical of your religion?   You are a most presumptuous fellow!  How dare you presume that the typical New Ager doesn\t acknowledge God and is selfish.  What trite self-righteous ego-ful garbage!  There are Buddhists Christians Jews and those of many other religions here on this newsgroups for whom your words are simple slander.   Of course from the Jewish perspective you are incredibly wrong.  We\d say that there is no godhead -- just created beings who may be enjoying a good laugh at your expense.   So not only are we selfish
There were some recent developments in the dispute about Masonry among Southern Baptists.  I posted a summary over in bit.listserv.christia and I suppose that it might be useful here.  Note that I do not necessarily agree or disagree with any of what follows: I present it as information.   *  For a short summary:  a Southern Baptist named Larry Holly wrote a book claiming that Freemasonry is a religion incompatible with Christianity. (Mr Holly\s father rejects Christianity and Mr Holly blames that on the Masons.)  The SBC\s Home Missions Board includes an interfaith witness department which studies other religions and how to teach them about Christ.  A few years ago they were ordered to produce a report on Masonry: they concluded that it was not a religion and therefore was outside their speciality. However Mr Holly led a movement of people who oppose Masonry and last year the Convention again ordered the HMB to study Masonry.  (I got the feeling that they were saying You got the wrong answer last time try to do better and get the answer we want.)  Anyway there\s been a bit of infighting and some inappropriate actions but the dust has settled and the report is in.  Nobody is entirely happy with it but everybody seems willing to live with it.  Both sides are saying things such as: This was the best we were going to get in the current environment.  The report commends the Masons for the charity work they do such as the hospitals and burn centers they operate as well as efforts to help the elderly and prevent drug abuse.  The report acknowledges that many well- known Christians are and have been Masons and notes that many teachings of Masonry are supportive of Christian faith and practice.  Examples of the latter include belief in God emphases on honesty and integrity and that some Masonic lodges incorporate explicit Christian beliefs.  On the other hand they note that some aspects of Masonry are incompatible with Southern Baptist principles.  These included the use of titles which some people consider sacrilegious the taking of certain oaths (even though they are not meant seriously) the undeniably pagan and/or occultic writings of some Masonic leaders the implication in some Masonic writings that salvation can be achieved by good works and the racial discrimination practiced by many Masonic lodges.  (I note with some chagrin that Baptist churches as a whole aren\t really in a place to speak on this last point.)   The report concludes that Masonry is not a religion and says that membership should not be endorsed or censured but left to the discretion of individuals. This was in part because there is variation among different Masonic Lodges and while one may include elements strongly against Christianity another may not.  Many Southern Baptists have strong convictions about the priesthood of the believer and the autonomy of the local church and this history probably influenced how the report came out.   *  The information above was gleaned from The Religious Herald a publication of the Baptist General Association of Virginia and Baptists Today which does not have any direct links to a religious organisation.  (Autonomy is a big issue among some Baptists.  8-)  Because I have neither the report itself nor whatever Masonic documents are relevant to these issues none of the above comes with a guarantee.  Your mileage may vary.  Void where prohibited.   Darren F Provine / kilroy@gboro.rowan.edu  Milton:  We use only the finest baby frogs dew picked and flown from Iraq           cleansed in finest quality spring water lightly killed
 [ a lot of religious opinions and quotations from the Bible and from  many Catholic theologians and Papal Bulls ]  [ which although introduced with a smiley was not as funny as it might have been (notable exception: subject headers such as ONE\S  DICK IS ONE\S INSTRUMENT OF REDEMPTION. ]  [ and indeed the posting seemed to be more a vehicle for the religious text than for any literary/moral analysis ]  I am surprised and saddened. I would expect this kind of behavior from the Evangelical Born-Again Gospel-Thumping In-Your-Face We\re- The-Only-True-Christian Protestants but I have always thought  that Catholics behaved better than this.  Friend Dennis I urge you to follow the example of your fellow Catholics of who I count many dozens as my friends and practice your faith through good example and decent living and respect for the common humanity of others. Please do not stoop to the level of the E B-A G-T I-Y-F W-T-O-T-C Protestants who think that the best way to witness is to be strident intrusive loud insulting and overbearingly self-righteous.  The imagery in the Song of Solomon is a little bit dated (get it?  Middle East - date palms - oh never mind) but apparently acceptable  on a steaminess level to be accepted as part of the canon. From this fact I derive that erotica itself is not incompatible with Catholic doctrine.  Is there such a thing as Catholic erotica? Not necessarily a love story between people of that faith but a love story that is not exploitative does not seek redemption through penis size pays proper respect to the dignity of each partner and is still erotic enough to have a place on a.s.s.  I would submit that the _Darknites_ series of stories qualify also most of the _Journal Entries_ and _Rings I and II_.  I would guess that your aim is to cut down on the pornography and increase the erotica. I actually agree with you that nearly all of the I\ve got an enormous dick and I shot my wad all over her face stories are crap. I count them as noise which makes my take on the signal-to-noise ration much lower than many other people\s.  Since you are one of the few posters here who can actually write  decent prose
 I\m curious about this statement is it a known understanding amongst Christian believers that people who don\t understand the Christian doctrines are enjoying this state? I come from a background with  a heavy Christian teaching (Lutheran church) and consider myself knowledgeable with the basic understandings of Christianity. At the  same time I\m *not* proud of things I don\t understand or know of at this point of time. Ignorance is not bliss!  Cheers
   But neither of them claimed to have experimental evidence that proved  them right. In a similar vein there is as yet no experimental evidence for supersymmetric particles; so some physicists believe in them
You just don\t get it do you?   I think the discussion is more like this...  Me: [ happily picking daisies by the side of the road ] BC: [ dancing on the double yellow broken line ]     Come on out and play on the highway! Me: Why? BC: The highway was put here for people to be on.  We must work towards      fulfilling its purpose. Me: But -- BC: Look the highway has been here for several generations.  Look I      have a story about how it was actually created by a divine being!      And several people actually saw Elvis bless it! Me: But -- BC: Look are you going to come out here or not? Me: But -- BC: You probably think that picking daisies is fun.  Well you\re wrong. Me: Where in blazes did you get this silly idea that you\re supposed to      be playing on the highway?  You\ll get yourself killed! BC: Better to be killed on the highway than to live an empty life off      of it.  Besides you\re just asking pointless questions.  You know      you really want to be playing on the highway too; you\re just      denying it. Me: If you want to get run over then fine but I\d much rather enjoy      the daisies if you please. BC: Why do you shun me like this?  The Creator of the Highway will flatten      you with a steamroller if you don\t see the light and come join me! Me: Well if he\s gonna be THAT way about it maybe I want to get as      far from the highway as I can... BC: [ incoherent but quite familiar righteous sputtering ]  Brian C. don\t you see?  I do not believe that your god is:  \t(a) real or even  \t(b) beneficial.  In fact I believe your religion is imaginary and carried to extremes harmful.  I would like to help you see its shortcomings and perhaps someday finally become strong enough to see it for what it is: an elaborate lie kept alive by the elite priesthood to keep the masses properly submissive to their influences.  Please offer me an argument that\s more convincing than you just don\t believe \cos you don\t want to.  Everything you\ve said so far could apply equally to any religion -- why do you believe yours is the real one?  (Note that saying it\s the only one that promises eternal life or something like that isn\t an answer to my question
So we have this highly Christian religious order that put fire on their house killing most of the people inside.  I\m not that annoyed about the adults they knew supposedly what they were doing and it\s their own actions.  What I mostly are angry about is the fact that the people inside including mothers let the children suffer and die during awful conditions.  If this is considered religious following to the end I\m proud that I don\t follow such fanatical and non-compassionate religions.  You might want to die for whatever purpose but please spare the innocent young ones that has nothing to do with this all.  I have a hard time just now understanding that Christianity knows about the word compassion. Christians
  Jesus also recognized other holy days like the Passover.  Acts 15 says  that no more should be layed on the Gentiles than that which is necessary. The sabbath is not in the list nor do any of the epistles instruct people to keep the 7th day while Christians were living among people who did not keep the 7th day.  It looks like that would have been a problem.  Instead we have Scriptures telling us that all days can be esteemed alike (Romans 14:5) and that no man should judge us in regard to what kind of food we eat Jewish holy days we keep or _in regard to the sabbath. (Col. 2.)   I don\t think that the Sabbath or any other command of the law is totally irrelevant to modern Christians but what about Collosions 2
Jim and Andy both have it incorrect I believe:  The *facts* are what is there the processes that exist in the present or the physical evidence of the processes having occured in the past. These *facts* exist with or without a theory.  The *theory* tries and explains the *facts* and how they relate to the rest of the physical universe in a manner that is both coherent and useful that it can be used to make predictions.  The *facts* of gravity evolution electromagnetic radiation relativity atoms will exist and behave in the way in which they behave regardless of whether we have a theory to try and explain how they interact... or even why.  A theory never really becomes a fact... but a theory can predict the existence of a previously unknown fact and if we find this fact as the theory predicted we say the *theory* is *supported* by the *facts*. A theory is a mental construct a speculation  a model.  If it is a good model it may be useful.  In science a theory is something that is supported by the  evidence considerable evidence sometimes *all* of the evidence. A *hypothesis* is a new fledgling theory because there is not yet enough evidence to support it.  When a new hypothesis  is proposed to replace an existing theory it must explain *all* of the facts that the current theory explains and at least some of the facts that the current theory could not and/or predict new facts.  It is so simple.... I\m surprised that this subject gets beat to death about once a month. A quick glance in a dictionary would clear up 99\% of the confusion and bandwidth in this newsgroup.  Then we could talk about really important things like
  Contact:   WATCHMAN FELLOWSHIP            P.O. Box 171194            Holladay
 I would hardly consider the BD\s to be Christian.  They were acting in direct contradiction to scripture.  Jesus\ Second Coming is something that everyone will know of.  Jesus also predicted that there will be false Messiahs who will use His name.  His prophecy has been fulfilled.   I agree with you there.    Me too.  I have already given my life to God.  If God tells me to lay down my life it will be to save another life.    Do you judge all Christians by the acts of those who would call themselves Christian and yet are not?  The BD\s contradicted scripture in their actions.  They were NOT Christian.  Simple as that.  Perhaps you have read too much into what the media has portrayed.  Ask any true-believing Christian and you will find that they will deny any association with the BD\s.  Even the 7th Day Adventists have denied any further ties with this cult which was what they were.  Do you judge all Muslims by the acts committed by Saddam Hussein a  supposedly devout Muslim?  I don\t.  Saddam is just a dictator using the religious beliefs of his people to further his own ends.  God be with you
For those missing the context of this thrilling discussion between Jim and I Jim wrote the following to me in e-mail after I pointed out that he (Jim) had taken a quote out of context:  He directed a similar accusation of hypocrisy again based on a lack of response to an article by Robert Weiss toward Stephen.  I pointed out that I did in fact agree that both Robert Weiss and Jim Meritt took quotes out of context.  Hence I find it difficult to understand why Jim thinks I am a hypocrite.  Needless to say I don\t have time to reply to *every* article on t.r.m. that takes a quote out of context.    I asked Jim the following:  Jim replied by saying   But today we find four articles from Jim one of which has the subject Silence is concurrence:     Which is of course a complete red herring.  Taking quotes out of context isn\t a crime.  I don\t have time to read every article on t.r.m. and I\m certainly under no obligation to reply to them all.  Does silence is concurrence imply that Jim thinks that because I didn\t respond to Weiss\ articles I must condone Weiss\ taking quotes out of context?  Jim doesn\t want to give a direct answer to this question; read what he has written and decide for yourself.   But back to the context of my conversation with Jim.  Jim\s next  gambit was to claim that he was using inductive logic when he concluded that I was being a hypocrite.  I challenged him to provide the details of that logic that led him to an incorrect conclusion. Today we find another obscure article (posting it twice didn\t help make it more clear Jim) titled Inductive Logic:   More red herrings.  Could Jim mean that he has read an uncountably large number of my articles?  Could Jim mean that because I axed his articles but not Weiss\ articles he wants to conclude inductively ... Well I can\t see where he is going with this.  But I can help him with his induction.  I\ve written roughly 80 articles since January.  The vast majority of them are discussions with Frank DeCenso and other inerrantists where I take the position that they are making bad arguments.  Some are discussions with Jim Meritt where I take the position that he is making bad arguments (a straw man argument earlier

 As many people have mentioned there is no reason why insurers could not offer a contract without abortion services for a different premium. The problem is that there is no guarantee that this premium would be lower for those who chose this type of contract.  Although you are removing one service that may have feedbacks into other types of covered care which results in a net increase in actuarial costs.  For an illustrative example in the opposite direction it may be possible to ADD services to an insurance contract and REDUCE the premium.  If you add preventative services and this reduces acute care use

:  :   Nut or not he was clearly a liar.  He said he would surrender after :   local radio stations broadcast his message but he didn\t.  Then he :   said he would surrender after Passover
 Not entirely.  Its not a premise its a conclusion.  Second that scientists (for the most part) exlude the possibility is not a problem its a necessity.  Scientists are empircists not theologians.   So do scientists and long before you did.  Clearly you have a deep and  fundamental misunderstanding of science.   Absolutely and utterly false (except for some were AMHs). Lucy (Australopithecus afarensis ca. 3 to 3.25 mya) is 40\% complete and about 80\% taking into  consideration bilateral symmetry.  Lucy walked upright and bipedally just  like humans and the two share a remarkably similar dental pattern.  Her cranial morphology is unlike humans or modern apes.  There are hundreds of  other specimens of this and other species of which only some are *partially*  reconstructed.  They exist Bill.  You can touch them feel them hold them.   But forget hominids.  The earth the universe the cultural record all look and  test out as ancient indeed.  They are not reconstructions.  Has God has tricked us here too?  It won\t go away Bill.      So *you* and other fundamentalists say.  What about the billions who don\t  say so?  Beware of people who say they have the truth Bill and reconsider each time you think you do.   That was not your point Bill.  Your point above was God *has* the power .... Scientists generally agree with that.  That\s a far cry from saying God did. Please attempt to understand your own posts.    I have your info
Is there evidence independent of the FBI that indicates that the Branch Davidians set the fire?  What have the survivors said?  Did the press see anything?  There is unfortunately
 Judging from postings I\ve read all over Usenet and on non-Usenet BBs conferences
burning yourself alive seems a rough way to go given the waco bunch had other choices.  but it reminded me of the russian old-believers who thinking the antichrist was coming in 1666
    Omigod it\s an operationalist! Sorry Jim
I\m greatly in need of Jurgen Moltmann\s book God in Creation: An Ecological Doctrine of Creation.  If you have a copy you\re willing to part with
If you would like to understand better the sort of behavior that we saw in connection with the Waco tragedy I\d strongly recommend reading _When Prophecy Fails_ by Leon Festinger Henry Riecken and Stanley Schachter (available as a Harper Torchbook). It goes a long way towards explaining how a  belief system can be so strong as to withstand even overwhelming disconfirmatory evidence. At least read the first chapter. Interestingly just as the Branch Davidians had roots in the Seventh-Day Adventist movement the SDAs themselves had their roots in the Millerite movement of the first half of the 19th century--a movement that expected the end of the world in 1843 was disappointed when it did not take place
93!04.16 e.v.  After the Glorious Eve of Taxation  Do what thou wilt shall be the whole of the Law. The word of Sin is Restriction.   To all whom it may concern -  ...  It is known only to a few that there exists an external visible organization of such men and women who having themselves found the path to real self-knowledge and who having travelled the burning sands are willing to give the benefit of their experience and to act as spiritual guides to those who are willing to be guided.  While numberless societies associations orders groups etc. have been founded during the last thirty years in all parts of the civilised world all following some line of occult study yet there is but ONE ancient organization of genuine Mystics which shows the seeker after truth a Royal Road to discover The Lost Mysteries of Antiquity and to the Unveiling of the One Hermetic Truth.  This organization is known at the present time as the Ancient Order of Oriental Templars.  Ordo Templi Orientis.  Otherwise: The Hermetic Brotherhood of Light.  It is a Modern School of Magic.  And like the ancient schools of magic it derived its knowledge from the East.  This Knowledge was never its possessors.[sic] It was recorded in symbol parable  and allegory requiring a Key for its interpretation....  This key can be placed within the reach of all those who... apply for membership to the Oriental Templars (O.T.O.).   The O.T.O.... is a body of Initiates in whose hands are concentrated the secret knowledge of all Oriental Orders and of all existing Masonic Degrees....  The O.T.O. although an Academia Masonica is not a Masonic Body so far as the Craft degrees are concerned in the sense in which that expression is usually understood in England and therefore in no way conflicts with or infringes the just priveleges of the United Lodge of England.  English Master Masons in good standing by arrangement on affiliation are admitted at reduced charges.  Members of the IX degree become part-proprietors of the Estates and Goods of the Order. For further information see the publications of the O.T.O. and the synopsis of the degrees of the O.T.O.  \Constitution of the Ancient Order of Oriental Templars  Ordo Templi Orientis\   by Frater Superior Merlin Peregrinus X Degree  Past Grand Master Albert Karl Theodor Reuss   Taken from _Equinox III: 10_  Edited by Frater Superior Rex Summus Sanctissimus United States Caliph of Ordo Templi Orientis   Invoke me under my stars.  Love is the law
  Please cite your evidence that he was intending to use it.   Why not?   Check the sig.   Society does not have rights only individuals have rights.   OK your a commie.   You think you have a right to rape anyone? No wonder you don\t care about the rightws of others.   Please indicate which law you feel Koresh broke
Ken Arromdee writes    Yes but tell me how you think your question answers my question. If the BDs didn\t know immediately that they were dealing with feds (uniform apparel insignia)
 \tThe word released is loaded:  until convicted in CXOurt
   \t\t\t  ^^^^^^^^^  huh? it might be interesting. he is relating the story as I have heard it
ON the subject of how many competing RC orders there are let me point out the Golden Dawn is only the *outer* order of that tradition.  The inner order is the Roseae Rubeae et Aurae Crucis.  That\s Ruby Rose and Gold Cross in rough translation.  The G.\.D.\. is a Rosicrucian order as are all derivative groups.  Of course real Rosicrucians never admit to being Rosicrucian.  Enjoy the journey!                       --Br\anArthur                                       Queer Peculiar
: I will clarify my earlier quote.  God\s laws were originally written for  : the Israelites.  Jesus changed that fact by now making the Law applicable to : all people not just the Jews.  Gentiles could be part of the kingdom of : Heaven through the saving grace of God.  I never said that the Law was made : obsolete by Jesus.  Just for reference here\s the earlier quote: Malcolm Lee (mlee@post.RoyalRoads.ca) wrote in reference to Leviticus 21:9 and Deuteronomy 22:20-25: : These laws written for the Israelites God\s chosen people whom God had : expressly set apart from the rest of the world.  The Israelites were a : direct witness to God\s existence.  To disobey God after KNOWing that God : is real would be an outright denial of God and therefore immediately : punishable. : Remember these laws were written for a different time and applied only to : God\s chosen people.  But Jesus has changed all of that.  We are living in : the age of grace.  Sin is no longer immediately punishable by death.  There : is repentance and there is salvation through our Lord Jesus Christ.  And : not just for a few chosen people.  Salvation is available to everyone Jew : and Gentile alike.  These are two conflicting statements.  To say one is a clarification of the other is a breach of logic.  I don\t mind people shifting their position on an issue.  It irritates me when it is said under the premise that no change was made.  What about Deuteronomy 22:20-25?  Is it wrong now?  Did Jesus change that?  : If anything He clarified the Law such as in that quote you made.  In the : following verses Jesus takes several portions of the Law and expounds upon : the Law giving clearer meaning to what God intended.  Sure he does this.  However he doesn\t address the notion of stoning non-virgin brides because this needs no clarification.  Are you going to deny that Deuteronomy 22:20-25 is not patently clear in its intent?  : I think you will agree with me that there are in today\s world a lot of : modern-day Pharisees who know the bible from end to end but do not believe : in it.  What good is head knowledge if there is nothing in the heart?  I\ll agree that there is a lot of modern day Pharisees that know the Bible from end to end and don\t believe in it.  Depending on how they use this knowledge they can be scary.  They can argue any position they desire and back it up with selected parts of the Bible.  Such Pharisees include David Koresh and Adolph Hitler.  I will qualify this by saying *I don\t know* if they actually believed what they were preaching but the ends certainly made the means look frightening.  However just as scary are those that don\t know much of the Bible but believe every word.  In fact this is probably scarier since there are far more of these people from what I\ve seen.  In addition they are very easy to manipulate by the aforementioned Pharisees since they don\t know enough to debate with these people.  : Christianity is not just a set of rules; it\s a lifestyle that changes one\s : perspectives and personal conduct.  And it demands obedience to God\s will.  No it demands obedience to a book.  If God came down and personally told me how I should behave then I would say that I would be doing God\s will by doing it.  However if preachers pastors and evangelists tell me to obey the will of a book written by people who have been dead for close to two millenia (even longer for the OT) even if I follow everything in it with my heart I could scarcely be honest with myself by saying I\m doing the will of God.  : Some people can live by it but many others cannot or will not.  That is : their choice and I have to respect it because God respects it too.  Well if God respects it so much how come there is talk in the Bible about eternal damnation for non-believers?  I see little respect eminating from the god of the Bible.  I see a selfish and spiteful god.  : God be with you  Not yours thanks ;)  : Malcolm Lee  :)  Rob Lanphier lanphi872@snake.cs.uidaho.edu lanph872@uidaho.edu  And for the curious

To: margoli@watson.ibm.com (Larry Margolis) From: anthony.landreneau@ozonehole.com  LM>>The rape has passed there is nothing that will ever take that away.  LM>True.  But forcing her to remain pregnant continues the violation of LM>her body for another 9 months.  I see this as being unbelievably cruel.  Life is not a violation. As for cruel
 A lot of people won\t agree with me.  That\s their right and I respect that. However to the point
TEXT 44                         bhogaisvarya-prasaktanam                            tayapahrta-cetasam                         vyavasayatmika buddhih                           samadhau na vidhiyate    bhoga--to material enjoyment; aisvarya--and opulence; prasaktanam--for those who are attached; taya--by such things; apahrta-cetasam--bewildered in mind; vyavasaya-atmika--fixed in determination; buddhih--devotional service to the Lord; samadhau--in the controlled mind; na--never; vidhiyate--does take place.                                    TRANSLATION  \tIn the minds of those who are too attached to sense enjoyment and material opulence and who are bewildered by such things the resolute determination for devotional service to the Supreme Lord does not take place.                                    PURPORT  \tSamadhi means ``fixed mind.\\ The Vedic dictionary the Nirukti says samyag adhiyate \sminn atma-tattva-yathatmyam: ``When the mind is fixed for understanding the self it is said to be in samadhi.\\ Samadhi is never possible for persons interested in material sense enjoyment nor for those who are bewildered by such temporary things. They are more or less condemned by the process of material energy.  Bhagavad-Gita As It Is Books of A.C. Bhaktivedanta Swami          ---------------------------------------------------------       |                Don\t forget to chant:                   |       |                                                         |       |  Hare Krishna Hare Krishna Krishna Krishna Hare Hare   |       |       Hare Rama Hare Rama Rama Rama Hare Hare          |       |                                                         |       |    Kalki\s Infoline BBS Aiken South Carolina
    I\m sorry I thought we were discussing heresy.  I assumed that heresy meant a departure from orthodoxy in which case generally accepted belief is indeed an important issue.  In this case the definition of the word create is of great importance since creation is the issue being discussed.     I should have said given the Mormon belief.  If you disagree with the Mormon belief that creation is more a function of organization of eternally existent substance than one of ex nihilo creation then that is the important point.     Correction: you interpret the Bible to mean something very specific by such terms.     It always cracks me up when anti-Mormons presume to tell Mormons what they believe.  Mormons do in fact believe that all people including Christ and Lucifer are children of God in the sense that we were all created (or organized or whatever) by Him.  We also believe that being offspring of God has a symbolic sense when applied to being spiritually born again of Him.  Thus the same word can be used to convey different meanings.  This is how language works Robert and it\s why making someone an offender for a word is dangerous.   <...>     On the contrary Robert it is not a red herring at all to show that those who rely wholly on the Bible cannot seem to agree on what it says.  You say that one must simply look at the Bible to see what it teaches but centuries of people doing just that have sho0wn that no one is really sure what it says. Are we to believe that you are the only one who really understands the scriptures?     Let me clarify this one more time.  You did not refer to the Mormon belief that Jesus needed to be saved but rather to McConkie\s belief in same.  We keep trying to point out to you that Bruce McConkie is not the source of Mormon doctrine and you keep ignoring it. (see below)     On the contrary Robert
  You know
 John 12:24-26: Most assuredly I say to you unless a grain of wheat falls onto the ground and dies it remains alone; but if it dies it produces much grain.   He who loves his life will lose it and he who hates his life in this world will keep it for eternal life.   If anyone serves Me let him follow Me; and where I am there My servant will be also.  If anyone serves Me him My Father will honor.  Why would I want an eternal life if I hate this one?  If we were created by a deity why would that deity not wish us to enjoy what he has given us?  Why would I want to live forever?  The challenge in my life is that I will die and that I must give my life the meaning I wish it to have before that happens.  My time is here and will someday pass; I will be content to live on in the memories of my friends and once they too are dead then I will no longer have any reason to exist.  In short: even if your deity *does* exist that doesn\t automatically mean that I would worship it.  I am content to live my own life and fend for myself so when I die I can be proud of the fact that no matter where I end up it will be because of *my* actions and *my* choices.  If your god decides to toss me into a flaming pit for this then so be it.  I would much rather just cease to exist.  But if your god wants my respect and my obedience then it had better earn these; and if it does then they will be very strong and true.   Jesus wasn\t the only one who rose from the dead -- I think it was Osiris who did the same as well as a few characters from Greek or Norse legend if memory serves.  But still: WHY would I want to rise from the dead?  Why do *you* want to?   If your god wants to win my devotion then it knows what it can do -- provide some way for me to believe without having to resort to blind faith that could be applied equally well to any religion.   That\s precisely it.  I neither see nor know Zeus either nor Odin. Shall I offer them the same devotion I offer Jesus?   You\ve got to understand my point-of-view: I see Christians spouting Bible verse all the time as if it were some sort of magic spell that will level all opposition.  Truth is it\s not.  Robert has never demonstrated that he actually understands what the verses imply; he just rattles them off day by day.  Some brazenly fly in the face of common sense and reality and I point these out where I can.  But even more than that even when Christians *do* try to explain the verses in their own words they do so from a Christian point of view which is that every human being would want to be a Christian if only he or she understood the Christian message properly and then all strife and suffering on the earth would end.  Here\s the problem with that: substitute Moslem or Buddhist or Satanist instead of Christian and it means the same thing.  Christanity is a very nice belief set around a very nice book.  But if you want to make me believe that it has any bearing on the REAL WORLD you\ve got some convincing to do.   And in my opinion you\re bumbling about blindly making up entities where there aren\t any and depriving yourself of a true understanding and enjoyment of your life.  As long as you keep your beliefs to yourself I\ll keep my beliefs to myself -- but as soon as you start waving them around expect me to toss in my opinions
 You\re admitting a lot more than that.  You are admitting that your morals are situational.   You are admitting that the actions of other people and the situation you are in help to determine how you judge the moral significance of one of your own actions.  If you employ X degree of force that\s not moral but if you employ X degree of force but previously someone else has employed Y degree of force and the situation is thus-and-so that *is* moral.  This is quite different from saying Employing force on other people is immoral period.   Unfortunately from time to time we are obliged to do this immoral thing for reasons of self-preservation and so we have to bear the moral consequences of that.  For what it\s worth - and yes
RE: Red wwhite and black
     No I don\t mean the LR whatever that is.  As for which GD I\m using _The Complete Golden Dawn System of Magic_ as my source so (unless Regardie is lying) I\m pulling the name out the the original order\s rituals.  The multiple modern groups are part of why I through in the comment about all the spin-offs.   As a member of the Religious Society of Friends (my membership is in the Urbana-Champaign (IL) Friends Meeting) I find that amusingly ironic. :)   Not me--I don\t want to belong to *anything* which runs around claiming to be the TRUE whatever.  I find that disgusting. :(  Enjoy the journey!                       --Br\anArthur                                       Queer Peculiar
What an exciting thread (finally!)  Mitra is Sanskrit for Friend as such He started out as an avatar of Lord Visnu  mentioned first in the Vedas. Later he seems to have risen to chief prominence  worshipped by the Persians. Associated with the Sun but NOT the Sun he is  the lord of contract honor and obedience therefore naturally worshipped by  soldiers. He was ordered by the Sun to slay the bull of heaven and He reluct-  antly agreed because of His obligation...the blood of that bull spilled and  grew all earth life...then Mitra and the Sun sat down to eat.  Worship of Lord Mitra ended in Persia with the ascension of the Zoroastrians.  Hundreds of years later He was rediscovered and thrown into the Official Roman  Pantheon (tm) for some semi-tricky reason I forget why. But all references of  Him ended abruptly when He was stricken from same so apparently His worship  was some sort of vehicle for advancement in the bureaucracy like membership  in the Communist Party was in the Soviet Bloc. The sociology of religion in  ancient times is fascinating!  Oh His B-day was 25 Dec. Ahem.  I am not sure if the mystery cult really lasted after His was booted from the  Roman Imperial God Roster or what. It contained mostly soldiers with 7 levels  of initiation. They worshipped underground in caverns in pews. The bull horns  in those temples were for scaring away or impaling evil spirits I\m not sure  that they had Mithraic significance or not.  I don\t know that the ritual meal was of a cannibalistic nature as is the  Christian masses. But eating deities goes way back to Old Kingdom Egypt.  Someone mentioned bullfighting. Did Mithraists sacrifice bulls? I forget. More  likely for a religious source
      Now doesn\t this sound a lot like the colorful (or otherwise) story       from antiquity that somehow tries to (or does) explain natural pheno-      mena?  I think I hear what you\re saying
                  God being unknowable I can\t comment on His motives but it would be distressing if He allowed us to misunderstand Him through no fault of  our own.  For sanity\s sake we must assume if we believe in Him at all that His message comes through somehow.  The question is whether it comes  through immediately to every individual or is contained in a complex  canon that must be interpreted by experts in consultation with one another  or is transmitted directly through appointed representatives who are free to interpret extend and modify the canon.  If God\s message is indeed mediated the further problem arises as to whether the individual under- stands the mediated message fully and clearly.  Since the responsibility  for understanding lies ultimately with the individual we must assume that  God in His benevolence guides each individual to the appropriate source  for that individual whereof the person may or may not drink.        Your example is complicated in our age by the thin line between morality and politeness.  You might have said burp for burping and swearing carry about the same stigma today.  If you are talking about taking the Lord\s  name in vain as a serious transgression then this example is more a case of  hypocrisy than of varying moral codes.   If there is an absolute moral code propositions or laws in that code apply absolutely and universally by definition.  Conceivably some moral codes could be subsets of the universal code as you say at the outset.  So for example God\s code could include Thou shalt not create Beings without a hospitable planet to live on but this law would be inapplicable to us. Nevertheless we would be entitled to suppose that all laws applicable to us are also applicable to God.   But when you begin to ask what laws might appear in God\s moral code
Mr DeCenso in spite of requiring Scholarly opinion on the hanging of Judas rejects that the scholarly opinion of the those scholars and then rephrases those scholars opinion on the subject:   and    Actually if you do further research as to the Greek word apacgw you will find that it does denote success.  Those scholars did indeed have an excellent reason to assume that the suicide was successful.  As I pointed out I recently checked several Lexicons:  \tGreek English Lexicon of the New Testament Louw and Nida \tRobinson\s Greek and English Lexicon of the New Testament \tGreek English Lexicon of the New Testament Grimm \tWord study Concordance Tynsdale \tA Greek English Lexicon of the New Testament and other  \t early Christian Writings Bauer-Arndt-Gingrich \tThe New Analytical Greek Lexicon Perschbacher  A couple simply stated hanged oneself and a couple were more explicit  and stated that apacgw means specifically kill yourself by hanging. A couple also noted that the meaning of one the root words for apacgw is strangle throttle or choke (which pretty much invalidates the guy who suggested to David Joslin that Judas was hung upside down).  One of the best references though Robinson\s Greek and English Lexicon of the New Testament not only stated the translation it gave both the root words the literal translation related greek words which use the same roots and also other presented specific examples of the word in greek literature (to give further context).    The word apagchw has two root words: gchw is the to strangle root and the root word apo means literally away. This root words is included in words which denote a transition.  It can mean a transition in place (eg: the greek word apagello means to send a message).  Apo can also denote a change in state and specifically the change from life to death.  Robinson specifically makes comparison to the word apokteiuo which means to kill. In literal meaning the word apacgw means to throttle strangle to put out of the way and implicitly denotes a change in life state (ie: away from life to death).  So while the word apacgw does mean to hang it specifically denotes a death as well.  Thus Robinson is quite specific when he state that it means to hang oneself to end one\s life by hanging. He then notes the the use of apacgw in Homers Odessy 19:230 to denote context.  He presents that example of apacgw as being used to explicitly mean suicide by hanging. Now since there is a perfectly good word for strangling without the added denotation of death and as you insist that the Bible was written by God and every word is precicely correct you are stuck with the complete meaning of apacgw (ie: Since the word apacgw was used then death is denoted as the result).   By the way I note that Mr DeCenso also presents an example of apacgw:   Note Mr DeCenso as you say the Septuagint was a translation from Hebrew to Greek and you have not shown the original meaning of the Hebrew (ie the the Hebrew say and died) and thus whether it was simply echoed in the Greek.  It should also be pointed out that regardless of the added and died the correct translation would still be apacgw as the man did indeed die from strangulation (redundant but correct).  Further we have evidence that the Septuagint was repeatedly rewritten and reedited (which included versions which contradicted each other) and such editing was not even necessarily executed by Greeks.  Thus I am not sure that you can use the Septuagint as it now stands as a paragon of ancient greek.  So what you really need to prove your point Mr DeCenso is an example in ancient greek of someone committing apacgw and surviving.  Otherwise I would see you as simply making worthless assertions without corresponding evidence.   Now I would note Mr DeCenso that everytime I go out of my way to research it one of your apparently contrived exegisis I pretty much find it false.  Thus I think that if you are going to add to the text something over and above what the source clearly says then you had better have an explicit Greek or historical source to justify it.   By the way as to Mr Rose\s statement about trees around the Potter\s Field:   Unless Mr Rose can show that these trees are two thousand years old or that there are 2000 year old stumps there or has a 2 thousand year old description of the area which mentions such trees then it is inappropriate for him to assert that the present placement of trees prove the location of the trees two thousand years ago (after all things change).   Now as to your other argument ie: that the money Judas used is not the same as the 30 silvers:   True Peter (or the author of Acts) does not specifically call Judas\ betrayal an iniquity but for that matter neither does John specifically call Judas\ actions an iniquity either.  Further John 13:29 did not say that Judas took      Some thought that because Judas had the money box Jesus was telling      him Buy what we need for the feast; or that he should give something      to the poor So after receiving the morsel he immediately went out and      it was night.  Note that it is said that Judas left it does not say that he took the money box.  Thus when I see your explanation it still seems to me you would choose the a an unproven iniquity mentioned by another author in a different book written at a different time over the iniquity explicitly mentioned by the author of acts.  I find this forced and contrived.   Of course this particular argument becomes moot since we have have seen evidence that apacgw means suicide.  You see since Judas\ hanging was successful he could not have spent the money mentioned in John 13:29 because Matthew and Mark explicitly say the betrayal was on the high holy day (ie: Passover) and thus he could not have spent the money before killing himself the next day.  Thus the money which bought the Field of Blood would have to have been the 30 pieces of silver (Of course he got the 30 pieces of silver that night as well and thus couldn\t have spent that either.  Oh dear I believe that the house of cards is comming down).   Maybe we should at this point discuss now whether Jesus was crucified on Friday or Saturday as that is now part of the argument about Judas.  By the way as to where the prophesy of the Potter\s field came from (ie: the mention of it in Matthew) you say:   I am reminding you now to discuss it now. It\s all part of the same verse we are discussing and I wish you would quit procrastinating and sidestepping  these issues.   \t\t\t\tLater  \t\t\t\tDave Butler  \tA wise man proportions his belief to the evidence. \t\t\t\tDavid Hume
 I assume you have evidence that he was responsible for the deaths?    Again I\d like to see some evidence.    Once again where\s your proof? Suicide is considered a sin by Branch Davidians.  Also Koresh said over and over again that he was not going to commit suicide.  Furthermore all the cult experts said that he was not suicidal.  David Thibedeau (sp?) one of the cult members
Kent: With all due respect how can I take you seriously when you have the NAMES wrong in the 1st place? E.g.:   \tThere is no such thing. The correct name is Ancient & Mystical Order Rosae Crucis abbreviated AMORC.   \tThere is no such thing either. It\s the Rosicrucian Fellowship. And they clearly state that they DO NOT pretend to descend from the Order of the Fama Fraternitatis.   The Lectorium? And who else?   These are NOT Rosicrucian orders. They are Masonic study groups none of which *claims* to be descendant of the original Order.  What is ORC? If you mean AMORC
  First of all as far as I know only male homosexuality is explicitly mentioned in the bibles so you\re off the hook there I think. In any event there are *plenty* of people in many denominations who do not consider a person\s sexual identification of gay/lesbian/bisexual as an immoral lifestyle choice   This is another misconception. You are not being told the whole story.  My former minister is a lesbian and I know personally and professionally several openly gay and lesbian ministers. I am a Unitarian-Universalist and like most others in my denomination am pro-choice. You needn\t go looking to the Unitarian Universalists (which is a liberal religion) for acceptance of your sexual identification and pro-choice views
  Yes this is certainly one of the traditional ideas about the Mithraic cult (although not the only one.)  It had many elements that seem to have been borrowed by Catholicism (e.g. the Mass communion the sharing of a sacred meal consecration of bread and wine etc.)  For quite an amusing novel that uses this same idea check out:  The Covenant of the Flame by David Morrell.  It has some quite interesting occult bits and lots of killing. I won\t spoil it by revealing the ending
 Looking at [1] we find that during Roman times Tyre vied with Sidon for first place in the intellectual life of the period; that Tyre was the seat of a Christian bishop eventually with 14 dioceses under it; that the most magnificent church of its kind in all Phoenecia was the basilica built in Tyre ca. 314; that Tyre was well known for its exports of glassware wine white marble and dyed cloth; that Tyre along with other seaports provided outlets for South Arabian Indian and even Chinese trade; that Tyre had to accomodate its growing population by following a perpendicular rather than horizontal line of growth (because it was running out of land to build on); that Tyre established colonies of its own.  None of this sounds like a small fishing village by any stretch of the imagination.  Centuries later under the Abbasids Tyre had opulent and flourishing bazaars and buildings of 5-6 stories.  During this period Tyre was noted for its export of sugar beads and as of old glassware. During the Crusades Tyre was the second-most flourishing city held by Franks.  (There is a lot more but I got tired of writing.)  In [2] we read the following description of modern Lebanon: other *major cities* in Lebanon include Tripoli Sidon Tyre Baalbek and Zahlah.  [my emphasis]  This source also discusses the impact of the Lebanese Civil War and the Israeli military actions (1978 1982) on the trading ports of Tyre and Sidon.  It notes that after Israel\s withdrawel in 1984 Tyre appeared to enjoy a revival of its local economy.  If Tyre is such an insignificant little fishing village at present why is it always called a city (or above a major city)?  Why does it show up on all the maps?   When population figures for cities in Lebanon are given why is Tyre always one of the cities on the list (even if the list is only a dozen cities long)?  [1] Philip K. Hitti _Lebanon in History: From the earliest times to the present_ NY St. Martins 1967.    [2] Federal Research Division Library of Congress _Lebanon: a country study_ edited by Thomas Collelo 1989.   A one-horse town?  Sounds like a lot of work for one horse. (Anyway Tyre is connected by roads to the mainland.  They may even use cars these days. :-)   The 1991 Encyclopedia Britannica says Pop. (1982 est.) 23000.   Most other references give figures in the 14-17 thousand range. (One atlas gives the population of Tyre as 60000; the same source give comparatively high figures for Sidon and Beirut also so I doubt that it is a typo.  Perhaps these were figures for the cities and their surrounding areas.)  I don\t doubt that the population of Tyre has fluctuated over the last few decades.  In particular the 1982 Israeli military action hurt Tyre quite a bit.      I thought you were talking about times that Tyre was destroyed. Don\t most if not all of these apply not just to Tyre but to  the other cities in the area?  Sidon for example?  Can you make a case for Tyre having been singled out?   They had a good deal of autonomy under the Seleucids. From [2]: Tyre receiv[ed] the rights [of autonomy] from Antiochus Ephiphanes and from 125 BC onward enjoy[ed] complete autonomy. She started a large series of coins occasionally in gold ...  The descriptions of Tyre under the Romans don\t seem to fit your characterization either.  And under the Abbasids it seems to have been allowed to flourish.  I still think you are stretching when you try to describe Tyre as having been nothing but a small fishing village.   A Christian apologist whose standards of scholarship are quite low. He happens to quote the same source you quote (Nina Jidejian _Tyre through the Ages_ Beirut Dar El-Mashreq Publishers 1969). The same sentence in fact.  He defends the fulfillment of the prophecy using the same argument you are using an argument that I haven\t seen in print anywhere else which is why I jumped to the conclusion that you were quoting Josh.  (I tried to find the Jidejian book
There are actually a few important things we can glean from this mess: 1)\tWhen they start getting desperate for an answer to the question: What\s it all about. Mr. Natural? pinkboys will buy darn near *anything* which means: 2)\tThere\s still plenty of $$$$ to be made in the False Jesus business by enterprising SubGenii.  Just remember that: 3)\tOnce you\ve separated the pinks from their green don\t blow it all on automatic weapons from Mexico.  Put it in a Swiss bank account.  Smile a lot.  Have your flunkies hand out flowers in airports.  The Con will just shrug you off as long as: 4)\tYou never never NEVER start to believe your own bulldada!  If David Koresh hand\t started swallowing his own apocalypso now crap he\d be working crossword puzzles in the Bahamas today instead of contributing to the mulch layer in Waco.  This is because: 5)\tWhen you start shooting at cops
LEWB>> Lets add to those percentages 13-15\% for the Orphaic docterians brought LEWB>>to the group by Paul/Saul who was a high ranking initiate. On the LEWB>>development of Orphaic Mysteries
 We have no way to know that the cultists burned the house; it could have been the BATF and FBI.  We only have the government\s word for it after all
********NOTE: FOLLOWUPS go to alt.atheismtalk.religion.misctalk.origins!  [deleted]  If you say X statement and give it the authority of fact I will respond by asking you why. You aren\t obligated to say anything but if your intent is to convince me that X statement is true then yes the burden of proof is upon you.   If you are merely giving testimony to your beliefs then you are an egotist. Why would I care?  To surmise

   Bill I find it rather remarkable that you managed to zero in on what is probably the weakest evidence.    What is probably the most convincing is the anti-Christian literature put out by the Jewish councils in the second century.  There are enormous quantities of detailed arguments against Christianity many of the arguments still being used today.  Despite volumes of tracts attacking Christianity not one denies the existance of Jesus
 Where were you brought up?  In the former USSR?  Is Innocent until proven   guilty by a jury of your peers NOT Dan Rather dead in this country?  Seems   so.  Is tax evasion the only charge brought against the BDs punishable by   death in this country now?   Not really.  You are a blind idiot.   Not sure yet you condem them to death for it?  If the BATF had stayed home   all would be alive now.  So who murdered who? You have a short memory.  next.  Sleep well tonite heartless idiot.  Sleep the sleep of the simple-minded.  I shall weep for my country myself.   I\m short of patience tonite
  I would like to add my support for a misc.taoism discussion group. I applaud the enthusiam shown by the person posting <79899@cup.portal.com>  Thyagi@cup.portal.com (I read in alt.magick) but I differ with him/her in believing that at least some minimal parameters  should be agreed upon.    But if we don\t limit it to *something* the discussion degenerates into a big amorphous glob.   Other questions Thyagi proposes are:   It seems to me that these questions more properly fall into the category of general metaphysics. I would prefer any misc.taoism to deal more closely with topics and works more closely associated with at least semi-orthodox Taoism: with established classic works  definitely included and works like Mantak Chia\s argued about!   I think neo-Taoism should be excluded or get its own group (what I mean by this is Humpty-Dumpty Taoism in which Taoism means whatever  a poster says it means.) This alt.taoism could also be a refuge  for debates about what Taoism *REALLY* means or speculations on sexual alchemy etc..  e.g. (from Thyagi again):  Kent gloomily predicts (quoting from Thyagi\s article):   I think that discussions of this nature are not completely out of place. What\s happening is that that the term Taoism is becoming completely polluted and trivialized like the words magic Alchemy  Zen etc. by writers appropriating the word to mean whatever they  want. This is seen by the spate of new age books entitled The Tao of this that and everything else. (With respect to some exceptions like the books by Jou Tsung-Hwa.)  Any other comments/ideas? I look forward to seeing them. On balance
  blechhhh.  Gimme that ole\ time Inquisition ...   It figures

UN Resolution 666 guarantees humanitarian aid will get into Irag during the Gulf War.  Is this war over? Is aid getting in
 /(hudson) /If someone inflicts pain on themselves whether they enjoy it or not they /are hurting themselves.  They may be permanently damaging their body.  That is true.  It is also none of your business.    Some people may also reason that by reading the bible and being a Xtian you are permanently damaging your brain.  By your logic it would be OK for them to come into your home take away your bible and send you off to re-education camps to save your mind from ruin.  Are you ready for that?        /(hudson) /And why is there nothing wrong with it?  Because you say so?  Who gave you /the authority to say that and set the standard for morality?  Why?  Because:  I am a living thinking person able to make choices for myself. I do not need you to show me what you think is the way; I have observed too many errors in your thinking already to trust you to make up the rules for me.  Because: I set the standard for my *own* morality and I permit you to do  the same for yourself.  I also do not try to force you to accept my rules.  Because: Simply because you don\t like what other people are doing doesn\t give you the right to stop it Hudson.  We are all aware that you would like for  everyone to be like you.  However it is obnoxious arrogant thinking like  yours the I-know-I\m-morally-right-so-I-can-force-it-on-you bullshit  that has brought us religious wars pogroms against Jews gay-bashing and other atrocities by other people who like you knew they were morally right.      (me)  /(hudson) /Aren\t you?  Aren\t you indicating that I should not tell other people what to do?  Aren\t you telling me it is wrong for me to do that?   It is not a moral standard that I am presenting you with Hudson.  It is a key to getting along in life with other people.  It is also a point of respect:  I trust other people to be intelligent enough to make their own choices and I expect the same to be returned.  You on the other hand do not trust them and want to make the choice for them--whether they like it or not.  It is also a way to avoid an inconsistency:  if you believe that you have  the right to set moral standards for others and interfere in their lives  then you must by logic admit that other people have the same right of  interference in your life.   (Yes I know; you will say that your religion is correct and tells you that only agents acting in behalf of your religion have the right of interference. However other people will say that you have misinterpreted the Word of God and that *they* are the actual true believers and that you are acting on your own authority.  And so it goes).      (hudson) /Who gave /you the authority to set such a moral standard for me to tell me that I  /cannot set a moral standard for others?   You can set all the standards that you want actually.  But don\t be surprised if people don\t follow you like rats after the Pied Piper.    At the most basic form I am not going to LET you tell me what to do; and if necessary
   I would label him rather an original Christian not a Pauline Christian though. Sad that the original church lost the game.  Cheers
}It is so simple.... I\m surprised that this subject gets }beat to death about once a month. A quick glance in a dictionary }would clear up 99\% of the confusion and bandwidth in this }newsgroup.  Reading Stephen Jay Gould\s essay Evolution as Fact and Theory wouldn\t hurt either.  It appears in _Hen\s Teeth and Horse\s Toes_.  }            Then we could talk about really important things }like why do men have nipples?  See Gould\s Male Nipples and Clitoral Ripples in _Bully for Brontosaurus_.  Gee
I must correct the following in my previous posting:   : If you are trying to be objective you must also recognise that :  : 1) the gospels are not independent sources on the contrary they : share much of the same material  I should have been a bit more careful here - the gospels not only tell us about the same events they usually use the same wordings. Textual analyses show that Matthew and Luke probably had a common source which may have influenced Mark
 God never changes.  He still loves us.  Sending Jesus was one of His attempts to reconcile with mankind.  The nature of God has not changed.   Sinning in the face of God was punishable by immediate death.  There are several OT passages to back this up.  God is God.  He cannot tolerate the prescence of sin in His midst.  And the Israelites knew this!  And still some of them chose to disobey and were destroyed.  Were these people KIND and LOVing themselves?  God gave them every break He could but in the end He really had no choice in the matter.  Seeing as how we were failing to achieve salvation on our own He sent His Son to die for us - to be the ultimate sin offering.  Now we live in the age of grace.    He sent His Son as a consolation to us out of love.    Hey let\s be fair for a moment here.  KIND and LOVING does not mean a free ride.  There is an amount of give and take as in any relationship. Parents are supposed to be kind and loving but does that mean that  children can do whatever they want?  NOT!  Part of being a parent means administering punishment when the child is at fault.  Part of being a  parent means giving instruction.  God tests us through the trial of life such that we may grow stronger.  He teaches what is right and  what is wrong.  The consequences of our actions are made clear to us be it Heaven or be it Hell.  If God did not follow through with what He has warned us about He would not be a very good parent.  In parenting if a parent issues a warning but does not follow through with it the children will not take that parent\s words very seriously. God does the same by telling us who have ears to hear what to do and what not to do.  By life\s trials we see the folly of doing our own will rather than His.  He warns us about the consequences of rejecting Him when it comes time for Judgement.  Do we follow Him?  I will.  Peace be with you
DROPLET VOL 1 No 11 Part 3  D R O P L E T From The Vast Ocean Of The Miraculous Qur\an  Translations from the Arabic and Turkish Writings of  Bediuzzaman Said Nursi The Risale-i Noor  VOL 1 No 11 Part 3 ------------------------------------------------------------------    \t\t NINETEENTH LETTER    \t\t MU\JIZAT-I AHMEDIYE RISALESI  A TREATISE ON THE MIRACLES OF MUHAMMED SAW Part 3         (continued from Droplet Vol 1 No 11 Part 2)     THIRD SIGN:  The miracles of Muhammad (SAW) are extremely varied.  Because his messengership is universal he has been distinguished by  miracles that relate to almost all species of creation.     Just as the supreme aide of a renowned ruler arriving with many gifts in a city where various people live will be welcomed by a representative of each people who acclaims him and bids him welcome in his own language so too when the supreme messenger of the Monarch of Pre- and  Post-Eternity  (Ezel and Ebed  Sultani) honored the universe by coming as an envoy to the inhabitants of the earth and brought with him the light of truth and spiritual gifts sent by the Creator of the universe and derived from the realities of the whole universe each species of creation -from water rocks trees animals and human beings to the moon sun and stars- welcomed him and acclaimed his prophethood each in its own language and each bearing one of his miracles.     Now it would require a voluminous work to mention all his miracles.  As the punctilious scholars have written many volumes concerning the proofs of His prophethood here we will briefly point out only the general category into which fall fhe miracles that are definite and accepted as accurate reports.     The evidences of the prophethood of Muhammad (SAW) fall into two main categories:        The first is called irhasat and includes the paranormal  events that happened at the time of his birth or before his  declaration of prophethood.        The second group pertains to all the remaining evidences  of the prophethood and contains two subdivisions:       1) Those wonders that were manifested after his departure from this world in order to confirm his prophethood and  \t2) Those that he exhibited during the era of his prophethood.  The latter has also two parts:   \t2.1) The evidences of his prophethood that became manifest in his own personality his inner and outer being his moral conduct and perfection and      2.2) The miracles that: related to substantial matters.   The last part again has two branches:   \t2.2.1) Those concerning the Qur\an and spirituality and  \t2.2.2) Those relating to matter and creation.  This last  branch is again divided into two categories:   \t2.2.2.1) The first involves the paranormal happenings  that occured during his mission either to break the  stubbornness of the unbelievers or to augment the faith of the belivers.  This category has twenty different sorts such as the splitting of the moon the flowing of water from the fingers the satisfying of large numbers with a little food and the speaking of trees rocks and animals Each of these sons has also many instances and thus has in meaning the strength of confirmation by consensus.   \t2.2.2.2)  As for the second category this includes events lying in the future that occured as he had predicted upon Allah (SWT)\s instructions.  Now starting from the last category we will summarize a list of them.(1)  (1) Unfonunately I could not write as I had intended without choice I wrote as my head dictated
Hitherto have ye asked nothing \tin my name: \task and ye shall receive
sandvik@newton.apple.com (Kent Sandvik) writes...    KS I see you\re wanting Malcolm\s response. Allow me one last inter- jection then please:  Distinguishing among the religious Jews you\ve excepted the Messianic for obvious reasons. Specifically are you saying it\s these religious  Jews who trace their lineage back to Abraham by blood and orthodoxy  rather than by faith who won\t agree?  Orthodox Jews?    As to the a/a (if I understand your direction) the issue remains  unproven I suspect considering how atheists and agnostics so often  look to reason. Atheist it is reasonable to conclude will not agree. For agnostics a poll seems in order. Who knows?  Myself I\m not so  sure the atheists can be counted out.   For the orthodox I wonder how many would follow Moses or Abraham or David in accepting God\s Word? Is the particular covenant to which one adheres more important than God promisimg? I reckon for many it depends on the ongoing dialogue. Under these considerations
 Dennis I\m astounded. I didn\t know you were interested to even study such filth as alt.sex.stories provide...  Cheers
  Absolutely. Lewis didn\t care for the 1921 O.T.O. charter from Reuss. He had in mind something completely diferent. Crowley and Lewis were very different persons as you probably know.   No. My overstatement
Kermit Tensmeyer quoted from a few sources and then wrote something. I will attempt to construct a facsimile of what was previously said and  then address Kermit\s offering.  John Redelfs originally wrote...    jr> I learned that a man cannot frustrate justice by repenting on his   jr> death bed because repentance is more than a feeling of remorse.  It   jr> requires faith in Christ proven by following him by keeping his   jr> commandments.  Such cannot be accomplished on ones deathbed.  Tom Albrecht responded...    ta> So Jesus must have lied to the thief on the cross.  John Redelfs wrote back that...    jr> Paradise and salvation are not the same thing.  Salvation is better.   jr> Refer to John 14:2.  I responded to John that...    rw>    I don\t see the effort to equate salvation with paradise.   rw>   rw>    Rather I see implied the fact that only those who are saved   rw> may enter paradise.  To which Kermit wrote...  kt> Incomplete reference: kt> kt> See also the discussion: Did Jesus go into Hell in the BibleStudy group kt> for the arguments that Paradise and Hell(sheol) are places after death kt> The discussion (no LDS were involved as far as I could see) argued using kt> standard Christian argument from the Bible that pretty much support the kt> LDS position. kt> kt>    Christ went to paridise after his death and burial. kt> kt>    He taught the prisoners and freed them from Darkness. kt> kt>    When he was resurrected he had not yet ascended to his father. kt> kt> The arguement centered around what was or wasn\t the proper biblical kt> terms for those places.       I respond.       The question that was raised was not if Jesus went to infernal Paradise      before entering into heaven. No one has made a point for or against       that issue nor have they compared the LDS position against orthodox      belief. The infernal paradise is held to be Abraham\s bosom (Luke 16)       the place of the righteous dead in sheol (equivalent to hades).       The point that was raised by John was that someone could not repent      on their death bed. Tom Albrecht pointed to a Biblical example that was      contradictory to what John\s position put forward. The thief on the       cross was promised by Christ to be with Him in Paradise
 Good question.  I don\t have a nice concise answer though.  What about the child whose parents are crushed emotionally because he/she starts a carerr doing something they greatly dislike.  It is the same kind of harm and is probably caused by the same thing:  The desire of the child to be  true to his or her self.  What is more important being true to yourself or burying that truth within you in order to maintain peace in the family?  hard question
\tThis will not of course deter the several die-hard Koreshies on this net who will probably claim that the Tarrant County medical examiner (Dr. Peerwani) was coerced by the FBI into faking this evidence.  Either that or they\ll claim the FBI shot them. \tThe rest of us might contemplate the difficulty of determining the cause of death from a corpse that has been reduced to a Krispy Kritter. \t************************************************************ \t*  \tThe_Doge of South St. Louis\t\t\t   * \t*\t\tDobbs-Approved Media Conspirator(tm)\t   * \t*\tOne Step Beyond  -- Sundays
: In my mind to say that science has its basis in values is a bit of a : reach. Science has its basis in observable fact.   I\d say that what one chooses to observe and how the observation is interpreted and what significance it\s given depends a great deal on the values of the observer. Science is a human activity and as such is subject to the same potential for distortion as any other human activity. The myth that scientists are above moral influence or ethical concern that their knowledge can be abstacted whole and pure from nature untainted by the biases of the scientist is nonsense.  Bill  : If one is to argue for objective values (in a moral sense) then one must : first start by demonstrating that morality itself is objective. Considering : the meaning of the word objective I doubt that this will ever happen.  : So back to the original question:  : And objective morality is.....?  This may be an unfortunate choice of words almost self-contradictory. Objective in the sense used here means something immutable and absolute while morality describes the behavior of some group of people. The first term is all inclusive the second is specific. The concept supposedly described may have meaning however.  If there is a God as described by the Christians (for instance) then He has existence apart from and independent of humankind; His existence is outside of our frame of reference (reality). If this being declares a thing to be so it is -necessarily- so since He has defined Himself as omnipotent and if His claims are to be believed He is at least omnipotent relative to us. God is intrinsically self-defined and all reality is whatever He says it is - in an objective sense. If God determines a standard of conduct that standard is objective. If human beings are held accountable for their conformance to that standard while permitted to ignore it they substitute a relative morality or mode of conduct giving the term morality a nebulous meaningless sense that can be argued about by those pretending to misunderstand. The standard is objective and the conduct required to meet that standard is therefore objectively determined. Just because it is convenient to pretend that the term morality is infinitely malleable doesn\t mean that the objective standard itself doesn\t exist. Morality has come to mean little more than a cultural norm or the preferred conduct of decent people making it seem subjective but it is derived from an absolute objective standard. Ironically this objective standard is in perfect accord with our true nature (according to Christianity at least) yet is condemned as being contrary to human nre
: >Based on the amount of E-Mail from fellow Christians who have read the : >posts and told me I was wasting my time with Butler and Joslin I told : >them I wasn\t doing it for DB or  DJ but for other Christians.  They : >have told me that DB\s and DJ\s arguments won\t convince most Bible : >studying Christians.  So I have reevaluated my purpose here and it\s : >also contributed to my decision.  : So most Bible-studying Christians won\t be convinced by my arguments?  : And this is supposed to be a Good Thing I presume?  Where does this Most Bible studying Christians think as Frank does come from.  And what implied good are you doing for other Christians?  At least some of what you are teaching has been demonstrated as wrong.  Has it ever occured to you that you may be doing more harm than good to your fellow Christians?  BTW I used to think like Frank does.  I went to a fundamentalist church for a while.  I didn\t start to really think about what they were saying until I noticed a God\s Science phamphlet there.  I read it and noticed that the authors of it knew virtually nothing about Science.  I asked church members some questions about theories from the phamphlet and got only deceptive answers.  I began to notice a very similar style of answers for theological questions as well.  The only conclusion I could reach was that these peoples\ beliefs about the Bible were about as valid as their beliefs in their God\s Science phamphlet.  : If there are still people out there who think that my purpose here : is to attack the Bible (an accusation Frank once made) I would point : out that I have also criticized people who have posted bible : contradictions that turn out to be silly out of context or easily : (and legitimately) reconciled.  I\m not attacking the Bible but  : intellectual dishonesty *about* the Bible from either side.  If one of the primary purposes of Christians is to seek out truth
In <1993Apr24.214843.10940@midway.uchicago.edu> eeb1@quads.uchicago.edu   I already responded to this on one dimension but afterthoughts cause me to make another independent reply.  The problem with a moment of silence is that it is NOT an even-handed way of allowing for religion amongst students in the public schools.  As I noted before Muslims need more than a moment of silence in order to perform the prayers they are required by Muhammad to do.  And (at least Orthodox) Jewish prayer also has requirements that are not addressed by this.  There is in fact a highly selective BIAS towards Christian prayer in this moment of silence shit.  And that is especially bizarre in that Christian prayer DOESN\T NEED this stuff -- a Christain may pray totally incognito AT ANY TIME (to some extent this is true of Muslims and Jews as well -- what I intend in my first paragraph is that there *are* some characteristic forms of prayer in *these* religions which DO need special times and/or behavior which cannot be undertaken without an observer  being able taking note of it.)  A Christian may pray at ANY time -- silently and without any trace of his activity being evident to others.  That may or may not be true of the other religious traditions amongst us: certainly these tend to have SOME forms of prayer that WOULD evidence differences from American/Protestant mainstream religion.  All that a moment of silence does is to allow THAT ONE tradition which doesn\t NEED it to have a special place set aside in the public schools. There is NOTHING in Christian prayer that requires public forms or rugs or phylacteries or anything else at all visible to the outside world.  A Christian student MAY (and probably does) pray at innumerable times during the day without anyone else knowing it.  [That may also be true of non- Christians -- I am not claimng otherwise].  In the moment of silence it would STILL be difficult for the Jews to gather and daven for the Muslims to do their ablutions and find qiblah to Mecca and engage in the prescribed forms.  But *of course* Christians can do *their* thing -- and therefore the provision is nothing but a disguised attempt to encourage just that.  Luckily there *is* a strong Jewish presence in this country (and I as a Christian revere some of the Jewish teachers I had in public schools) and a growing Muslim presence as well.  I can only hope that the political forces consequent on this will PREVENT the imposition of Christian forms on non-Christians.  As far as I can see (as a Christian) there is NOTHING in this moment of silence campaign but an attempt to use PUBLIC social pressure to FORCE children to adhere to a pattern that is biased towards Christianity.  And as a Christian I *must* protest such coercion.  For what it\s worth I suspect that the coercion is not really targeted at the non-Christians -- it is yet another case of FAILURE amongst Christian parents in making their children prayerful so that they want the public schools to teach what THEY cannot manage to teach despite having all the opportunity in the world to do so.  If you have taught your children to pray they do NOT need a moment of silence in school.  If you have NOT managed to teach them
 Replace Stephen with David Joslin since you directed the same     In t.r.m. Robert Weiss writes [a promise from Psalm 9:10]     Gee since you wouldn\t be at all hypocritical you must be really     busy arguing against these out-of-context extracted translations!  As you may recall you mailed me six mail messages quoting articles by Robert Weiss all sent within a few minutes of each other.  You added:     Naturally I await your arguments against this out-of-context     translation.  But I shall not await holding my breath... and     Wonder when you get to sleep disputing all these out-of-context     extracted translations! and other similar comments.   Perhaps you could explain why you ever thought that I might have a reason to read all of these articles you pulled off of t.r.m much less write responses to them?      I am familiar with inductive logic.  Go ahead and give me the details of the logic that led you to conclude incorrectly that I would condone Robert Weiss taking verses out of context.  Your conclusion was wrong of course since I agree that both you and Robert Weiss were guity of taking verses out of context.  Nothing hypocritical about that is there?    Since you reached a false conclusion you made some mistake in your logic.  The only question is where.  Did you think that it would be hypocritical for me not to post a reply to Robert Weiss\ articles? Did you make the common creationist error of confusing a lack of evidence for X with evidence for the lack of X?   Is your grasp of inductive logic not quite as firm as you think? See if you can figure out what your mistake was
 As a matter of fact yes I do or at least I strive to.  I will not be so proud as to boast that my faith is 100\%.  I am still human and imperfect and therefore liable to sin.  Thankfully there is opportunity for repentence and forgiveness.  God be with you
  Atoms are not objective.  They aren\t even real.  What scientists call an atom is nothing more than a mathematical model that describes  certain physical observable properties of our surroundings.  All of which is subjective.    What is objective though is the approach a scientist  takes in discussing his model and his observations.  There is no objective science.  But there is an objective approach which is subjectively selected by the scientist.  Objective in this case means a specified unchanging set of rules that he and his colleagues use to discuss their science.  This is in contrast to your Objective Morality.  There may be an objective approach to subjectively discuss your beliefs on morality.  But there exists no objective morality.  Also science deals with how we can discuss our observations of  the physical world around us.  In that the method of discussion is objective ( not the science; not the discussion itself ).  Science makes no claims to know the whys or even the hows sometimes of what we can observe.  It simply gives us a way to discuss our surroundings in a meaningful
The following partial summary of a Theory of the Universe includes a little-known description of the CREATION of our Solar System:                         LARSONIAN Astronomy and Physics                 Orthodox physicists astronomers and astrophysicists            CLAIM to be looking for a Unified Field Theory in which all            of the forces of the universe can be explained with a single            set of laws or equations.  But they have been systematically            IGNORING or SUPPRESSING an excellent one for 30 years!                  The late Physicist Dewey B. Larson\s comprehensive            GENERAL UNIFIED Theory of the physical universe which he            calls the Reciprocal System is built on two fundamental            postulates about the physical and mathematical natures of            space and time:                      (1) The physical universe is composed ENTIRELY of ONE            component MOTION existing in THREE dimensions in DISCRETE            UNITS and in two RECIPROCAL forms SPACE and TIME.                      (2) The physical universe conforms to the relations of            ORDINARY COMMUTATIVE mathematics its magnitudes are            ABSOLUTE and its geometry is EUCLIDEAN.                      From these two postulates Larson developed a COMPLETE            Theoretical Universe using various combinations of            translational vibrational rotational and vibrational-           rotational MOTIONS the concepts of IN-ward and OUT-ward            SCALAR MOTIONS and speeds in relation to the Speed of Light            (which Larson called UNIT VELOCITY and THE NATURAL            DATUM).                        At each step in the development Larson was able to            MATCH objects in his Theoretical Universe with objects in the            REAL physical universe (photons sub-atomic particles            [INCOMPLETE ATOMS] charges atoms molecules globular star            clusters galaxies binary star systems solar systems white            dwarf stars pulsars quasars ETC.) even objects NOT YET            DISCOVERED THEN (such as EXPLODING GALAXIES and GAMMA-RAY            BURSTS).                            And applying his Theory to his NEW model of the atom            Larson was able to precisely and accurately CALCULATE inter-           atomic distances in crystals and molecules compressibility            and thermal expansion of solids and other properties of            matter.                  All of this is described in good detail with-OUT fancy            complex mathematics in his books.                   BOOKS of Dewey B. Larson                           The following is a complete list of the late Physicist            Dewey B. Larson\s books about his comprehensive GENERAL            UNIFIED Theory of the physical universe.  Some of the early            books are out of print now but still available through            inter-library loan.                      The Structure of the Physical Universe (1959)                      The Case AGAINST the Nuclear Atom (1963)                     Beyond Newton (1964)                      New Light on Space and Time (1965)                      Quasars and Pulsars (1971)                      NOTHING BUT MOTION (1979)                      [A $9.50 SUBSTITUTE for the $8.3 BILLION Super                                                              Collider.]                      [The last four chapters EXPLAIN chemical bonding.]                 The Neglected Facts of Science (1982)                       THE UNIVERSE OF MOTION (1984)                     [FINAL SOLUTIONS to most ALL astrophysical                                                             mysteries.]                        BASIC PROPERTIES OF MATTER (1988)                 All but the last of these books were published by North            Pacific Publishers P.O. Box 13255 Portland OR  97213 and            should be available via inter-library loan if your local            university or public library doesn\t have each of them.                  Several of them INCLUDING the last one are available            from: The International Society of Unified Science (ISUS)            1680 E. Atkin Ave. Salt Lake City Utah  84106.  This is the            organization that was started to promote Larson\s Theory.             They have other related publications including the quarterly            journal RECIPROCITY.                         Physicist Dewey B. Larson\s Background                     Physicist Dewey B. Larson was a retired Engineer            (Chemical or Electrical).  He was about 91 years old when he            died in May 1989.  He had a Bachelor of Science Degree in            Engineering Science from Oregon State University.  He            developed his comprehensive GENERAL UNIFIED Theory of the            physical universe while trying to develop a way to COMPUTE            chemical properties based only on the elements used.                      Larson\s lack of a fancy PH.D. degree might be one            reason that orthodox physicists are ignoring him but it is            NOT A VALID REASON.  Sometimes it takes a relative outsider            to CLEARLY SEE THE FOREST THROUGH THE TREES.  At the same            time it is clear from his books that he also knew ORTHODOX            physics and astronomy as well as ANY physicist or astronomer            well enough to point out all their CONTRADICTIONS AD HOC            ASSUMPTIONS PRINCIPLES OF IMPOTENCE IN-CONSISTENCIES ETC..                       Larson did NOT have the funds etc. to experimentally            test his Theory.  And it was NOT necessary for him to do so.             He simply compared the various parts of his Theory with OTHER            researchers\ experimental and observational data.  And in            many cases HIS explanation FIT BETTER.                      A SELF-CONSISTENT Theory is MUCH MORE than the ORTHODOX            physicists and astronomers have!  They CLAIM to be looking            for a unified field theory that works but have been            IGNORING one for over 30 years now!                      Modern physics does NOT explain the physical universe            so well.  Some parts of some of Larson\s books are FULL of            quotations of leading orthodox physicists and astronomers who            agree.  And remember that epicycles crystal spheres            geocentricity flat earth theory etc. ALSO once SEEMED            to explain it well but were later proved CONCEPTUALLY WRONG.                           Prof. Frank H. Meyer Professor Emeritus of UW-Superior            was/is a STRONG PROPONENT of Larson\s Theory and was (or            still is) President of Larson\s organization THE            INTERNATIONAL SOCIETY OF UNIFIED SCIENCE and Editor of            their quarterly Journal RECIPROCITY.  He moved to            Minneapolis after retiring.                   Super Collider BOONDOGGLE!                           I am AGAINST contruction of the Superconducting Super            Collider in Texas or anywhere else.  It would be a GROSS            WASTE of money and contribute almost NOTHING of scientific            value.                      Most physicists don\t realize it but according to the            comprehensive GENERAL UNIFIED Theory of the late Physicist            Dewey B. Larson as described in his books the strange GOOFY            particles (mesons hyperons ALLEGED quarks etc.)            which they are finding in EXISTING colliders (Fermi Lab            Cern etc.) are really just ATOMS of ANTI-MATTER which are            CREATED by the high-energy colliding beams and which quickly            disintegrate like cosmic rays because they are incompatible            with their environment.                      A larger and more expensive collider will ONLY create a            few more elements of anti-matter that the physicists have not            seen there before and the physicists will be EVEN MORE            CONFUSED THAN THEY ARE NOW!                      Are a few more types of anti-matter atoms worth the $8.3            BILLION cost?!!  Don\t we have much more important uses for            this WASTED money?!                            Another thing to consider is that the primary proposed            location in Texas has a serious and growing problem with some            kind of fire ants eating the insulation off underground            cables.  How much POISONING of the ground and ground water            with insecticides will be required to keep the ants out of            the Supercollider?!                                 Naming the Super Collider after Ronald Reagon as            proposed is TOTALLY ABSURD!  If it is built it should be            named after a leading particle PHYSICIST.                     LARSONIAN Anti-Matter                           In Larson\s comprehensive GENERAL UNIFIED Theory of the            physical universe anti-matter is NOT a simple case of            opposite charges of the same types of particles.  It has more            to do with the rates of vibrations and rotations of the            photons of which they are made in relation to the            vibrational and rotational equivalents of the speed of light            which Larson calls Unit Velocity and the Natural Datum.                       In Larson\s Theory a positron is actually a particle of            MATTER NOT anti-matter.  When a positron and electron meet            the rotational vibrations (charges) and rotations of their            respective photons (of which they are made) neutralize each            other.                        In Larson\s Theory the ANTI-MATTER half of the physical            universe has THREE dimensions of TIME and ONLY ONE dimension            of space and exists in a RECIPROCAL RELATIONSHIP to our            MATERIAL half.                      LARSONIAN Relativity                           The perihelion point in the orbit of the planet Mercury            has been observed and precisely measured to ADVANCE at the            rate of 574 seconds of arc per century.  531 seconds of this            advance are attributed via calculations to gravitational            perturbations from the other planets (Venus Earth Jupiter            etc.).  The remaining 43 seconds of arc are being used to            help prove Einstein\s General Theory of Relativity.                      But the late Physicist Dewey B. Larson achieved results            CLOSER to the 43 seconds than General Relativity can by            INSTEAD using SPECIAL Relativity.  In one or more of his            books he applied the LORENTZ TRANSFORMATION on the HIGH            ORBITAL SPEED of Mercury.                      Larson TOTALLY REJECTED General Relativity as another            MATHEMATICAL FANTASY.  He also REJECTED most of Special            Relativity including the parts about mass increases near            the speed of light and the use of the Lorentz Transform on            doppler shifts (Those quasars with red-shifts greater than            1.000 REALLY ARE MOVING FASTER THAN THE SPEED OF LIGHT            although most of that motion is away from us IN TIME.).                       In Larson\s comprehensive GENERAL UNIFIED Theory of the            physical universe there are THREE dimensions of time instead            of only one.  But two of those dimensions can NOT be measured            from our material half of the physical universe.  The one            dimension that we CAN measure is the CLOCK time.  At low            relative speeds the values of the other two dimensions are            NEGLIGIBLE; but at high speeds they become significant and            the Lorentz Transformation must be used as a FUDGE FACTOR.            [Larson often used the term COORDINATE TIME when writing            about this.]                            In regard to mass increases it has been PROVEN in            atomic accelerators that acceleration drops toward zero near            the speed of light.  But the formula for acceleration is            ACCELERATION = FORCE / MASS (a = F/m).  Orthodox physicists            are IGNORING the THIRD FACTOR: FORCE.  In Larson\s Theory            mass STAYS CONSTANT and FORCE drops toward zero.  FORCE is            actually a MOTION or COMBINATIONS of MOTIONS or RELATIONS            BETWEEN MOTIONS including INward and OUTward SCALAR MOTIONS.             The expansion of the universe for example is an OUTward            SCALAR motion inherent in the universe and NOT a result of            the so-called Big Bang (which is yet another MATHEMATICAL            FANTASY).                                                                 THE UNIVERSE OF MOTION                 I wish to recommend to EVERYONE the book THE UNIVERSE            OF MOTION by Dewey B. Larson 1984 North Pacific            Publishers (P.O. Box 13255 Portland Oregon  97213) 456            pages indexed hardcover.                      It contains the Astrophysical portions of a GENERAL            UNIFIED Theory of the physical universe developed by that            author an UNrecognized GENIUS more than thirty years ago.                      It contains FINAL SOLUTIONS to most ALL Astrophysical            mysteries including the FORMATION of galaxies binary and            multiple star systems and solar systems the TRUE ORIGIN of            the 3-degree background radiation cosmic rays and gamma-           ray bursts and the TRUE NATURE of quasars pulsars white            dwarfs exploding galaxies etc..                      It contains what astronomers and astrophysicists are ALL            looking for if they are ready to seriously consider it with            OPEN MINDS!                      The following is an example of his Theory\s success:            In his first book in 1959 THE STRUCTURE OF THE PHYSICAL            UNIVERSE Larson predicted the existence of EXPLODING            GALAXIES several years BEFORE astronomers started finding            them.  They are a NECESSARY CONSEQUENCE of Larson\s            comprehensive Theory.  And when QUASARS were discovered he            had an immediate related explanation for them also.                    GAMMA-RAY BURSTS                 Astro-physicists and astronomers are still scratching            their heads about the mysterious GAMMA-RAY BURSTS.  They were            originally thought to originate from neutron stars in the            disc of our galaxy.  But the new Gamma Ray Telescope now in            Earth orbit has been detecting them in all directions            uniformly and their source locations in space do NOT            correspond to any known objects (except for a few cases of            directional coincidence).                      Gamma-ray bursts are a NECESSARY CONSEQUENCE of the            GENERAL UNIFIED Theory of the physical universe developed by            the late Physicist Dewey B. Larson.  According to page 386 of            his book THE UNIVERSE OF MOTION published in 1984 the            gamma-ray bursts are coming from SUPERNOVA EXPLOSIONS in the            ANTI-MATTER HALF of the physical universe which Larson calls            the Cosmic Sector.  Because of the relationship between the            anti-matter and material halves of the physical universe and            the way they are connected together the gamma-ray bursts can            pop into our material half anywhere in space seemingly at            random.  (This is WHY the source locations of the bursts do            not correspond with known objects and come from all            directions uniformly.)                      I wonder how close to us in space a source location            would have to be for a gamma-ray burst to kill all or most            life on Earth!  There would be NO WAY to predict one NOR to            stop it!                      Perhaps some of the MASS EXTINCTIONS of the past which            are now being blamed on impacts of comets and asteroids were            actually caused by nearby GAMMA-RAY BURSTS!                   LARSONIAN Binary Star Formation                           About half of all the stars in the galaxy in the            vicinity of the sun are binary or double.  But orthodox            astronomers and astrophysicists still have no satisfactory            theory about how they form or why there are so many of them.                      But binary star systems are actually a LIKELY            CONSEQUENCE of the comprehensive GENERAL UNIFIED Theory of            the physical universe developed by the late Physicist Dewey            B. Larson.                      I will try to summarize Larsons explanation which is            detailed in Chapter 7 of his book THE UNIVERSE OF MOTION            and in some of his other books.                      First of all according to Larson stars do NOT generate            energy by fusion.  A small fraction comes from slow            gravitational collapse.  The rest results from the COMPLETE            ANNIHILATION of HEAVY elements (heavier than IRON).  Each            element has a DESTRUCTIVE TEMPERATURE LIMIT.  The heavier the            element is the lower is this limit.  A star\s internal            temperature increases as it grows in mass via accretion and            absorption of the decay products of cosmic rays gradually            reaching the destructive temperature limit of lighter and            lighter elements.                      When the internal temperature of the star reaches the            destructive temperature limit of IRON there is a Type I            SUPERNOVA EXPLOSION!  This is because there is SO MUCH iron            present; and that is related to the structure of iron atoms            and the atom building process which Larson explains in some            of his books [better than I can].                      When the star explodes the lighter material on the            outer portion of the star is blown outward in space at less            than the speed of light.  The heavier material in the center            portion of the star was already bouncing around at close to            the speed of light because of the high temperature.  The            explosion pushes that material OVER the speed of light and            it expands OUTWARD IN TIME which is equivalent to INWARD IN            SPACE and it often actually DISAPPEARS for a while.                      Over long periods of time both masses start to fall            back gravitationally.  The material that had been blown            outward in space now starts to form a RED GIANT star.  The            material that had been blown OUTWARD IN TIME starts to form a            WHITE DWARF star.  BOTH stars then start moving back toward            the MAIN SEQUENCE from opposite directions on the H-R            Diagram.                      The chances of the two masses falling back into the            exact same location in space making a single lone star            again are near zero.  They will instead form a BINARY            system orbiting each other.                       According to Larson a white dwarf star has an INVERSE            DENSITY GRADIENT (is densest at its SURFACE) because the            material at its center is most widely dispersed (blown            outward) in time.   This ELIMINATES the need to resort to            MATHEMATICAL FANTASIES about degenerate matter neutron            stars black holes etc..                   LARSONIAN Solar System Formation                 If the mass of the heavy material at the center of the            exploding star is relatively SMALL then instead of a single            white dwarf star there will be SEVERAL mini white dwarf            stars (revolving around the red giant star but probably            still too far away in three-dimensional TIME to be affected            by its heat etc.).  These will become PLANETS!                        In Chapter 7 of THE UNIVERSE OF MOTION Larson used all            this information and other principles of his comprehensive            GENERAL UNIFIED Theory of the physical universe to derive            his own version of Bode\s Law.                         Black Hole FANTASY!                 I heard that physicist Stephen W. Hawking recently            completed a theoretical mathematical analysis of TWO black            holes merging together into a SINGLE black hole and            concluded that the new black hole would have MORE MASS than            the sum of the two original black holes.                      Such a result should be recognized by EVERYone as a RED            FLAG causing widespread DOUBT about the whole IDEA of black            holes etc.!                      After reading Physicist Dewey B. Larson\s books about            his comprehensive GENERAL UNIFIED Theory of the physical            universe especially his book THE UNIVERSE OF MOTION it is            clear to me that black holes are NOTHING more than            MATHEMATICAL FANTASIES!  The strange object at Cygnus X-1 is            just an unusually massive WHITE DWARF STAR NOT the black            hole that orthodox astronomers and physicists so badly want            to prove their theory.                           By the way I do NOT understand why so much publicity is            being given to physicist Stephen Hawking.  The physicists and            astronomers seem to be acting as if Hawking\s severe physical            problem somehow makes him wiser.  It does NOT!                      I wish the same attention had been given to Physicist            Dewey B. Larson while he was still alive.  Widespread            publicity and attention should NOW be given to Larson\s            Theory books and organization (The International Society of            Unified Science).                                             ELECTRO-MAGNETIC PROPULSION                 I heard of that concept many years ago in connection            with UFO\s and unorthodox inventors but I never was able to            find out how or why they work or how they are constructed.                      I found a possible clue about why they might work on            pages 112-113 of the book BASIC PROPERTIES OF MATTER by            the late Physicist Dewey B. Larson which describes part of            Larson\s comprehensive GENERAL UNIFIED Theory of the physical            universe.  I quote one paragraph:                      As indicated in the preceding chapter the development            of the theory of the universe of motion arrives at a totally            different concept of the nature of electrical resistance.             The electrons we find are derived from the environment.  It            was brought out in Volume I [Larson\s book NOTHING BUT            MOTION] that there are physical processes in operation which            produce electrons in substantial quantities and that            although the motions that constitute these electrons are in            many cases absorbed by atomic structures the opportunities            for utilizing this type of motion in such structures are            limited.  It follows that there is always a large excess of            free electrons in the material sector [material half] of the            universe most of which are uncharged.  In this uncharged            state the electrons cannot move with respect to extension            space because they are inherently rotating units of space            and the relation of space to space is not motion.  In open            space therefore each uncharged electron remains permanently            in the same location with respect to the natural reference            system in the manner of a photon.  In the context of the            stationary spatial reference system the uncharged electron            like the photon is carried outward at the speed of light by            the progression of the natural reference system.  All            material aggregates are thus exposed to a flux of electrons            similar to the continual bombardment by photons of radiation.             Meanwhile there are other processes to be discussed later            whereby electrons are returned to the environment.  The            electron population of a material aggregate such as the earth            therefore stabilizes at an equilibrium level.                            Note that in Larson\s Theory UNcharged electrons are            also massLESS and are basically photons of light of a            particular frequency (above the unit frequency) spinning            around one axis at a particular rate (below the unit rate).             (Unit velocity is the speed of light and there are            vibrational and rotational equivalents to the speed of light            according to Larson\s Theory.)  [I might have the above and            below labels mixed up.]                      Larson is saying that outer space is filled with mass-           LESS UN-charged electrons flying around at the speed of            light!                      If this is true then the ELECTRO-MAGNETIC PROPULSION            fields of spacecraft might be able to interact with these            electrons or other particles in space perhaps GIVING them a            charge (and mass) and shooting them toward the rear to            achieve propulsion. (In Larson\s Theory an electrical charge            is a one-dimensional rotational vibration of a particular            frequency (above the unit frequency) superimposed on the            rotation of the particle.)                        The paragraph quoted above might also give a clue to            confused meteorologists about how and why lightning is            generated in clouds.               SUPPRESSION of LARSONIAN Physics                 The comprehensive GENERAL UNIFIED Theory of the physical            universe developed by the late Physicist Dewey B. Larson has            been available for more than 30 YEARS published in 1959 in            his first book THE STRUCTURE OF THE PHYSICAL UNIVERSE.                      It is TOTALLY UN-SCIENTIFIC for Hawking Wheeler Sagan            and the other SACRED PRIESTS of the RELIGION they call            science (or physics or astronomy etc.) as well as            the scientific literature and the education systems to            TOTALLY IGNORE Larson\s Theory has they have.                      Larson\s Theory has excellent explanations for many            things now puzzling orthodox physicists and astronomers such            as gamma-ray bursts and the nature of quasars.                      Larson\s Theory deserves to be HONESTLY and OPENLY            discussed in the physics chemistry and astronomy journals            in the U.S. and elsewhere.  And at least the basic principles            of Larson\s Theory should be included in all related courses            at UW-EC UW-Madison Cambridge Cornell University and            elsewhere so that students are not kept in the dark about a            worthy alternative to the DOGMA they are being fed.                                  For more information answers to your questions etc.
   Is there any difference in saying   Absolute Truth exists but some people think its a lie  and  Truth is relative ?  I think there is:  in both examples the first statement is a fundamental disagreement between at least two people; the  second statement is agreed upon by all.  To put it another way

The Roman Catholic conservatives are coming out in the open to line up with Pat Robertson and his ultra Right Wing Christian Coalition. Former Secretary of Education William Bennet a Roman Catholic stood beside the Christian Coalition\s spokesman Ralph Reed at a March 3 conference in Washington.  The purpose of the conference was to publish results of a Christian Coalition poll which was designed to prove that the Republican party would lose major support if it backed away from the Family Values positons of the \92 convention.  Conservative Catholics have swung behind Robertson\s organization with political expertise legal assistance and high tech communications support.  The Catholic Campaign for  American designed as a Catholic version of the Moral Majority was founded by Marlene Elwell and Tom Wykes. Ms. Elwell has been with Robertson since the days of his Freedom Council in 1985 and worked for him in his presidential bid in 1988.  Ms. Elwell was hired by Domino\s Pizza magnate Tom Monaghan in 1989 to manage Legatus a nonpolitical Catholic businessmen\s group. Membership is limited to Catholics who head corporations with a least $4 million in annual revenues.  Relying on a network of wealthy contacts at Legatus Elwell and Wykes had little trouble forming and funding the Catholic Campaign.  The Campaign\s list of national committee members includes U.S. Rep. Robert K. Dornan Phyllis Schlafly of the Eagle Forum the lovely Pat Buchanan and Rev. Richard J. Neuhaus.   Also on the national committee is Keith Fournier a Catholic who heads Pat Robertson\s American Center for Law and Justice.  Another Catholic Thomas Patrick Monaghan senior counsel of Robertson\s ACLJ is also an active supporter of the Catholic Campaign.  The board of directors includes Frank Shakespeare broadcasting exec and former U.S. ambassador to the Pope Wall Street executive Frank Lynch former Reagan official Richard V. Allen Bishop Rene Gracida of Corpus Christi and Mary Ellen Bork wife of unsuccessful Supreme Court nominee Robert Bork.  In the Winter 1992 issue of _Campaign Update_ the organization\s quarterly newsletter Rocco L. Martino a Philadelphia business that must finally be cast aside and replaced by the true meaning of our constitution.  Oh yes
 ... or consider the thousands in Central America killed by those brave CIA/NSC sponsored Freedom Fighters.  Thus far
 If I have a habit that I really want to break and I am willing to make whatever sacrifice I need to make to break it then I do so. There have been bad habits of mine that I\ve decided to put forth the effort to break and I\ve done so; there have been other bad habits that I\ve decided are not worth the effort to break.  It\s my choice either way.  I am my own master.  I choose what I want to do.  I weigh the benefits of my actions against their consequences and I use my experience to help me deal with the unexpected which in turn make me more experienced.  I don\t always succeed but I never fail either -- I learn.  Do *you* have any habits you can\t break?  Why not?   I have arrived at my own understanding of Christianity just as you\ve probably arrived at your own understanding of Islam that is most likely very different from the way a Moslem thinks of his religion. Are you unable to master your lack of desire to understand even the slightest concept of the Quran?  If that\s different then how is it different from what you accuse me of?  Can I accuse you of having no desire to understand even the slightest concept of atheism?   Of COURSE not.  That\s disgusting.  For centuries religions have been discriminating on sex and treating women as second-class humans; that\s one of the reasons I renounced my Christianity.   No.  I don\t insult people.  Period.  It\s not in my nature and it\s not something that I want to do either.   Not yet -- but my life is the ground I use to practice on.  The fun is in the getting there!   We don\t start out perfect; we\ve got to strive to be something better.  I know my shortcomings and I know my strengths and I live my life according to the decisions I make and I am content to abide with the consequences of my decisions as easily as I\ll accept the praise for them.  There have been times in my life when I\ve made mistakes yes; I try to never make the same mistake twice.   I regard Christ as a myth.  I feel that there are far too many people offering far too many interpretations of what he supposedly said and did.  The only person who can really judge me is *me*.  I choose the roads I travel and I decide whether or not I want to reach the end of any given road or turn back -- and as long as I don\t *always* turn back there\s no shame in it.  When I need help I seek out my friends.   And you don\t have a clue about what I\m saying either.  Open your eyes and SEE; open your ears and LISTEN.  I\m not just spouting off empty words.  This is my LIFE this is what gives me MEANING.   Huh?  You\re going WAY off the track here.  I say my mother loves me.  How do I know you ask?  I can point to definite things she\s done for me and I can even just bring her to you so you can ask her face-to-face.  You say your deity loves you.  How do you know I ask?  You can\t even convince me that it exists!   If any god dangles \heaven\ before me like a carrot promising untold pleasures to me if I\ll only suspend my disbelief and ignore my rationality for just this once then I would choose \hell\.  I can *not* lie to myself to placate another being no matter how powerful it is.  Note also that there are several gods trying to lure me this way: Yahweh Allah Zeus Odin Ra...  Please give me a solid reason to choose one of them over the others.  [ description of Kendigism deleted -- hee hee! ]   That paragraph demonstrates that you haven\t listened to a single word I\ve said.  Have you ever gone to an amusement park?  Why?  I mean after a few hours it closes and nothing\s different except that you\re a few dollars lighter.  Going to the amusement park doesn\t do you any good at all.  Why do you do such a meaningless thing?  The answer is that you think it\s fun.  You play the skee-ball over and over because you\d like to get better at it even though you\re not going to win anything better than a stuffed animal even if you blow ten dollars on it.  You ride the roller coaster because it\s an thrilling experience even though (because?) it scares the dickens out of you.  In the same way I think life is fun.  And I don\t intend to leave the amusement park of life until they close down for the night!  :-D   So you (and your holy book) say.  By the same token therefore Santa Claus delivers toys every xmas.  Don\t you see?  I have NO REASON to believe that what you say is true.  Please give me some reason that I can\t similarly apply to Santa Claus.   I can\t do it because your existence means nothing more to me than just your communications over the net.  You have no more bearing on nor importance in my life than that; remove it and you will cease to be significant to me.  Are you thereby inferring that your deity is nothing more than a collection of verses in a book and cannot be supported without invoking them?  Or do you mean that the existence of your deity (and in fact
iank@microsoft.com (Ian Kennedy) writes...   More along the lines of Hebrews 12:25-29 I reckon...  \tSee that you refuse not him that speaks. For if they \tescaped not who refused him that spake on earth much  \tmore shall not we escape if we turn away from him that  \tspeaks from heaven:  \tWhose voice then shook the earth: but now he has promised \tsaying Yet once more I shake not the earth only but also \theaven.  \tAnd this word Yet once more signifies the removing of \tthose things that are shaken as of things that are made \tthat those things which cannot be shaken may remain.  \tWherefore we receiving a kingdom which cannot be moved  \tlet us have grace whereby we may serve God acceptably  \twith reverence and godly fear:  \tFor our God is a consuming fire.   Or 2nd Thessalonians 1:7-10...  \tAnd to you who are troubled rest with us when the Lord \tJesus shall be revealed from heaven with his mighty angels  \tIn flaming fire taking vengeance on them that know not God \tand that obey not the gospel of our Lord Jesus Christ:  \tWho shall be punished with everlasting destruction from  \tthe presence of the Lord and from the glory of his power;  \tWhen he shall come to be glorified in his saints and to be \tadmired in all them that believe (because our testimony  \tamong you was believed) in that day.    Kinda gives Flaming a whole new meaning I reckon.   \t\t\t      - < > -  The impression I got from talking with Livingston was that the coming of the Lord power-wise is going to be something that those who are unprepared can\t handle -- kinda like overloading a fuse -- due to  guilt. Somehow it seems to also apply to the entire physical world as  we know it. LF suggests that God doesn\t want that and has sent Koresh  as a reminder.   Seems that those who have been purified through salvation or that those protected by the Seals will be the ones who survive. And no -- I don\t  have a good idea yet what being shielded by the seals actually involves  or how exactly it relates to salvation. (Other than it involves the marriage of the Bridegroom and the Bride... for those of you Biblical well versed.) \t\t\t     - < > -  Me personally I\m totally 100\% dependent on God through Christ so  if God wants me to understand good. If not also good. If God wants to save me or dispose of me that\s great either way. Being born in the Spirit means being part of the Body of Christ (Ephesians 2) so who and what I was matters little. * What\s important is loving GOD *  Come Nova Nuke or Apocalypse -- who cares? Satan might even be able  to pull off a pretty convincing fake. Big deal. Not worth fearing or  worrying about though not before:   \t\t   -* The Greater Glory of GOD *-  \t  Maybe Koresh is right maybe he isn\t and it should be interesting to  see the new message (or prophecy). The tour of the Bible I\ve taken in  studying the passages he points to in the 3-02 text has been most re- warding. But the test of prophecy is still the fruit it bears -- which  is not yet clear.   Much much more important is Charity -- which by definition *is* --  \t                   Love for GOD  (I hope Dear Reader you\ve taken all this as an expression of faith
/(Frank DeCenso) /> />I need to prioritize things in my life and this board is not all that important />to me.    Of course it is.  It forms a very big part of your self-respect.  You come onto  the board thinking you\re some sort of apologeticist for your faith and you routinely get roasted over a grill for stupid theories and unfounded assumptions.     /(Frank DeCenso) /This board will have />to wait until (if ever) I can organize my life to fit it in.  I tried dropping />out but Sieferman coerced me to come back.  He won\t this time.  I doubt that Sieferman has anything to do with you dropping out.    It\s probably closer to the truth to say that you don\t have the cards to  play in this game (because you insist on playing from a losing hand) and you\re finally realizing it.  You will lurk on the board and keep  quiet for a while looking for an area where you are *certain* that you  are correct and then we\ll see you pop back in again.  Of course
I posted this several days ago for Dave Butler.  He may have missed it - my Usenet board has changed a little.  Just in case he missed it here it is again.   Dave Butler writes...   From: daveb@pogo.wv.tek.com (Dave Butler) Subject: Re: NEW BIBLICAL CONTRADICTIONS [Fallaciously] ANSWERED (Judas) Date: Thu Apr  1 20:52:11 1993   I can basically restrict this post to showing the type of evidence Mr DeCenso has presented and answering his two questions (and a couple of his spurious insults and false claims).   MY REPLY... O.K.   DB... [By the way Mr DeCenso you really should have looked in the index of your Bauer-Arndt-Gingrich Greek lexicon.  You would have found that the word in Acts for lot is kleros not CHORION as stated by Mr Archer and nowhere in the very large discussion of kleros in done the to Theological Dictionary of the New Testament by Bromley is the meaning burial plot discussed.  It discusses the forms of kleros (eg: kleros kleroo etc) and the various meanings of kleros (eg: plot of land and inheritance) but mentions nothing about CHORION or burial plot. (Why does this not surprise me?) Thus it would seem to be a very good thing you dumped Archer as a reference.]   DB later corrected himself... _____________________________________________________________________ From: daveb@pogo.wv.tek.com (Dave Butler) Subject: Re: NEW BIBLICAL CONTRADICTIONS [Fallaciously] ANSWERED (Judas) Date: Fri Apr  2 02:32:11 1993   I owe the group an apology.  It is my habit to check my articles before and after their submission for errors.  In my last article I stated:     I was wrong. I admit that I do not have a handle on Greek grammar and thus confused kleros the second to last word in Acts 1:17 as being the plot of land discussed.  In actuality it is chorion which is the last word Acts 1:18.  Unfortunately my Greek dictionary does not discuss chorion so I cannot report as to the nuances of the word.   I don\t know if someone else would have caught this though I am sure that someone would be able to do so but I have an aversion to disseminating mistakes especially when someone else might use that mistake to prove a point   _____________________________________________________________________   MY REPLY... Vary noble of you Dave.  I didn\t want to have to go to x number of sources to show you wrong.  (Although I am researching CHORION a little).   DB... Of course the only other reference Mr DeCenso has given is Bullinger.  And Bullinger uses such ridiculous exegisis that when I accused Mr DeCenso of actually believing Bullinger he replied that I misquoted him:   of > my response to see what I REALLY said in my posting of this article.    [Actually Mr DeCenso you said that there was benefit to our argument in   that it caused to to rediscover Bullinger\s exegisis.  I did not realize   that you would find such garbage beneficial unless you were convinced by   it].   MY REPLY... Thank you for correcting your restating of my points.   DB... and Mr DeCenso also replied:     Thus I apologize for thinking that even Mr DeCenso could find such drek convincing....he should specify which parts of Bullinger he finds convincing and quit hiding behind a disingenuous mask of This is what Bullinger believed not necessarily what I believe. So which is it Mr DeCenso? Do you find the exegisis convincing or not?)   MY REPLY... One of my purposes in debating these alleged contradictions with you and others is to diseminate many different views of possible reconciliations raised by various Bible scholars and students alike.  When I present MY VIEWS I will clearly distinguish them from now on.   DB... Of course without Archer and Bullinger we find that Mr DeCenso has presented no Greek exegisis at all and Mr DeCenso has made a big thing about my not referring back to the actual Greek.  Thus we find this demand on his part for quality Greek exegisis to be a hypocritical requirement.   MY REPLY... Good point.  But in your declaring that these passages are contradictory you have produced only superficial reasonings and observations. Nor have you dug deeper.  I\m glad you have begun in this post.  I will begin Greek studies on these passages in more depth than I thought necessary as well.   DB... It would be appropriate to look at what Mr DeCenso has actually USED as evidence.  Now we know what he claims for a standard as he has stated it often enough:     But are these actual standards he has used or simply empty hyperbole.  Let\s see he has used (a) and since he is trying to reconcile it to other passages we see that he has also used (b).  On the other hand he has presented no use of:   (d) historical context                or (e) historical content                or (f) other pertinent historical info   or (g) cultural context                  or (h) cultural content                  or (i) other pertinent cultural info     or (j) grammatical construction          or even (k) Hebrew and Greek word studies [remember Archer and Bullinger don\t count]   Thus we find his vaunted criteria for exegisis is just empty mouthings.   MY REPLY... Question:  Do you find such criteria important?  If so do you plan on starting to use them to the best of your ability or will you continue to present shallow observations (I don\t mean this in a bad way). At this point in our _debates_ I have not found it necessary to present a total exegetical analysis of these passages since we seem to keep beating around the bush and not getting into the core of the verses.  I do not believe it necessary to use many of the above criteria to refute your arguments re: Judas in Acts and Matthew but I will do my best from this point on to use several of the above criteria since you desire me to.  I hope you will also. It will greatly enhance our study of these passages.   DB... The only thing he has actually used beyond the passage itself is any other passage.  Thus Mr DeCenso should be honest and note that most of his list is red herring and his only real criteria seems to be:     MY REPLY... The reason is simple...you are mistating the passages.  You claim that the PASSAGES contradict one another; I do not see the PASSAGES contradicting one another. (1) They may very well be complimentary as many scholarly sources mention; (2) Matthew may not be presenting Judas\ death as you claim.  But we\ll look at your defense of this later.   Also the reward of iniquity in the Acts PASSAGE may not be the 30 pieces of silver in Matthew\s PASSAGES.  (Although you have a valiant attempt later at stating why you believe it is).   At this beginning stages in our debates we are laying some Scriptural groundwork which will be expanded upon through deeper exegesis.   DB... Of course the only reason I can see to so drastically reinterpret a passage as he has done with Judas\ death is to make it agree with another passage so that both could be considered correct.   MY REPLY... One of the reasons I have given a different exegetical view of the passages is that you seem to think the majority of scholarship is wrong in concluding these passages are complimentary.  However I see no problem in Tony Rose\s explanation of Judas\ death...   _____________________________________________________________________   HOW WOULD YOU EXPLAIN THE INACCURACY BETWEEN JUDAS HANGING HIMSELF IN MATTHEW 27:5 AND FALLING HEADLONG HE BURST OPEN =============================================================   This question of the manner in which Judas died is one with which we are constantly confronted in our travels. Many people point to the apparent discrepancy in the two accounts as an obvious irreconcilable error. Some have gone so far as to say that the idea of an inerrant Bible is destroyed by these contradictory accounts. However this is not the case at all. Matthew relates that Judas hanged himself while Peter tells us he fell and was crushed by the impact. The two statements are indeed different but do they necessarily contradict each other? Matthew does not say that Judas did not fall; neither does Peter say that Judas did not hang himself. This is not a matter of one person calling something black and the other person calling it white. Both accounts can be true and supplementary. A possible reconstruction would be this: Judas hanged himself on a tree on the edge of a precipice that overlooked the valley of Hinnom. After he hung there for some time the limb of the tree snapped or the rope gave way and Judas fell down the ledge mangling his body in the process. The fall could have been before *or* after death as either would fit this explanation. This possibility is entirely natural when the terrain of the valley of Hinnom is examined.  From the bottom of the valley you can see rocky terraces 25 to 40 feet in height and almost perpendicular. There are still trees around the ledges and a rocky pavement at the bottom. Therefore it is easy to conclude that Judas struck one of the jagged rocks on this way down tearing his body open. It is important to remember that we are not told how long Judas remained hanging from the tree or how advanced was the decomposition of his body before his fall. Louis Gaussen relates a story of a man who was determined to kill himself. This individual placed himself on the sill of a high window and pointed a pistol at his head. He then pulled the trigger and leaped from the window at the same time. On the other hand a person could say that this man took his life by shooting himself while another could rightly contend he committed suicide by jumping form the tall building. In this case both are true as both are true in the case of Matthew\s and Peter\s accounts of the death of Judas. It is merely a situation of different perspectives of the same event.   _____________________________________________________________________   Your only reason for rejecting this is I believe your attempt to discredit inerrancy.  You haven\t related how this is IMPOSSIBLE or highly unlikely. Here\s what you said in an earlier post...   _____________________________________________________________________ DB [quoting Tony Rose]...   The added text in this version is so heavy that assuming you are truly so opposed to such tactics you should find it not credible.  But you seem to find Tony Rose\s eisegesis satisfactory while clearly rejecting David Joslin\s.   _____________________________________________________________________   Here you discredit Tony\s explanation based on what you deem too heavy for the passages.  But you haven\t addressed why you feel that way.  You can say it\s a vain attempt to reconcile the contradiction but that doesn\t tell me it didn\t happen nor have you shown why you reject that possibility.   Questions:  Is Matthew lying or is Luke lying?  Or are they both lying?  Or are either or both of them misinformed?  Why do you think there is such an alleged contradiction?  I do not think you have ever told us what you believe in this respect.   DB... At present though Mr DeCenso only asks two questions of me:     Actually I find question (1) to be a rather stupid request but I will answer it because he now restricts himself to two points.  First I would point out that hanging is a very efficient manner for ending a life.  In fact it is a bit of a fluke when someone survives hanging (except in fantasy cowboy movies) and even then it usually referred to as an attempted hanging.   MY REPLY... I work at an agency that investigates child abuse and neglect.  Today I got a call re: a child that attempted suicide by hanging himself because his mother is on crack.  He failed in his attempt and is in a child\s psych ward at a local hospital.  Hanging attempts are not always successful.   To assume that because most hangings are successful this one was also is begging the question if I may quote you.   [Last night listening to _The Bible Answer Man_ broadcast The Christian Research Institute\s show one of the scholars on there used several of these terms that you use.  I am not all that familiar with them.  The man on the BAM show teaches Comparative Religion and Logic.  It was interesting]   DB... This is so prevalent that so that to say a man hung himself with no other qualifiers is synonymous with stating that he killed himself.   MY REPLY... Qualifiers are important at times as we\ll see in an OT passage I\ll mention below. Does hanging ALWAYS have this outcome?  Did Matthew who is the only source we have re: Judas hanging himself state that Judas died as a result?  To say it\s synonymous means it has the same meaning as.  A boy (age 14) hung himself.  But he lived.  This is only one of probably thousands of documented cases we can discover.   DB... Now I am not alone in this thought; in fact since Mr DeCenso so respects Christian scholarly (including Greek scholars) opinion I did some research.   MY REPLY... Thank you Dave.   DB... Interestingly not one of the Christian references I read interpreted the hanging as being anything but a fatal suicide.              ^^^^^^^^^^^   MY REPLY... [^^^ above mine] So it\s OK to use Christian sources to back your points?  What about Tony\s position.  Do you value it or even consider it as a valid possibility?   Also is it possible that the sources you read may be wrong or lying or deceived in other parts of their books?  If so should we do as we have done with Archer toss them to the side and not value anything they say including their interpretation of the hanging of Judas?  I am sure _you_ would find some errors and maybe even some deception in those sources.   You also noted they interpreted the hanging as meaning he died.  Although that is very possibly true do you find that in the text itself?  Remember that\s the first criteria we must examine.   DB... This included:       The Biblical Knowledge Commentary by Woodward and Zuck   MY REPLY... Which I own.  It\s a good source of commentary info.  But not inerrant.   DB...     The Interpreters on Volume Commentary on the Bible by Laydon     The one volume Bible Commentary by J R Dunelow     Word meanings of the Testament Ralph Earl     The Abingdon Bible Commentary published by Abingdon     Harpers Bible Commentary by William Neal      (Actually I could have presented many more as well)   MY REPLY... I appreciate your doing this research Dave.  Maybe we are getting somewhere in how we both should approach these alleged contradictions - more in depth study.   DB... In each case these references specifically describe that the interpretation of Matt 27:5 as successful suicide and thus I can only conclude that the                                         ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ Greek word apagchw(ie: hang oneself) is translated as a successful hanging.   MY REPLY... [^^^ above mine] No you can\t only conclude this although as Tony says this was a highly probable outcome.  But Matthew does not state death as being a result.   The Greek word is APAGCHO.  Matthew 27:5 is it\s only occurrence in the New Testament.   In the Septuagint (the Greek translation of the OT used at the time of Jesus) it\s only used in 2 Samuel 17:23 : Now when Ahithophel saw that his advice was not followed he saddled a donkey and arose and went home to his house to his city. Then he put his household in order and hanged himself and died; and he was buried in his father\s tomb.             ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^   Notice that not only is it stated that Ahithophel hanged himself [Gr. Sept. APAGCHO] but it explicitly adds and died.  Here we have no doubt of the result. In Matthew we are not explicitly told Judas died.   Also there is nothing in the Greek to suggest success or failure.  It simply means hang oneself.   DB... But Mr DeCenso you are more than welcome to disagree and show more reputable                                                                      ^^^^^^^^^ Christian scholars that insist that the hanging was not successful.   MY REPLY... [^^^above mine] Reputable?  You mean ones that have never erred? As far as   insisting that the hanging was unsuccessful that can\t be done even by me. ^^^^^^^^^   As I said in an earlier post...   _____________________________________________________________________ Although I still agree with Tony\s exegesis as being the most probable explanation regarding Judas\ death (taking into account several criteria) I\ve recently noticed some new things in Matthew.   MAT 27:5-8 Then he threw down the pieces of silver in the temple and departed and went and hanged himself. But the chief priests took the silver pieces and said It is not lawful to put them into the treasury because they are the price of blood. And they consulted together and bought with them the potter\s field to bury strangers in. Therefore that field has been called the Field of Blood to this day.   First of all notice that the text does not say that Judas died as a result of hanging. All it says is that he went and hanged himself. Luke however in Acts tells us that and falling headlong he burst open in the middle and all his entrails gushed out. This is a pretty clear indication (along with the other details given in Acts - Peter\s speech the need to pick a new apostle etc.) that at least after Judas\ fall he was dead. So the whole concept that                                                     ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ Matthew and Luke both recount Judas\ death is highly probable but not clear ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ cut. ^^^ _____________________________________________________________________   I also wrote...   _____________________________________________________________________ MY REPLY...   Here we have a stickler Dave that I have to say I just recently noticed. Let\s look at the passage in Matthew:   MAT 27:4 saying I have sinned by betraying innocent blood. And they said What is that to us? You see to it!   MAT 27:5 Then he threw down the pieces of silver in the temple and departed and went and hanged himself.   MAT 27:6 But the chief priests took the silver pieces and said It is not lawful to put them into the treasury because they are the price of blood.   MAT 27:7 And they consulted together and bought with them the potter\s field to bury strangers in.   MAT 27:8 Therefore that field has been called the Field of Blood to this day.   Notice verse 5...Then he...went and hanged himself. Matthew does not say Judas died does it?  Should we assume he died as a result of the hanging?                     ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ What does Acts say? ACT 1:18 (Now this man purchased a field with the wages of iniquity; and falling headlong he burst open in the middle and all his entrails gushed out.   ACT 1:20 For it is written in the book of Psalms: \Let his dwelling place be desolate And let no one live in it\; and \Let another take his office.\   Here we may have a graphic explanation of Judas\ death....So my line of reasoning to dispel your contradiction myth re:the two accounts of Judas\ death is this...Matthew doesn\t necessarily explain how Judas died; he does                 ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ say Judas hanged himself but he didn\t specifically say Judas died in the hanging incident.               ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ However Acts seems to show us his graphic demise.  Therefore there is no contradiction between Matthew and Acts re: Judas\ `death\.   .......   MY REPLY... ...we do know from Matthew that he did hang himself and Acts probably records his death.  Although it\s possible and plausible that he fell from the hanging and hit some rocks thereby bursting open I can no longer assume that to be the case.  Therefore no contradiction.  Matthew did not say Judas died as a                                          ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ result of the hanging did he?  Most scholars believe he probably did but...? ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ ______________________________________________________________________   I quoted all that to show that I highly regard the scholars\ explanations but in looking at the texts initially we can\t assume Judas died.  It is however highly probable.                            ^^^^^^   DB... By the way while all agree that Judas died from the hanging the books had different ways of dealing with the contradiction we are discussing.  One simply ignored it entirely and simply referred back to Matthew\s version as the correct version in both Matt and Acts.  The Biblical Knowledge Commentary suggested the hypotheses that Judas hung and then when he rotted his belly exploded (which doesn\t explain his headlong fall) or that his branch or rope broke and he fell to his death and his gut gushed out (which doesn\t explain how a hanging man would fall headlong rather than feet first).   MY REPLY... The outcome of any fall is dependent upon many factors...how high the person was suspended before the fall any obstructions such as tree branches that may have deviated the fall how steep an incline of rocky surfaces the victim fell upon thus possibly rolling or bouncing of several rocks etc.  In a superficial examination of the Acts passage and the Matthew passage we are not given a lot of info on the geographical specifics but Tony in the above quoted post gave us some...   _____________________________________________________________________ A possible reconstruction would be this: Judas hanged himself on a tree on the edge of a precipice that overlooked the valley of Hinnom. After he hung there for some time the limb of the tree snapped or the rope gave way and Judas fell down the ledge mangling his body in the process. The fall could have been before *or* after death as either would fit this explanation. This possibility is entirely natural when the terrain of the valley of Hinnom is examined.  From the bottom of the valley you can see rocky terraces 25 to 40 feet in height and almost perpendicular. There are still trees around the ledges and a rocky pavement at the bottom. Therefore it is easy to conclude that Judas struck one of the jagged rocks on this way down tearing his body open. _____________________________________________________________________   DB... Now truthfully I do not see what is comforting about Matthew confusing the source of the Potter\s field prophesy but on the other hand the author is correct: Matthew does make that confusion.  Of course a Biblical inerrantist who claim that every word of the Bible is guaranteed true by God will have to thereby add one more contradiction to the death of Judas (ie: where the prophesy of the Potter\s field came from).   MY REPLY... Please when we are done with this study on his death remind me to discuss this with you.   DB... As to your second question Mr DeCenso you ask how we could be sure that the money with which Judas purchased the land was indeed for the betrayal rather than some other source.  I would point out that in Acts where it specifically mention the reward of iniquity [Acts 1:18] it also specifically mentions what act of iniquity they were talking about (ie: Acts 1:16 ...concerning Judas who was guide to those who arrested Jesus.).  Now I would point out that when the Bible describes an act of iniquity and then immediately discusses *the* reward of iniquity it would be rather inane to suggest that it was an action of iniquity other than the one discussed.   MY REPLY... Dave we are getting somewhere aren\t we!   ACT 1:15 And in those days Peter stood up in the midst of the disciples (altogether the number of names was about a hundred and twenty) and said ACT 1:16 Men and brethren this Scripture had to be fulfilled which the Holy Spirit spoke before by the mouth of David concerning Judas who became a guide to those who arrested Jesus; ACT 1:17 for he was numbered with us and obtained a part in this ministry. ACT 1:18 (Now this man purchased a field with the wages of iniquity; and falling headlong he burst open in the middle and all his entrails gushed out. ACT 1:19 And it became known to all those dwelling in Jerusalem; so that field is called in their own language Akel Dama that is Field of Blood.) ACT 1:20 For it is written in the book of Psalms: \Let his dwelling place be desolate And let no one live in it\; and \Let another take his office.\   Notice that in verse 16 the word iniquity is not used.  Rather it states that Judas became a guide to those who arrested Jesus. But the writer DID NOT stop there...vs. 17 for he was numbered with us and obtained a part in this ministry.  What part did Judas play in their ministry?          ^^^^^^ JOH 12:6 This he said not that he cared for the poor but because he was a thief and had the money box; and he used to take what was put in it. JOH 13:29 For some thought because Judas had the money box that Jesus had said to him Buy those things we need for the feast or that he should give something to the poor.   So now we know what part Judas played - he was a treasurer per se. Right after Peter stated that Judas played a part in this ministry (treasurer according to John) THEN Luke adds the parenthetical explanation of wages of iniquity - money that should have been put into the ministry but was stolen by Judas to purchase a field.  I believe this is a better exegetical explanation of what the wages of iniquity are.  What do you think Dave?   DB... Now since I have given you clear answers (and even references) perhaps you could unequivocally state what type of inerrantist you are (instead of asking me what type I think you are as you did to Mr Joslin).   MY REPLY... I will gladly admit that I am a Complete Inerrantist
\t[...deleted...]  Unfortunately I think you\ve got it figured pretty well.  I also ask myself the question Why did they plan for so many months.  Why was this so important to them?  What was the government really up to? Why did they seal the warrant?  Were they after Koresh or were they after       the first and second amendments
930420  Do what thou wilt shall be the whole of the Law. The word of Sin is Restriction.    Sorry the San Jose based Rosicrucian order is called A.M.O.R.C  I don\t remember for the time being what the A.M. stand for but O.R.C is Ordo Rosae Crucis in other words latin for Order of the Rose Cross.    Response:  Yes very true.  The entire title is \The Ancient and Mystical Order  Rosae Crucis\.  They are located at 1342 Naglee Avenue San Jose California 95191-0001 USA.  They are considered different and largely unrelated by a number of sources.  I\ve seen documentation which links them through the figure of H. Spencer Lewis.  Lewis was apparently involved with Reuss who was the O.H.O. of Ordo Templi Orientis for many years.  Apparently it is also true that Lewis had a charter to form an O.T.O. body and then created A.M.O.R.C. (as a subsidiary?  an interesting question).   Kent:  Otherwise their headquarters in San Jose has a pretty decent metaphysical bookstore if any of you are interested in such books. And my son loves to run around in their Egyptian museum.   Response:  Indeed and diagonally across the street is another metaphysical book store called \Ram Metaphysical\ wherein I\ve purchased some wonderful works by Crowley and others.  Ram Metaphysical Books 1749 Park Ave. San Jose CA.  (408) 294-2651.   Invoke me under my stars.  Love is the law

 <Moral Driver distinctions deleted>   Compare the Driver to an urge such as Jealousy where there is an urge and an object. The jealousy does not technically exist until the object is apparent. However the capacity to be jealous is presumably still there even though it is not detectable.  Your description of the Unbilical took me three passes to understand (!) but I get the gist and I have to tentatively agree. I think our two definitions can sit side by side without too much trouble though. I haven\t attempted to define the reason behind the Moral Driver (only hinted through the essence of each Moral). Your definition hints that animals are also capable of a similar morality - Simians have a similar Social Order to ourselves and it is easy to anthropomorphize with these animals. Is this possible or have I misunderstood?   My p.s. thoughts falls roughly in line with John Stuart Mill and his writings on Utilitarianism. I have no particular plan (except to do my bit - personal ethics AND social work). My opinion (for what it is worth) is that the Authority for each Moral must be increased somehow and that this will probably take several generations to be effective. I don\t think that the list of Morals has changed for Society significantly though . The Authority element may come from our authority figures and roles models (see Eric Berne and his transactional analysis work [+ Mavis Klein] for references) and this is what gives rise to a deterioration of moral standards in the long term.  I\ve had some more thoughts on my definitions:  I\ve was thinking that I should add Moral Character to the list of definitions in order to get a dynamic version of the Moral Nature (ie. the interplay of the Moral Code and associated Authorities). A suitable analogy might be a graphic equaliser on a HiFi system - the Moral Nature being the set of frequencies and the chosen \amplitudes\ and the Moral Character being the spectrum over time.  Conscience is a little more difficult because I can\t define it as the reasoning of a person between actions in the context of his Moral Nature because Conscience seems to cut in most of the time unbidden and often unwanted. I think Conscience is manifest when a decision is made at a given time which compromises one\s Moral Nature. My Conscience fits in more with Freud\s SuperEgo (plus the Moral Driver) with the stimulous being the urges or Freud\s Id. The reasoning that I mentioned before is Freud\s Ego
 If one does not follow the teachings of Christ he is NOT Christian.   Too easy?     Would you say all Muslims are like Saddam Hussein?  I wouldn\t make such a blanket judgement
    I\m not sure what you mean by \saving face\ unless you are confusing the FBI with the BATF who are the ones who were in charge of the original search warrant.   Independant Negotiators? What was there to negotiate? Any sort of plea bargin has to be brought to the court
Those things \twhich ye have both learned and received \tand heard and seen in me
  In two places at once? Bit of a coincidence that.  Whatever the faults the FBI had
Tony-  While I honestly believe you believe you are doing a good thing by posting that piece of propaganda I believe the more people believe that the more they will feel justified in their blatant persecution of gay oriented people.  I have seen the film called The Gay Agenda and along with my church we found it to be horrifying.  Not because of what was actually shown (cleaver use of editting can create any image one wants to portray) rather becaseu we are familia familiar with how widely it was actively distributed and how many naive people are actually believing the garbage found within it.  The truth is that neither you nor I can fully speak for anyone who calls themself gay but knowing as many as I do and knowing their testimonies and witnessing thier faith and life I have to say that the report you posted is a very biased report something obviously claimed against gays as well.  The truth is that unless YOU are innately gay you cannot know what harm you are causing.  I speak as an abolitionist who supports affirming gay rights in our society.  I do not support wild sex or any other misrepresentations perpetrated by Christian Fundamentalist extremists but I know people who are not the sexual deviants your report paints them to be.  It is no mistake that the APA removed homosexuality from it\s list of mental illnesses it is also no mistake that there are many Christians and homophobes who long to bring it back to the list. I do not feel threatened by gays I don\t understand why others are.  The following is an article concerning two of the more popular ex-gay min- istries:  Exodus International & Homosexuals Anonymous.  THE FOUNDER OF AN EX-GAY SUPPORT GROUP CHOOSES HOMO OVER HETERO  by Robert Pela (from Gay oriented magazine ADVOCATE)  In December 1985 David Caligiuri received one of The Advocate\s homophobia rewaa awards: the A Prayer A Day Keeps the Lust Away citation.  As director of FREE INDEED a national ex-gay ministry Caligiuri was singled out for offering discontented gays and lesbians a way out of the homosexual death-style through prayer.  I\d like to give the award back Caligiuri now laughs I\m no longer deserve it.   Caligiuri\s eight year involvement with the national ex-gay movement peaked with his founding of the Phoenix chapter of Homosexuals Anonymous (HA) as well as Free Indeed.  He has since abandoned his pulpit and now says that the ex- gay movement is a fruitless effort based on deception.  There\s no reality in it he says I was selling a product and my product was a lie.   Headed up by national ministries like Exodus International and Courage the organizations of the ex-gay movement rely on the tenents of born-again Christianity to convince disatisfied homosexuals -- usually young gay men who are just coming out -- that they can shed their sexuality by suppressing their sexual urges and embracing Christianity.  We offer support to people who are seeking to leave the sin of homosexuality explains Bob Davies director of Exodus.  He ventures that about 80\% of those seeking to abandon their homo- sexuality are men.   Anybody who is involved in the ex-gay ministry is misguided and is wasting their time says Lisa Seeley a former redeemed lesbian who worked with Caligiuri as HA and appeared with him on the Sally Jessy Raphael show.  These organizations are for people who are spiritually and emotionally wounded.   It\s possible to change your identity or your behavior says sex educator Brian McNaught author of _On Being Gay_. But it\s really impossible to change your orientation.  These people are no longer calling themselves gay but they continue to have same-sex erotic feelings.   Caligiuri says he founded Free Indeed after an ominous week in 1981 when all hell broke loose in his personal life.  A few days after his lover ended both their romance and their business partnership Caligiuri was sexually assaulted by a man he picked up in a bar.  I was really drunk he recalls and I went home with this guy.  He tied me up and raped me.  He left me tied up all night and the next morning he raped me again.   When Caligiuri was eventually freed by the attacker he returned home to the home he shared with his ex-lover.  He had another man there with him Caligiuri recalls.  I thought at this time \If this is what being gay is about I don\t want to be this way anymore.   Caligiuri vowed that if he could find a way out he would share his discovery with others.  He organized an antigay contingent to demonstrate at Phoenix\s gay pride parade in June 1985 and a few months later Free Indeed held its first public protest.  At a meeting to promote a gay civil rights ordinance Free Indeed members loudly blasted gays telling them ther were sinners headed for hell.   Free Indeed began receiving about a hundred telephone calls a week thanks in part to a deceptive listing in the local yellow pages.  We were listed under Lesbian and Gay Alternative Services Caligiuri says so people thought we were a gay information switchboard.  People would call to find out where the local bars were and we\d preach to them about the sins of homo- sexuality.  Ruses like this are typical of the movement Caligiuri says adding They\ll do anything to reach these people.   David used to go on radio and say really stupid things recalls Peter Kelly a counselor at Phoenix\s Catholic diocese AIDS program like that he knew he was gay when he started wearing pastel colors.   Caligiuri\s family first found out about his ministry when they saw him on Raphael\s syndicated talk show in 1985.  They were relieved he recalls. They figured that if they had to have a gay person in the family better that I should be a \reformed\ gay person.   But Caligiuri was hardly reformed.  By the time I appeared on Sally\s show I\d started having sex with men again.  Men would call our hotline and tell me about thier latest sin: sex with their pastor sex with their father.  I was horny all the time.   Unable to risk going to gay bars where he might be recognized from his numerous television appearances Caligiuri says he used to go to bookstores and get blowjobs.  When he wasn\t working the bookstores he was sleeping with other reformed homosexuals.   I didn\t realize it at first but a lot of the HA leaders were having sex with one another Caligiuri says.  We\d go to conferences in other cities and we\d be paired up in hotel rooms.  Everybody was sleeping with everybody else.   By the time he appeared on \AM Philadelphia\ television show in May 1988 Caligiuri was having anonymous sex a couple times a week.  When the show\s host asked him if he ever acted on temptation his answer was a lie.   Caligiuri\s duplicity began to take it\s toll on him however.  He was suffering from chrinic fatigue syndrome and candidiasis a dibilitating yeast infection and this led to his escape from the sect.  I was too sick to go to church he explains.  The more time I spent away from those people the more I began to feel like myself.  I began to remember who I used to be.   Late in 1991 Caligiuri turned Free Indeed phone lines over to a local church and closed the ministry\s doors.  I\d convinced myself that there is no need in the world for ex-gay people he says.   Today Caligiuri 31 is studying alternative spiritualities (I\m interest- ed in belief systems that aren\t judgemental.) considering romance (But not with a CHristian!) and searching for a new project to devote himself to. I feel compelled to commit myself to gay causes he says.  I want to eventually stop feeling guilty about what I did and make up for the damage I may have brought to our community.  ---end article---  Caligiuri\s tory is by no means unique and I have read several other articles of former leaders and founders of \ex-gay\ ministries who have said very similar th similar things.  Fortuantely not all of them have left Christianity but have come to realize that God loves them despite the attitudes of others.  Some like Chris Glaser director of the Presbyterian Lazarus Project of West Hollywood Presbyterian Church have actually been working with the gay community to bring them into the sheepfold of Christ and encouraging real ethical values of sexuality within the sphere of being gay.  I have also as I said talked and become and become close friends with many who once attended such groups as Love In Action and others who either once claimed to have been reformed or who were too honest with themselves to live a lie no matter who was disappointed in them.  Some were even encouraged to marry as a way of sealing their new heterosexuality only to eventually start hitting the bars bathhouses and bookstores since these were usually activities under the concealment of night and one-night-stands of promiscuous behavior meant no continuous sin through a committed relationship.  This is a horrible trap which the CHurch has dumped on the backs of the truly gay oriented people and the very inno- cent victims in these cases are the wives and children of such marriages.  Yet the church insists that there are only two options they are willing to allow gay people: 1) heterosexuality or 2) celebacy.  This is sad.  What is also mrtifying is in the cases of those who cannot suppress their desires and fear for thier sanity in such a mixed up confusion that the church forces on them they may even opt for \suicide\ or surgical dampering of the brain functions.  In the past lobotomies and heavey drug suppressants were common- place.  There are now becoming available more and more literature on the threat of coercive Christianity toward gays such as Sylvia Pennington\s _Ex-Gays?  There Are None_. and others.  There are also a great many fact based books being written to help people trapped in this confusion such as Maury Johnston\s _Gays Under Grace_
Is it not the case that in the eyes of the law when someone is aware of something and has the capability of taking action and does not that individual may be held responsible for that action?  Example: the driver of a getaway car may be held as an accomplice to murder. \t The I didn\t know defense spawned the ignorance of the law is no excuse  When an individual is held as a material witness to a crime is there a criminal charge against the individual?  If not
A question regarding the Islamic view towards homosexuality came up in a discussion group that I participate in and I\d like to ask the question here

   Yes.  I cannot remeber which works I read about this in as it was many  years ago.  This ritual was called The Tarobaullum I believe
There are actually a few important things we can glean from this mess: 1)\tWhen they start getting desperate for an answer to the question: What\s it all about. Mr. Natural? pinkboys will buy darn near *anything* which means: 2)\tThere\s still plenty of $$$$ to be made in the False Jesus business by enterprising SubGenii.  Just remember that: 3)\tOnce you\ve separated the pinks from their green don\t blow it all on automatic weapons from Mexico.  Put it in a Swiss bank account.  Smile a lot.  Have your flunkies hand out flowers in airports.  The Con will just shrug you off as long as: 4)\tYou never never NEVER start to believe your own bulldada!  If David Koresh hand\t started swallowing his own apocalypso now crap he\d be working crossword puzzles in the Bahamas today instead of contributing to the mulch layer in Waco.  This is because: 5)\tWhen you start shooting at cops
God CAN be seen:         And I will take away my hand and thou shalt see my backparts.         (Ex. 33:23)         And the Lord spake to Moses face to face as a man speaketh to his         friend. (Ex. 33:11)         For I have seen God face to face and my life is preserved.         (Gen. 32:30) God CANNOT be seen:         No man hath seen God at any time. (John 1:18)         And he said
 So it was a complete non-sequitur is that it?     How does coming up with a derisory deal tell us anything about the existence of objective values.  You\re asking us to accept that the deal you offered would be turned down and we believe that not because we appeal to objective values but becasue we know or think we know something about people.  All the people we know exhibit *subjective* values that would lead them to reject a deal of $1 for all of the land in America.  Great.   Now
 Remember the armor of God?  The sword that Christians wield is the Word of God the Bible.  God be with you
The Nicene Creed  WE BELIEVE in one God the Father Almighty Maker of heaven and earth and of all things visible and invisible. And in one Lord Jesus Christ the only-begotten Son of God begotten of the Father before all worlds God of God Light of Light Very God of Very God begotten not made being of one substance with the Father by whom all things were made; who for us men and for our salvation came down from heaven and was incarnate by the Holy Spirit of the Virgin Mary and was made man and was crucified also for us under Pontius Pilate.  He suffered and was buried and the third day rose again according to the Scriptur      es and ascended into heaven and sitteth on the right hand of the Father.  And he shall come again with glory to judge  both the quick and the dead

Walter-  I tried several times in the past to communicate with you and Susan but you ignored me and I don\t honestly believe my letters were mean.  Rather I thought they were thoughtful and compassionate but I see now what I should have seen then.  Call me naive.  I give up on this group.  As my Lord advised that if you are unwelcome in a city then brush the dust of your feet and go on.  If anyone cares about the topic they write to me direct if not well
       Baloney.  Either the programmer or the people who decided to let their actions be governed by the program are clearly at fault.  If you neglect to do maintenance on your car and the steering goes out
DROPLET VOL 1 No 11 Part 1  A  D R O P L E T From The Vast Ocean Of The Miraculous Qur\an  Translations from the Arabic and Turkish Writings of  Bediuzzaman Said Nursi The Risale-i Noor  VOL 1 No 11 Part 1 ------------------------------------------------------------------      \t\t NINETEENTH LETTER    \t\t MU\JIZAT-I AHMEDIYE RISALESI  (A TREATISE ON THE MIRACLES OF MUHAMMAD SAW)        (SAW: PEACE AND BLESSINGS BE UPON HIM)  In His Name (ALLAH)  Be He (ALLAH) Glorified! There is Nothing But Glorifies His (ALLAH\s) Praise.  In The Name Of  Allah The Compassionate The Merciful     He is who has sent His Messenger with guidance and the religion of truth  to make it supreme over all religion:  and sufficient is Allah as a Witness.  Muhammad is the Messenger of Allah and those who are with him are firm against the unbelievers and merciful among each other.  You will see them bowing and prostrating  themselves seeking Allah\s grace and His pleasure.  Their mark is on their face the sing of prostrafion; this is their similitude in the Torah and Indgil. [the Our\an 48:28-29]     Since the Nineteenth and Thirhy-first Words concerning the mission of Muhammad (SAW) prove his prophethood with decisive evidences we assign the verification of that subject to those Words.    As a supplement to them we will merely show here in Nineteen Signs some  of the flashes of that great truth.     FIRST SIGN:  The Owner and Master of this universe does everything with knowledge disposes every affair with wisdom directs everything all-seeingly treats everything all-knowingly and arranges in everything with His will and wisdom such causes purposes and uses that are apparent to us.  Since the One who creates knows surely the One who knows will speak since He will speak surely He will speak to those who have consciousness thought and speech.  Since He will speak to those who have thought surely He will speak to humankind whose make-up and awareness are more comprehensive of all conscious beings.  Since He will speak to humankind surely He will speak to the most perfect of mankind and those most worthy of address and highest in morality and who are qualified to guide humanity; then He will certainly speak to Muhammad (SAW)  who as friend and foe alike testify is of the highest  character and morality and who is obeyed by one fifth of humanity to whose spiritual rule half of the globe has submitted with the radiance of whose light has been illumined the future of mankind for thirteen centuries to whom the believers the luminous segment of humanity renew their oath of allegiance five times a day for whose happiness and peace they pray for whom they call down Allah\s blessings and bear admiration and love in their hearts.     Certainly He will speak to Muhammad (SAW) and Indeed He has done so;  He will make him the Messenger and Indeed He has done so; He will make him the guide for the rest of humanity
 I think this is a weak argument.  The fact is there are *two* references to Jesus in _Antiquities of the Jews_ one of which has unquestionably at least been altered by Christians.  Origen wrote in the third century that Josephus did not recognize Jesus as the Messiah while the long passage says the opposite.  There is an Arabic manuscript of _Antiquities of the Jews_ which contains a version of the passage which is much less gung-ho for Jesus and may be authentic.    There is no question that Origen in the third century saw a reference to Jesus in Josephus.  There are no manuscripts of _Antiquities_ which lack the references.  It is possible that it was fabricated out of whole cloth and inserted but I don\t think it\s very likely--nor do I think there is a consensus in the scholarly community that this is the case. (I know G.A. Wells takes this position but that\s because he takes the very small minority view that Jesus never existed.  And he is a professor of German


 : medtronic.COM (Dale M. Skiba) entirely missed my point in my previous  : : firmly on the western coast of the Med.  You can bet IUm gonna keep this : baby  : >My my my such double standards.  You neglected to give any primary sources : >for your book  _Encyclopedia of the Bible_.  Are we to expect that source : >to be as unbiased as the other sources...  MR. Butler *DID* give at least : >one source you have given none.  : REPLY  : It was a JOKE.  The Readers digest _Encyclopedia of the Bible_ was the most : outrageously bogus *authority* I could dredge from my shelves. : I was trying to point out that going to some encyclopedia rather than :  original or scholarly sources is a BIG MISTAKE in procedure.  I am glad : to note that Butler and DeCesno are arguing about substance now
the blood of the lamb.  This will be a hard task because most cultures used most animals for blood sacrifices. It has to be something related to our current post-modernism state. Hmm what about used computers?  Cheers
Let me begin by saying I think this is the world\s first religion to use the net as its major recruitment medium.  Therefore even if this religion does not take off its founding members will be very important historically as this method of soliciting membership will eventually become  common.  The basis of this religion is to apply various aspects of current conventional morality to the characters in Genesis and Exodus but assume that the Bible\s accounts of the facts and historical events is correct.  For example  Story of Adam and Eve: Adam and Eve are in Garden of Eden naked and ignorant.  Have unlimited supply of food provided but no clothing jobs or knowledge.  God says not to eat fruit of tree of knowledge.  They do anyway then try to hide  in bushes.  God finds them and forces them out of Garden. (There are several different stories on what they were doing while naked in the bushes that might have angered God.)  Traditional Philosophy: 1. The only reason you need knowledge or a job is to eat.  If someone else will provide you with food then you can be stupid and unemployed and it\s OK. This is why married women usually didn\t work until recent decades. 2. Authority figures such as God whoever was behind the Vietnam War Hitler  and slaveowners are always right and should be blindly followed without  question by ordinary people who can\t make decisions for themselves.  Interpretation of events based on Traditional Philosophy: They were not supposed to eat the fruit.  They should have done whatever God told them to.  Like small children they had their needs provided for and were obligated to do whatever their Father said to.  Being forced to leave the  Garden and work in order to obtain food was a punishment.  Lessons from Traditional Interpretation: 1.  Ignorance is good.  Knowledge is bad but tempting. 2.  Having food provided for you for nothing (read welfare) is ideal.  Get- ting a job and feeding yourself with what you earn is punishment. 3.  Public nudity is good.  Covering up is bad. 4.  Authority figures are intrinsically right.  Normal people are dumb and  should do whatever they are told without question.  They should not think for  themselves. 5.  People in subordinate positions are especially obligated to refrain from learning.  For example it should be illegal for slaves to learn to read.  1990\s philosophy: 1.  People should seek education and employment outside the home unless named Hillary Clinton or Murphy Brown. 2.  People should use common sense.  They should not kill other people  (binding of Issac wars Holocaust etc.) just because they are told to.  Interpretation of events based on current philosophy: They were supposed to eat the fruit.  God gave wanted them to seek knowledge rather than be handed it on a silver platter.  Once they had gained knowledge and (by seeking it) showed their ability to make mature decisions for them- selves they no longer needed to be treated like little children and were  REWARDED by being allowed into the real world.  Lessons from new interpretation: 1.  Ignorance is bad.  Knowledge is good but must be sought. 2.  Having food provided for you for nothing (read welfare) is at best a temporary measure.  Getting a job and feeding yourself with what you earn is ideal. 3.  Public nudity is bad.  Covering up is good. 4.  Authority figures are often wrong.  Normal people are intelligent and should consider whether the instructions are really a good idea and alter or abolish bad governments.  They should think for themselves. 5.  People in subordinate decisions are often discouraged from knowledge but should seek it anyway and all the harder.  For example poor children  without good schools should work especially hard in order to make a better life for their children (and themselves).  I have tentatively named this new philosophy The Church of Eveism because Eve\s decision to eat the apple is man[sic]kind\s first good decision instead of its first bad one as traditionally believed.  She is therefore clearly a protagonist.  God at first appears evil for telling people not to seek  knowledge but on deeper analysis is also a protagonist.  As God rewarded the decision to defy him and provided the tree in the first place the intention and desire were clearly to have the knowledge be obtained
Well that would depend on how much we wanted the US and how much we wanted the $1
 Yeah. Innocents. People who hoard $250K worth of high-caliber automatic weapons and kill law-enforcement agents really fit the bill here. The only innocents were the 20+ children who were prevented from leaving a burning building by their self-appointed messiah-following parents. A burning STARTED by the  Davidians.    Is this subject line a veiled threat against U.S. Government agents or possibly Executive office leadership (i.e. Clinton)? I\ve considered you a bit of a loon before Stephen I guess this pretty much confirms it.   Nice religion you have there.  The only ones who should be killed are those who don\t agree with us. Sheesh.   --  --------------------------------------------------------------------------------Tom Hyatt                                  I\m a diehard Saints fan so i\ve    thyat@sdf.lonestar.org                     suffered quite enough thank you!    Arlington
 Jesus did not say that he was the fulfillment of the Law and unless I\m mistaken heaven and earth have not yet passed away. Am I mistaken? And even assuming that one can just gloss over that portion of the word of Jesus do you really think that all is accomplished?   Then why didn\t Jesus say Any Jew who annuls ... in v. 19? Are you saying that all of Jesus\ recorded words mean nothing to Gentiles? Are you really saying that Jesus only spoke for and to the Jews? Jesus didn\t mention your name does that mean he wasn\t speaking to you? When you read the words of Jesus do you think he is speaking to someone other than you?   You said above that Jesus was the fulfillment of the Law. Are you saying that does not mean doing away with the Law?   Gen3:15(JPS) I will put enmity between you and the woman and between your offspring and hers; they shall strike at your head and you shall strike at their heel.  Gen3:15(NRSV) I will put enmity between you and the woman and between your offspring and hers; he will strike your head and you will strike his heel.  Gen3:15(KJV) And I will put enmity between thee and the woman and between thy seed and her seed; it shall bruise thy head and thou shalt bruise his heel.  Looks like your translation has taken a few liberties with the Word?   Only helping the Jewish people?   You are using your interpretation of Paul as an argument against the clear words of Jesus?   Re-expressed? Care to define that a bit better?   What? Are heaven and earth gone away? Where did they go? Is all accomplished for example Revelations? Explain please.   Again

 IMO a Christian has no need of weapons.  I know it is very contrary to the American NRA ethos of the right to bear arms but Christians should rely on the strength of God to protect them.  Note that I say *should*.  We are inherently insecure but I feel that that is not proper justification to be armed to the teeth.  A Christian should not have to rely on physical weapons to defend himself.  A Christian should rely on his faith and intelligence. For instance I have the faith that God will protect me but God also gave me the intelligence to know not to go walking down that dark alley at night. To jump off a cliff and say that God will save me would be putting God to the test.  And who are we to test God?  God be with you
 These laws written for the Israelites God\s chosen people whom God had expressly set apart from the rest of the world.  The Israelites were a direct witness to God\s existence.  To disobey God after KNOWing that God is real would be an outright denial of God and therefore immediately punishable. Remember these laws were written for a different time and applied only to  God\s chosen people.  But Jesus has changed all of that.  We are living in the age of grace.  Sin is no longer immediately punishable by death.  There is repentance and there is salvation through our Lord Jesus Christ.  And not just for a few chosen people.  Salvation is available to everyone Jew and Gentile alike.  God be with you

Not to be too snide about it but I think this Christianity must    be a very convenient religion very maliable and suitable for    any occassion since it seems one can take it any way one wants    to go with it and follow whichever bits one pleases and    reinterpret the bits that don\t match with one\s desires.  It    is in fact so convenient that were I capable of believing    in a god I might consider going for some brand of Christianity.    The only difficulty left then of course is picking which sect    to join.  There are just so many.         Dean Kaflowitz  Yes
Gordon Banks quoted and added...  gb> In article <C50M5p.Eoz@acsu.buffalo.edu> gb> gb> > gb> >  Christians have professed for more than 1660 years the Nicene gb> >Creed a statement of beliefs drawn from the truths of Scripture gb> >that was officially accepted by a council of church bishops gb> >and leaders at Nicea in 325 A.D. Christians still recite gb> >this creed regularly in public worship. gb> > gb> gb> So prior to 325 AD there were no Christians?  Or all of them really gb> believed the Nicean creed even before it was formulated?  Do you gb> really believe such an absurdity?  I\m afraid you do.         No.      I really don\t. Honest.       The Nicene Creed as I mentioned above
<MUNCH!>  It would be funny if it wasn\t so damn *NASTY*; and as non-xian as I am
 Jim please that\s a lame explanation of the trinity that Jesus provides above. Baptizing people in the name of three things != trinity. If this is the case then I\m wrong I assumed that trinity implies that God is three entities and yet the same.  Cheers

 I don\t think anyone really cares about the solid structure of his sermon.  It\s the deaths he\s responsible for that concern most people.   You\ve made me curious.  What does this say about me?   Charles Manson used revelation as well.  Do we see a pattern here? I wonder of Koresh liked the Beatles?  \t[long list of Biblical references which \t impressed me tremendously but were deleted \t in the interests of common sense.]  Koresh was a nut okay?  Just because he found ways for the Bible to backup his rantings does not make him any less of a kook.   I\ll type this very slowly so that you can understand.  He either set the fire himself or told his followers to do so.  Don\t make him out to be a martyr.  He did not get killed
...  \tYou can tell folks when the man has run out of reason: \tattack the man\s beliefs (in legal terminology argument \tad hominem:  attack the man not what he did that has yet to \tbe proven illegal)>    \tWRONGo.  Remember the fire movie a couple of years ago? \tBackdraft?  The scene in the factory with propane gas \tcoming out of pipes and gasoline all over the floor \twith a 750 degree flame front overhead?  \t\tNote that it did not flash all at once?  \tFires ignite and burn unpredictably. \tGases (like tear gas) mix and distribute unevenly. \t\tAnd flash unevenly.  \tYou are not a fire analyst.  You cannnot tell. \t\t(NB:  Neither am I.  And I cannot tell \t\tNor is the FBI spokesman \t\tNor is Reno \t\tMaybe we all should shut up and get a \t\t\tforensics analysis first.   \tYes. there was a flash:  in one room just pumped full of it.
 Women who are known not to want abortion services for example might be judged to be more likely to require prenatal care & coverage for childbirth... which can be an order of magnitude more expensive than abortion.   This topic should really be restricted to talk.abortion
    just a point i suppose if open mind means believing anything can be true or we can\t for sure know what is definitely true i\m happy to not be open minded.  if however open mindedness means being respectful and tolerant towards other beliefs respecting the rights and intelligence and wisdom of people of other beliefs and giving equal time to alternative ideas i try my very best to be open minded.  just a thot in passing.... :)     not being married i cannot say too much to you but from my perspective having mutually exclusive faiths would be a big enough roadblock for me in considering marrying someone.  making it much bigger than it is?  i suppose that depends on how serious each of you is in your beliefs.  lukewarm atheists and christians for whom religion is of nominal importance probly would feel the issue isn\t very big.  i suppose the more important your beliefs are to each of you

    Up to this point I was kinda hoping that this was a joke. Still it would make a great premise for a bad syndicated TV show- These are the adventures of the Oriental Templars... dedicated to truth justice
 \tI don\t see the effort to equate salvation with paradise.   \tRather
  Oops! Quite right. I got so busy that I saved Frank\s last post back then intending to respond when I could and I sort of forgot. I\ll try to do it soon if anyone\s still interested and probably even if they\re not.   Well yes maybe I am. I\m trying to have people buy and take on my opinions thus causing said opinions to spread in time-honoured memetic virus mode until the world is a veritable paradise. So how about it folks? As they say over here
qpalo@digi.lonestar.org (Gerry Palo)   For my money the primary danger of anti-cult groups is that they are every bit as wacky as the groups they oppose and that by and large they have no compunctions about printing lies half-truths and misleading innuendos as part of their exposes.  A recent book on cults I picked up by a Christian author quite simply mixed in all non-Christian religions (except the Jews) and various New Age groups with various fringe groups of dubious intent and legality.   Given the record of American Christianity any group that falls into the category of fundamentalist or born-again is automatically into the Inquisition business.  It is an unavoidable affliction of those who have a proprietary license on The Truth (tm). And let\s not forget that Jonestown and the Branch Davidians are just as much a part of the Christian tradition as the Missouri Synod Lutherans and may in fact be the Massadas of true Christian believers.  I am far more concerned about the encroachment of overtly Christian indoctrination into public schools than I am about yoga classes there.  For those concerned with religious freedom without a selective inquisitiorial bent:  People for the American Way P.O. Box 96200 Washington DC 20077-7500  Americans United for Separation of Church & State 8120 Fenton Street Silver Spring
 Only my common sense.  The fire was caused by either Koresh and his followers or by the FBI/ATF/CIA/KGB/and maybe the Harper Valley PTA.  Since you are throwing around the evidence arguement
   I think that you are changing the meaning of values here. Perhaps it is time to backtrack and take a look at the word.  value n. 1. A fair equivalent or return for something such as goods or service. 2. Monetary or material worth. 3. Worth as measured in  usefulness or importance; merit. 4. A principle standard or quality considered inherently worthwhile or desirable. 5. Precise meaning as of a word. 6. An assigned or calculated numerical quantity. 7. Mus.  The relative duratation of a tone or rest. 8. The relative darkness or lightness of a color. 9. The distinctive quality of a speech or speech sound.   In context of a moral system definition four seems to fit best. In terms of scientific usage definitions six or eight might apply. Note that these definitions do not mean the same thing.  In my mind to say that science has its basis in values is a bit of a reach. Science has its basis in observable fact. Even the usages of the word value above do not denote observable fact but rather a standard of measurement. I would conclude that science does not have its basis in values and so your statement above fails. In fact if one concludes that a scientific set of measurements (values) are based on systems derived from observation then it must follow that in a scientific context there is no such thing as there is no such thing as objective values.  Back to the present. This has nothing to do with a moral system anyhow. Just because the word values is used in both contexts does not mean that there is a relationship between the two contexts.  If one is to argue for objective values (in a moral sense) then one must first start by demonstrating that morality itself is objective. Considering the meaning of the word objective I doubt that this will ever happen.  So

 Yep that\s pretty much it. I\m not a Jew but I understand that this is the Jewish way of thinking. However the Jews believe that the Covenant between YHWH and the Patriarchs (Abraham and Moses in this case) establishes a Moral Code to follow for mankind. Even the Jews could not decide where the boundaries fall though.  As I understand it the Sadducees believed that the Torah was all that was required whereas the Pharisees (the ancestors of modern Judaism) believed that the Torah was available for interpretation to lead to an understanding of the required Morality in all its nuances (->Talmud).  The essence of all of this is that Biblical Morality is an interface between Man and YHWH (for a Jew or Christian) and does not necessarily indicate anything about YHWH outside of that relationship (although one can speculate).   The trouble with all of this is that we don\t really know what the created in His image means. I\ve heard a number of different opinions on this and have still not come to any conclusion. This rather upsets the Apple Cart if one wants to base a Life Script on this shaky foundation (to mix metaphors unashamedly!) As to living by Christ\s example we know very little about Jesus as a person. We only have his recorded utterances in a set of narratives by his followers and some very small references from comtemporary historians. Revelation aside one can only know Christ second-hand or worse.  This is not an attempt to debunk Christianity (although it may seem that way initially) the point I`m trying to make is that we only really have the Bible to interpret and that interpretation is by humanity. I guess this is where Faith or Relevation comes in with all its inherent subjectiveness.   No. There may be an absolute moral code. There are undoubtably multiple moral codes. The multiple moral codes may be founded in the absolute moral code. As an example a parent may tell a child never to swear and the child may assume that the parent never swears simply because the parent has told the child that it is wrong. Now the parent may swear like a trooper in the pub or bar (where there are no children). The wrongness here is if the child disobeys the parent. The parent may feel that it is inappropriate to swear in front of children but may be quite happy to swear in front of animals. The analogy does not quite hold water because the child knows that he is of the same type as the parent (and may be a parent later in life) but you get the gist of it? Incidentally

/(emery) /The one single historic event that has had the biggest impact on the /world over the centuries is the resurrection of Jesus.    This is hardly possible as the majority of people in the world were born lived their life and died without ever knowing anything about Christ.  The majority of the rest of the world have decided that he  is not who Emery thinks he is.    /(emery) /Why were the writers of the New Testament documents so convinced that /Jesus really did rise from the dead? /We have four gospel accounts.    I am leaving out all proofs of Emery\s which rely on quoting the bible as proof.  Circular reasoning etc.  There have been occasions already stated many times for later generations of Xtians to change edit or otherwise alter the bible to fit their political gospel. And if we accept the bible as true just because the bible says it is true then (to be fair) we have to do the same to the Bhagavad-Gita and the Koran both of which contradict the bible.  Enough said.    /(emery) /Yet we have no reason to believe these disciples to be immoral and dishonest. /We have no historic information that would lead us to the conclusion that /these people were not God-fearing people who sincerely and whole-heartedly /believed that the resurrection of their Lord Jesus was a real event. /And for what gain would they lie?  To make a stand at that time meant  /persecution imprisonment and perhaps even death.  Again this is only the biblical account and there is no independent proof of any of this happening.  It just isn\t there.  Besides simply being sincere or willing to die for your faith does not make your faith correct.  There are Muslims dying in Bosnia right now; does the fact that they are willing to die for Islam mean that Islam is the correct religion?     (emery) /History bears out the persecution of Christians.  Roman historian Cornelius  /Tacitus Govenor of Asia in A.D. 112 writing of Nero\s reign alluded to  /the torture of Christians in Rome:   All you have proven is that these people were tortured for their faith.  That does not prove that their faith is true or correct; it just means that they were sincere in their beliefs.   Being willing to die for what you believe doesn\t make your belief the truth. It\s not that easy.  And minority religions have always suffered torture; Muslims suffer torture and harassment in India and Bosnia today.  All religions are harassed in China today.  You haven\t proven anything so far.    /(emery) /With all the suffering and persecution that it meant to be a believer it /would be quite probable that at least one of those in the supposed conspiracy /would come forward and confess that the whole thing was a big hoax.    Not if they didn\t believe that it was a hoax.     /(emery) /Yet not one did.  It seems rather reasonable that the disciples did not make /up the resurrection but sincerely believed that Jesus had actually risen /from the dead; especially in light of the sufferings that came upon those /who believed.  The followers of Muhammad firmly believed in the miracles that the Koran says Muhammad performed.  They were attacked and slaughtered for their beliefs.  They didn\t denounce Muhammad or Islam.  If you are correct
 This deserves framing.  It really does.  [Atoms] aren\t even real.  Tell me then those atoms we have seen with electron microscopes are atoms now so what are they?  Figments of our imaginations?  The evidence that atoms are real is overwhelming
    A good point.  What helps to keep such things going is the public attitude that one should have faith; that some authority from on high should not be subjected to mere reason.  Couple this with a variety of personality quirks mojor and minor mental illnesses and ego of would-be leaders
   To you
Someone posted a list of x number of alleged Bible contradictions.  As Joslin said most people do value quantity over quality.  Dave Butler posted some good quality alleged contradictions that are taking a long time to properly exegete.  If you want a good list (quantity) - _When Critics Ask
 There\s another point to be made. Those who have been inside burning houses know that if they want to stay alive it\s better to run out from the building. We had one case where an FBI agent *had to  drag out a women* from the burning house she run back in when she saw the forces arriving. It is a good indication of the fanatical mind that the followers had -- including having they children burned instead of saving these innocent victims of the instance.  Cheers
I addressed most of the key issues in this very long (284 lines) post by Dean Kaflowitz in two posts yesterday.  The first was made into the title post of a new thread Is Dean Kaflowitz terminally irony-impaired? and the second more serious one appeared along the thread  A Chaney Post and a Challenge reissued and revised  both only in talk.abortion but I am posting its contents into talk.religion.misc as soon as I exit here.  This should be enough for us to thrash out for the next week or so.  The second post really grapples with the main bones of contention between us. The first is more lighthearted and tells about such things as  KaflowitzDebatingPoints [tm] which he continues to rack up on both talk.abortion and talk.religion.misc while setting follow-ups to  talk.abortion alone.  His lame excuse for the latter policy is that he gets a prompt as to where to set follow-ups
After tons of mail could we move this discussion to alt.religion? ============================================================= --There are many here among us who feel that life is but a joke. (Bob Dylan) --If you were happy every day of your life you wouldn\t be a human being
  It is true that Mormons believe that all spirits (including Jesus Lucifer Robert Weiss) are in the same family.  It does not mean that Jesus was created but rather that Lucifer and Robert Weiss were not.  I agree that this is a heresy.  So what?   The sweating of blood in Gethsemene is not a basic Mormon doctrine.  Jesus did not perform the atonement in Getheseme alone as some anti-Mormons are trying to teach.   As far as the unpardonable sin whatever that is it is Biblical and not specifically Mormon.  It is also called the sin against the Holy Ghost.  Most Bible scholars (other than conservative ones) do not believe Jehovah and Elohim were always the same. I\m sure you\ve heard of the J and the E texts?  I don\t know what you mean by That He needed to be saved.  Jesus? Jehovah?  Elohim?  In Mormon doctrine Jesus was sinless and thus did not need to be saved.     --  ---------------------------------------------------------------------------- Gordon Banks  N3JXP      | Skepticism is the chastity of the intellect
 Still searching for an irrelevant issue in which to mire a pro-lifer
 Christian anti-Semitism comes from the obvious fact that the Jews should know the Hebrew Scriptures better than anyone else yet they did not convert to Christianity en mass
 (1)  Stephen said you took a quote out of context (2)  You noted that Stephen had not replied to some other t.r.m article      (call it A) that took a quote out of context (3)  But the lack of evidence for X does not constitute evidence for the      lack of X  (a common creationist error) (4)  So the fact that Stephen did not reply to A does not justify the      conclusion that Stephen condoned taking quotes out of context in A (5)  You asked Stephen to explain why you were wrong and they were OK      or to acknowledge that he was being a hypocrite.   (6)  Both of the choices you give Stephen assume that he condoned      taking quotes out of context in A. (7)  I assumed you were being logical and that the sentence that begins      Could you please explain ... was not a nonsequitur but was intended      to follow from the sentence that preceded it. (8)  Therefore I concluded that you believed that (2) implied that Stephen      condoned taking quotes out of context in A (9)  But we\ve already seen that (2) does not imply this (10) Therefore you were incorrect to believe that (2) implied that Stephen      thought it was okay to take quotes out of context in A and were       making an error of a kind that is frequently made by creationists.  Is that better Jim?   It\s called an argument.  If you disagree with it explain why the argument is not sound.  (I admit that my assumption in (7) may have been a bit hasty.)  If you agree with it
:  : Probably not.  But then I don\t pack heavy weaponry with intent to use it. : You don\t really think he should have been allowed to keep that stuff do  : you?  If so tell me where you live so I can be sure to steer well clear.  I understand that they had the neccessary licenses and permits to own automatic weapons.    : The public also has rights and they should be placed above those of the : individual.  Go ahead call me a commie but you\d be singing a different : tune if I exercised my right to rape your daughter.  He broke the law he : was a threat to society they did there job - simple.  I haven\t seen any proof (or even evidence) that the BD\s had broken the law.  If you have proof (or evidence)
 #Rick Anderson replied to my letter with... # #ra> In article <C5ELp2.L0C@acsu.buffalo.edu> #ra>  (...)  # Just briefly on something that you mentioned in passing. You refer to # differing interpretations of create and say that many Christians may # not agree. So what? That is really irrelevant. We do not base our faith # on how many people think one way or another do we? The bottom line is # truth regardless of popularity of opinions.  It may be irrelevant to you and *your* personal beliefs (or should I say bias?) but it is relevant to me and many others.  You\re right the bottom line IS truth independant from you or anyone else.  Since you proclaim truths as a self-proclaimed appointee may I ask you by what authority you do this?  Because it says so in the Bible?  --Does the Bible say so or is it YOU or someone else who interprets whether a scripture or doctrine conforms to your particular liking or disapproval?  Excuse moi but your line of truths haven\t moved me one bit to persuade me that my beliefs are erroneous.  Of all the preachers of truth on this net you have struck me as a self-righteous member of the wrecking crew with no positive message to me or any other Latter-day Saint... BTW this entire discussion reminds me a lot of the things said by Jesus to the pharisees: ye hypocrite(s) . . . ye preach about me with your lips but your hearts are far removed from me...  # Also I find it rather strange that in trying to persuade that created # and eternally existent are equivalent you say granted the Mormon # belief... You can\t grant your conclusion and then expect the point to # have been addressed. In order to reply to the issue you have to address # and answer the point that was raised and not just jump to the # conclusion that you grant.  Sophistry.  Look who\s talking: jumping to conclusions?  You wouldn\t do that yourself right?  All YOU address is your own convictions regardless whether we come up with any Biblical scriptures which supports our points of view because you reject such interpretations without any consideration whatsoever.  # # The Bible states that Lucifer was created.  The Bible states that Jesus # is the creator of all. The contradiction that we have is that the LDS # belief is that Jesus and Lucifer were the same.  A beautiful example of disinformation and a deliberate misrepresentation of lds doctrine.  The former KGB would have loved to employ you. Jesus and lucifer are not the same silly and you know it.  (...)  # The Mormon belief is that all are children of God. Literally. There is # nothing symbolic about it. This however contradicts what the Bible # says. The Bible teaches that not everyone is a child of God:  Correction: it may contradict would YOU think the Bible says.  The Bible indeed does teach that not all are children of God in the sense that they belong to or follow God in His footsteps.  Satan and his followers have rebelled against God and are not children (=followers/redeemed) of God but it doesn\t mean that they were not once created by God but chose to separate themselves from those who chose to follow God and His plan of salvation.  # #        The field is the world; the good seed are the children of the #        kingdom; but the tares are the children of the wicked one; #        (Matthew 13:38)  kingdom are those who have remained valiant in their testimony of Jesus (and have shown works of repentance etc.) and the children of the wicked one are those who rebelled against God and the lamb.  The issue of satan\s spirit-origin (and of those who followed him) has not been addressed in this and other verses you copied from your Bible.  You purposefully obscured the subject by swamping your right with non- related scriptures.  (...lots of nice scriptures deleted (NOT Robert W. copyrighted) though...)  #ra> > We are told that And this is life eternal that they might know #ra> > thee the only true God and Jesus Christ whom thou hast sent. #ra> > (John 17:3). Life eternal is to know the only true God. Yet the #ra> > doctrines of the LDS that I have mentioned portray a vastly #ra> > different Jesus a Jesus that cannot be reconciled with the Jesus of #ra> > the Bible. They are so far removed from each other that to proclaim  Correction: my Jesus is indeed different than your Jesus and CAN be reconciled with the Jesus in the Bible.  --Not your interpretation of Him I concur but I honestly couldn\t care less.  #ra> > one as being true denies the other from being true. According to the #ra> > Bible eternal life is dependent on knowing the only true God and #ra> > not the construct of imagination.  In this single posting of yours I\ve seen more constructs of imagination than in all of the pro-lds mails combined I have read so far in this news group.  First get your lds-facts straight before you dare preaching to us about the only true God whom you interpret according to your own likes and dislikes but whose image I cannot reconcile with what I know about Him myself.  I guess your grandiose self-image does not allow for other faiths believing in the divinity of Jesus Christ but in a different way or fashion than your own.  Not that it really matters the mission and progress of the lds church will go on boldly and nobly and no mob or opponent can stop the work from progressing until it has visited every continent swept every clime and sounded in every ear.  #  This is really a red herring. It doesn\t address any issue raised but #  rather it seeks to obfuscate. The fact that some groups try to read #  something into the Bible doesn\t change what the Bible teaches.  Sigh.  What the Bible teaches?  Or: what the bible teaches according to Robert Weiss and co.?  I respect the former I reject the latter without the remotest feeling that I have rejected Jesus.  On the contrary.  And by the way I do respect your interpretations of the Bible I even grant you being a Christian (following your own image of Him) as much as I am a Christian (following my own image of Him in my heart).  (...)  #  Most of the other replies have instead hop-scotched to the issue of #  Bruce McConkie and whether his views were \official doctrine.\ I don\t #  think that it matters if McConkie\s views were canon. That is not the #  issue.  Were McConkie\s writings indicative of Mormon belief on this #  subject is the real issue. The indication from Rick is that they may #  certainly be.  The issue is of course that you love to use anything to either mis- represent or ridicule the lds church.  The issue of official doctrine is obviously very important.  McConkie\s views have been controversial (e.g. The Seven Deadly Heresies has made me a heretic!  ;-) at best or erroneous at worst (blacks not to receive the priesthood in this dispensation).  I respect him as someone who has made his valuable contribution to the church but I personally do NOT rely on his personal interpretations (his book Mormon Doctrine is oftentimes referred to as McConkie\s Bible in mormon circles) on mormon doctrine.  I rather look to official (doctrinal) sources and... to Hugh Nibley\s books! (The last comment is an lds-insider reference.)  Summarizing: McConkie was a wise man who contributed undoubtedly far more to the kingdom of God than I have but whose views are by no means dogma or accepted doctrine some of it clearly belongs to personal interpretation and speculation.  But having said this
 Or perhaps it\s because they think that all governmental bodies should be in the business of suppressing all beliefs other than their own
ZOROASTRIANISM SAN JOSE CA USA Monday April 5 1993 San Jose Mercury News Page 1      [Reproduced without permission]  _3700-year tradition still glows -             \Assimilation in U.S. threatens ancient Zoroastrian religion\_  By Jeanne Huber Mercury News Staff Writer     HIGH ON A HILLSIDE above San Jose flames leap up 24 hours a day from a gleaming brass urn in a temple - one of only four in the United States - dedicated to one of the world\s most ancient religions.     With the flames go the prayers of about 1200 Bay Area Zoroastrians that their faith will survive this land.     There is a fear - a real fear too said Silloo Tarapore of Lafayette. We have one generation to do it or to die.     Many immigrant groups struggle to maintain an identity in a strange land. But for Zoroastrians it is an especially poignant concern.     Their religion has been around for perhaps 3700 years a heritage so deep it scarcely seems comprehensible in a state where historical sites are sometimes less than 100 years old.  It was the religion of the great Persian Empire under kings Cyrus and Darius.  And tradition says that when Christ was born about 500 years later he was honored by a visit from three Zoroastrian priests the Magi.  Scholars say many key beliefs of Christians Jews and Muslims can be traced to the teachings of Zoroaster the Zoroastrian prophet.     Yet with only about 150000 Zoroastrians in the entire world they are  a miniscule minority in every country in which they live.  Survival as a people is very much on their minds.     Ironically local Zoroastrians fear that the almost unlimited tolerance of the United States may do what hundreds of years of persecution followed by nearly 1000 years of benign religious segregation could not do: cause their young people to stop thinking of themselves as Zoroastrians.     Zoroastrians do not believe theirs is the only right religion and they actually shun the notion of trying to win converts.  So if their children become totally assimilated they say it\s their children - rather than the world at large - who will be the losers.     It\s important to have an identity said Maneck Bhujwaia of San Jose a leader among Zoroastrians who came here from India.  It\s important for everybody - Irish Scottish Americans.  It gives meaning to life. You don\t have to depend on the majority community to give you respect. You can fall back on your own identity.     For Zoroastrians there\s much to be proud of.     Their prophet Zoroaster seeking to make sense of a culture in which animal sacrifice to multiple gods was common preached that there was only one god a good one.  Zoroastrians call their god Ahura Mazda which translates as Lord of Wisdom and Light.  _Good vs. evil_     Zoroaster saw life as a constant struggle between good and evil with the good eventually winning.  Men and women could join in the battle for good he said and he warned that they would inevitably suffer consequences such as shame and sorrow if they did wrong.  He preached honesty charity kindness to animals respect for the environment hard work equality of men and women - basic virtues preached by prophets of many religions.     But Zoroaster was perhaps unusual in that he told his followers not to follow him blindly.  He demanded they think for themselves.  In fact Joseph Campbell the famous scholar of the history and meaning of myths traced the Western emphasis on individual thought to the Zoroastrians.     Zoroastrians have many words for thought.  Their motto leaded into a stained glass window over the sacred fire at the temple on the slopes of Mount Hamilton is Good thoughts good words good deeds.     So it\s not surprising that Zoroastrians value education highly.  In India where a contingent of Zoroastrians arrived in the ninth century to escape persecution by Muslims in Iran Zoroastrians claim 100 percent literacy; the overall statistic in India is just 60 percent.     About half of the Bay Area Zoroastrian community came here from India and Pakistan mostly to study at universities.  The other half fled from Iran after the 1979 revolution made that a fundamentalist Islamic state where others had no rights.     Local Zoroastrians point with pride to ways their emphasis on good deeds has improved life in every country they inhabit.  In San Jose the recent restoration of the Hotel Sainte Clarie came about because Manou Mobedshahi a San Francisco-based hotelier passed the boarded-up downtown landmark on his way to and from the temple.  At the temple\s dedication the chief guest of honor was the mother of Zubin Mehta the Zoroastrian conductor of the New York Philharmonic Orchestra.     The temple exists because of another good deed: the decision by an Iranian emigre the late Arbab Rustom Guiv to buy land for six temples in North America.  Besides the 10-acre site off Crothers Road on Mount Hamilton he paid for land in Los Angeles Chicago New York Toronto and Vancouver.  Until his gifts there were no Zoroastrian temples on this continent.     Local Zoroastrians raised money to build the actual temple and the property already had a large house that they have converted to a community center.     The temple dedicated a year ago on the birthday of the prophet  Zoroaster is a simple structure with gleaming white walls vaulted  ceilings and oak floors partially covered with huge Oriental carpets.     Its central feature is the fire set in the middle of a partly-glassed- in area at the center of the building.  Although Zoroastrians are  sometimes called fire worshippers they actually consider fire just  a symbol of God.  It helps us concentrate just like Christians use the  cross and Muslims use the Holy Book Bhujwala said.     The biggest celebration of the years occurs in early spring.  For all Iranians including Zoroastrians the New Year begins on the first day of the season because of its symbolism as the start of new life.  With Zoroaster\s birthday just six days later the combination of religious and secular holidays creates something on par with what most of the United States celebrates between Christmas and Jan. 1.    For this year\s celebration of the prophet\s birthday about 500 people came to worship and revel.     The good things in life are not forbidden Esfandiar Anoushiravani a leader of the Iranian members had said beforehand and what followed proved him right.     Inside the temple worshipers filled every chair and sat or stood around the edges of the room as about a half-dozen priests chanted thanksgiving prayers around a table laden with braziers of smoking sandalwood glasses of milk and water and a tray heaped with dried fruit and nuts.     Kids crowded around grabbing handfuls of the treats.  People eat the fruit Tarapore said.  It\s a way to participate in the ceremony.  _Santa Claus sort of_     The gathering even had a Santa Claus Iranian style.  With flowing white hair and a bag of gifts for the children this Amownaroz wore green symbolic of spring) and red.     He was ushed in by a sort of spring clown Hajefyrouz who danced and played a tambourine.     The Zoroastrians from India were charmed.  This is all new for us too one told a visitor who asked what was going on.     A visitor John A. Sabanovich of Folsom said he became intrigued with the religion years ago while on business trips to Iran.  Zoroastrians have no procedure for accepting converts - a result some say of their centuries of persecution in Iran followed by their promise to the Hindu king who allowed them into India that they would not interfere with his people\s religion.     But that does not stop Sabavich from joining in the celebrations at the San Jose temple whenever he can.     When I first heard about this religion he said I thought my God this is what a religion should be.  They think for themselves and do good.     People who don\t have a tradition something to lean on
 Jesus certainly demonstrated the great depth of his love for the children who died today at the Davidian complex.  Sorry but the events today made me even more negative concering organized religion.  Cheers
[ deleted ] [ deleted ]    Your information on this topic is very much out of date.  Quantum Electro- dynamics (QED - which considers light to be particles) has been experimentally verified to about 14 decimal digits of precision under ALL tested conditions. I\m afraid that this case at least in the physics community has been decided. Laymen should consult QED - The Strange Theory of Light and Matter by Richard P. Feynman and for the more technically minded there\s The Feynman Lectures on Physics by Feynman
This discussion on objective seems to be falling into solipsism (Eg: the recent challenge from Frank Dwyer for someone to prove that he can actually observe phenomena).  Someones even made the statement that science is subjective and that even atom are subjective. This is getting a bit silly and the word objective is losing all meaning.  Lets start by remembering the definition of objective which has been already presented:    objective ADJ. 1. Of or having to do with a material object as      distinguished from a mental concept. 2. Having actual existence.     3.a. Unenfluenced by emotion or personal prejudice. b. Based on     observable phenomenon.  The Objectivity of a thing is not based on whether everyone agrees on that thing (eg: the world is objectively round regardless of the fact that there exist flat earthers) but rather whether it is based observable and verifiable phenomenon (instead of being based solely on peoples wishes feeling mental processes etc).  Thus atoms being based on very observable and repeatable phenomenon are indeed considered to be objective rather than subjective.  Even weird high energy physics is based on observable phenomenon (even though that observation can change the outcome).  Nor are those observable phenomenon affected by emotion or personal prejudice (eg: chemical reactions do not change to the whims of different people).  Thus to say that science is not objective (ie: objectively verifiable) is a bit silly as that is the point of science.  Now I will agree that science is not objectively good; I will not thereby conclude though that science is not objective.   Now some examples things which are objective:  A D-12 tractor is larger than the average breadbox.  Chlorophyll is green.  Seawater contains salt. There exists ozone in the atmosphere (at least presently).  Ozone blocks  ultraviolet light.  Ultraviolet light increases the incidents of skin Cancer.  Good on the other hand is a value judgement.  It doesn\t seem to have an existence apart from what we give it (unless someone can objectively show the existence of an omnipotent entity which has defined good).  We cannot quantify it touch it or collect it in any concrete sense (eg: I have a bag full of good).  Now we do sometimes attempt to give the word good an objective meaning e.g.  good has been used to denote strength resiliency speed etc.  That though is a subjective definition as some might not see strength and etc as necessarily good (eg: strength inspired by Naziism  is not generally viewed as good).   As to a morality I cannot say that I have ever seen a morality strictly based on verifiable observable phenomenon.  The closest I have seen is some form of the Golden Rule which concludes that it is best not to deliberately piss people off as they will likely then involve themselves in your life in a manner you won\t like.  This is verifiable; when you get in someone\s face they will often retaliate.  Another objective fact about morality is that a more powerful group can enforce their morality on a weaker group and thus can at times ignore that form of the Golden Rule without fear of reprisal.  Now as to whether this enforcing of morality is good or bad is quite subjective.  By the way remember that subjective does not mean that a thing cannot be formally stated or even commonly agreed upon; it only means that that it is not verifiable from observable phenomena or has a physical existence unto itself.  Also note that I have not stated that there is no such thing as an objective morality or that I could not accept any such a morality; I have simply stated that I have seen no evidence of any such morality.   One other thing to notice objective is many times used as synonymous with true and/or absolute and subjective sometimes has the connotation of false and/or relative. Tain\t necessarily so.  For instance when a conclusion is based on objective but insufficient evidence then it can be both objective and false.  As to absolute it is easy to note that while we can objectively show that TNT is explosive but that does not absolutely mean that all TNT will explode and thus objective is not necessarily absolute either.  On the other hand something subjective can also be either absolutist or true. For instance there are some theists who are specifically absolutist in their morality even though they have only subjective evidence to back it up.  Further many a scientist and detective has been motivated by subjective reasons (eg: a gut feeling or hunch) to investigate a phenomena or situation and gather the objective evidence necessary to support a true hypothesis.  On the whole though I would have to agree that objective evidence is much more trustworthy than subjective evidence.   \t\t\t\tLater
-*----   No.  It follows from the fact that most Christians\ choice of interpretation stems from a mix of beliefs that are influenced by the secular ethics of their culture and that are not fully determined by scripture.  Whether or not there is some right interpretation matters not; few Christians claim the ability to read the mind of their god.  Dave Davis should note that it was Michael who first stated the importance of secular and cultural influence in this thread.  I think Michael is right in this but regardless it should be noted that this has *not* been a point of contention between Michael and myself.   I have argued -- beyond Michael\s claims -- that the Christian scriptures are open to so many interpretations -- including a wide divergence within the Christian tradition -- that even their most important themes are vague.  Again it does not matter that there is some right interpretation *unless* there is a way to determine what that right interpretation is.  It is the lack of an objective measure not the presumed lack of an answer that puts the force behind the line I argue.   There are enough Christian glasses varying over a sufficiently broad range of color that I can find a few that support my example.     In my opinion what makes Michael radical is that he fully acknowledges that Christian scripture and tradition fail to determine the doctrines that so many branches within Christianity hold dear.  He is willing to live and practice his religion within this indeterminacy and he is willing to acknowledge that much of his understanding of things Christian is influenced by ideas that are not purely Christian.  Those Christians I have called conservative must also interpret but they do not recognize -- or at least are unwilling to admit -- the extent and importance of this.   I recognize that Michael is part of the tradition.  But what does it tell one about a tradition covering Origen Aquinas Jerry Fallwell and Jesse Jackson that it also includes Michael Siemon? Not very much!    I think the conclusion does follow.  The purely Christian principles that Michael has are the ones he shares with others in the Christian tradition or that can be derived from Christian scripture.  These necessarily vague are not enough to drive his political stances.  That one should love one\s neighbor is a  purely Christian principle.  That this means showing tolerance  for homosexuality is *not*.  As to these political stances they are often at odds with what is commonly held in most of current Christendom and so I  suspect they could be better pressed outside it.  (On the other hand I can well understand the counterpoint that these  political stances become most influential when presented to  those who need them most.)  -*----  Having barely survived the effort to finish in computer science
isaackuo@skippy.berkeley.edu (Isaac Kuo) states in reply to deleted article about no-knock searches arrests    In general no-knock raids are to preserve evidence like drugs which can be flushed down the toilet.  They are not the standard way to arrest a violent felon like a bank robber.  If there is no need to search or preserve evidence they will just surround the dwelling and order the suspect to come out with her hands up.  If the suspect does not come out tear gas will be used.   comment on the BD omitted    It is not a method to apprehend criminals.   It is a very dangerous method to obtain evidence that might be destroyed if a warrant is served in the normal way.  It is the most dangerous way to arrest anyone.  The cops are charging into a room and they don\t know what is in it.  It is much safer to surround the place and announce yourself.    Cops are not cops _until_ they identify themselves as police officers.   Most drug dealers and professional criminals are aware of the likelihood of arrest but they also know how the system works.  If they are arrested they call their lawyer post bail and hope for a plea bargain.  If they pull a gun and shoot a cop during a raid they will be charged with first degree murder if they survive the raid.  Drug dealers have guns for protection from their customers and other criminals not to shoot cops.  Cops are shot on no-knock drug raids because the criminals aren\t aware that they are cops.  No-knock raids on homes occupied by non-criminals are more likely to end in disaster.  Mom and Pop citizen _KNOW_ that they have not committed any crime
       Uh oh Michael; you typed hell and capitalized it to boot! Now Peter Nyikos will explain that you\re not a real Christian!     BZZT! Sorry Michael--the Nyikos Inquisition pointed out that I was hell-bound after one mildly scurrilous pun on revealing oneself. Admitting to masturbation--well
 You said everyone in the world.  That means *everyone* in the world including children that are not old enough to speak let alone tell lies.  If Jesus says everyone


    You hadn\t made that clear; I\m glad to have it clarified! So you\re a (physical) objectivist after all
(st) Stephen Tice  (km) Ken McVay   (st)Seems to me Koresh is yet another messenger that got killed (st)for the message he carried. (Which says nothing about the   (km)Seems to be barring evidence to the contrary that Koresh was simply (km)another deranged fanatic who thought it neccessary to take a whole bunch of (km)folks with him children and all to satisfy his delusional mania. Jim (km)Jones circa 1993.  I think there\s plenty of evidence to the contrary - six rescued Davidians consistantly recounted that the Federal tank knocked over a barrel of propane. These guys haven\t exactly been spending time together plotting an elaborate and consistent story. It would be contradictory for Koresh to go for mass suicide - remember that Koresh\s death was the opening of the sixth seal - the signal that Armageddon had begun. His army (the people in the compound) would then fight the powers of evil and win ending in the Rapture. The fire wiped out his army. I read earlier that Koresh was planning to walk out of the compound  and blow himself up with a grenade - that would jibe better with his teachings.  (st)In the mean time we sure learned a lot about evil and corruption. (st)Are you surprised things have gotten that rotten?  (km)Nope - fruitcakes like Koresh have been demonstrating such evil corruption (km)for centuries.  I\d think you\d be the last one to support gassing people and  burning them to death for their religious beliefs. Corrupt? Evil? I don\t know. We\ll never know. And when you start calling people  fruitcakes about their religious beliefs that\s dehumanizing people. We saw what happened when many Germans started believing that Jews were subhuman.  In one neat stroke they destroyed all the evidence that could have  pointed to wrongdoing. And killed all the witnesses including 12 children whose last view of life was choking and pain
 Last night CNN reported that FBI has infrared pictures showing that the fires started in three places at the same time. That  would indicate something not resembling an accident.  Cheers
Blessed are those \twho hunger and thirst \tfor righteousness

#I find myself unable to put these two statements together in a #sensible way: # #>Abortion is done because the mother can not afford the *pregnancy*. # #[...] # #>If we refused to pay for the more expensive choice of birth *then* #>your statement would make sense.  But that is not the case so it doesn\t. # #Are we paying for the birth or not Mr. Parker?  If so why can\t the #mother afford the pregnancy?  If not what is the meaning of the #latter objection?  You can\t have it both ways.  Birth != pregnancy.  If they were the same the topic of abortion would  hardly arise would it
--  Douglas C. Meier\t\t|  You can\t play Electro-magnetic Golf Northwestern University ACNS \t|  according to the rules of Centrifugal This University is too Commie-\t|  Bumblepuppy. -Huxley
 Looking at your discussion I would say that you both operate from your own reference frame. There\s no inside and no outside there are just two polarized views. As for statements inside the Bible things are still not that clear we don\t have any indications for instance why Jobs was placed in the Old Testament one of the  few books that actually talks about Satan. Jobs is very much out of line with the rest of the OT books and there\s a chance that someone added this book later into the group of OT scriptures.   This operates the other way around as well. You have to understand the mind of an atheist agnostic or as in my case a radical relativist. If you don\t understand the underlying concepts it is  pretty hard to continue with a dialogue. I\m not a perfect Christian however about 20+ years of Christian teaching should have provided me with a pretty good picture of the Christian mind frame.  Cheers
: >But if entertainment (company) sell computer programs saying they are virus  : >safe. Doesn`t they have burden of proof that viruses don`t exist in their  : >floppies ?  : I don\t think so.  The assumption is there.  If it turns out that : their software has a virus then it is up to you to prove that fact : to a court to get any damages.  You are theoretically suppossed to  : be able to get damages for that but you have to give some evidence : that the virus came from that software.  But since the computer : company is the defendent they are uninvolved until proven guilty.  All right. I\m not and won\t be lawyer. What about doctors? I going to fly aeroplane (or drive car). Doctors have to look for different kind of illnesses in me before I get permission to fly an aeroplane. They have burden of proof that harmful illnesses don\t exist in me do they ?  (I\m just questioning my belief that believers have the burden of proof.)  : Please
\tThis seems appropriate somehow...>:-)> [....] \tHah!  I have it on the very *best* authority (mine) that Koresh is whooping it up in a time-share condo in Dallas with Elvis JFK and (of course) J.R. Bob Dobbs who also owns the place and everything else in Texas. \tLook for koresh sightings in the Weekly World News and National Enquirer in the coming months. \t************************************************************ \t*  \tThe_Doge of South St. Louis\t\t\t   * \t*\t\tDobbs-Approved Media Conspirator(tm)\t   * \t*\tOne Step Beyond  -- Sundays

 If a Christian means someone who believes in the divinity of Jesus
    My understanding of the academic use of the word cult is that it is a group of people oriented around a single authority figure. It need not be religious. However I have seen plenty of religious cults
=Hmm.  The police strategy of bursting in with weapons drawn clearly marked as =officers and yelling Police repeatedly.  This is used every day to bust drug =houses.  The idea is to awe the suspects into submission with surprise and =display of firepowere in order to avoid a gun fight.  As for not knocking it\s =a sad necessity in many cases since the suspects will attempt to escape or even =fight.  Usually this strategy works; if it didn\t then it wouldn\t be used so =commonly
  Convenient?  It seems very appropriate that this is cross-posted to alt.conspiracy.  Assuming the most favorable interpretation of your \1000 degree\ measurement (that the temperature is in Centigrade rather than the more common -in the US- Fahrenheit) you are still laboring under at least 2 misconceptions:  1.  You seem to believe that steel melts somewhere around 1000 C.     Actually the melting point of most iron alloys (and steels are     iron alloys) is in the neighborhood of 1400 C.  Even if the gun     were found in area which achieved the 1000 C temperature the steel     parts of the gun would not be deformed and it would still be     trivial to identify the nature of the weapon.  2.  A fire is not an isothermal process.  There are \hot\ spots and     \cold\ spots though \cold\ is purely a relative term.   So the     weapon was not necessarily situated in a hot spot as you seem to     imply.  And even if it was
 No Dave and as an anthropologist I take great umbrage with this  misrepresentation.  I sense that it is you that has made the jump from creation (science) to religion (see above).  I have characterized science/*creation  science* as rationalism/nonsense and that it is.  When people promote their  religious beliefs as science they become nonsense.  Kept where they belong  they are meaningful and useful as virtually any anthropologists will tell you and as I have said several times in this group.  And it works the other way  too and I have repeatedly said so.  Never have I said or meant anything  different here or elsewhere and I don\t think my communication skills betray me.  Nor do I presume to offend people\s spiritual sensibilities
 I also heard the Romans had a large Solar festival on this day because this day about 3 days after the Winter Solstice was when you could notice a change in the shadows and be sure that the Sun was indeed returning. In fact I remember the latin phrase Natalis Solis Invicti (sp!) associated here.  I can\t say for certain when Saturnalia was
God ItSelf appeared to me and spoke to me saying Rawlins has been listening to a deamon
 If the children are not being fed whose fault is that?  You and I have plenty of food on our tables while others starve.  Why is that? God gave us this earth to manage.  I don\t think we\re doing a very good job of it.  The only consolation I have for those suffering children is that they will be received into the kingdom of Heaven where they will never thirst and never hunger again.  Peace be with you
 Yes one does.  I examined a critique of the Book of Romans by I think Benjamin Franklin once a Deist.  I found it amazing that Benjamin Franklin missed the whole boat.   I also have the writings on Thomas Jefferson sitting on my shelf and it is amazing how much he missed.  I have studied Plato\s Theory of Forms and  Aristotelian Hylomorphesism.  What a pile of junk.  Jesus makes Plato and Aristotle look like kindergardeners.  Psychology the id ego superego by Freud?  Elements of truth but Jesus explained it far better and gave reasons.  Thomas Paine Benjamin Franklin Thomas Jefferson are mere men.  They can screw up the Bible just as well as any man.  I do not put these men on a pedestal.  And if I remember T.J.\s autobiography correctly he thought Thomas Paine was the most unread man he ever met.  Here\s some more circular reasoning to you.  Paul says to the Corinthians that that the gospel will be foolishness to the world because it is  spiritually discerned.  And so people without the spirit of God haven\t a clue to what the Bible is saying.   From your point of view that\s incredibly circular and convenient.   To me it is mysteriously and supernaturally bizarre.   I can see it but you can\t.  This is not arrogance on my part.  Trust me.  It is as bizarre to you as it is to me.  But nonetheless it is a truth explainable or not.  Are any of you color blind to red and green?  I am.  Remember those dot tests they do at the optomologist\s?  They put pictures in front of you and you are supposed to identify the pattern in the dots?  If your eyes are perfectly normal you can see letters or numerals embedded in the dots.  They are a slightly different color and stand out from the background.  But if you are color blind to red and green you will not see anything but gray-shaded dots.  That is how a dot test appears to me.  I do not see a pattern at all.  A normal seeing person will see the patterns.  And to him I seem like a total anomaly.  To him I appear as if I am missing the universe or something. It is hard for him to understand why I can\t see anything that to him is as plain as day.  That it what it is like with the Bible the Word of God to the believer. The believer can see the meaning in the words.  I can see how the patterns fit together.  There is such depth.  Such consistency.   But then on the other hand I notice the non-believer.   He doesn\t see it.  He thinks I am weird because he thinks I am seeing things.   I look at him and say No you are weird.  You do not see.   Then it is time for a sanity check.  I go to another Christian and say Do you see this.  And they go Yes.  It is an X.  And I say Thank God I see the X too.  It is truly the strangest thing.   It adds a little extra dimension to the phrase            He will make the blind see
    As opposed to Universal or Catholic or FourSquare Gosple. I think that    the Greek Orthodox Church would take high offense at your misuse of the    word. Your version of Christianity is neither mainstream nor bible derived    you make claims of bible-centricity that are not derivable soley from the    Bible.  About six-seven months ago you claimed that your primary objection    to the LDS was that our doctrine was not bible-derived And now this    (and other) claims can be shown are also not bible interpeting bible.     \tSimple truths... oh for example?              paradise exalted to heaven  \tparadise wasn\t equal to heaven and _now_ it is? Yet you claim that  \tpeeple can not be exalted to heaven nicht wahr?   \tWhen I read the story I found that  Abraham\s Bosom wasn\t so much \ta place but somewhere the rich man could see and talk to Abraham?  \tGee this is fairly close to what the LDS call spirit prison and what         you have called false doctrine...      [ vers deleted reproduced below quoted from the SunSpot Gopher Archive ]        This part is _not_ supported from scripture nor does it support your    claim that the paradise where Christ descended was exalted.     Making such claims on this little evidence ignores the witness of the    scripture     Using this to argue that paradise or spirit prison is now changed from    a Pre-Easter postion to post-easter by God postion is not supportable.      Makeing such a claim requires more evidence than you have given here...       Yes and your reasons are in general not supported by any direct reading   of the scriptures. You have demonstrated that you claims to scriptural    proof need to be cross-checked. The referencs that you supply often do   not support your postion if they are read in the context of the scripture.    \tHow about that those who have been in paradise and have accepted \tthe gosple will be judged of Jesus Christ
   So Rick
In <1993Apr24.214843.10940@midway.uchicago.edu> eeb1@quads.uchicago.edu   If the ONLY people proposing a moment of silence are doing so as a sham to sneak in prayers then it MUST be opposed.  What the HELL have prayers to do with public schooling?  [I ask this question as a devout Christian.]    Their kids can bloody-well pray any God-damned time they WANT to.  And nothing on heaven or earth in government or the principal\s office can prevent or in any other way deal with their doing so.  *Especially* if the prayer is silent (as bursting out into the Shema Yisrael or some other prayer *might* be construed as disruptive if audible :-)) No one ever prevented ME from praying in public school!  They hardly even prevented me from masturbating in study hall.  I should have thought better of someone posting from a UChicago address. How can you manage to say such nonsense without shame?  Muslim students might have a complaint if they are prevented from setting out their rugs and doing the proper ablutions before prayer at the times specified in the Qu\ran.  Jews would probably like the opportunity to daven with tefillim and whatever else *they* require at *their* appropriate times. I do not see THEM complaining (though Muslims and Jews have a case that no Christian I have ever heard has been able to make.)  The Christian insistence on a PUBLIC UNIVERSAL
 Um I think you and the Bible are the ones inside the wall.  There\s a really wonderful world out here.  You really should peek out at it sometime.  The silly things you keep saying only reinforce the fact that we *are* on opposite sides of a very high wall.  I see how incredibly beautiful things are on my side and I only keep telling you about it because I\d like to you come join me here.   I never said that.  I said that I would PREFER to cease to exist than to be tossed into any god\s version of Hell.   You say to me Brian come up here and take a look from this vantage point.  But you\re in a valley looking at a crayon drawing of a sun and a tree and I can\t for the life of me figure out why you\re so immersed in it.  *I*\m the one trying to get you to come up HERE
Newsgroups: talk.religion.misc Subject: On-line copy of Book of Mormon Summary:  Distribution: usa Organization: Advanced Decision Systems Mtn. View CA (415) 960-7300 Keywords: BOM Book of Mormon
-*----  Far from being tossed out the gospels are taken almost universally as the primary source of information about Jesus. I am curious as to whom Mike Cobb is referring.  Who tosses out the New Testament?  Undoubtedly a few *naive* atheists do this but the phrasing of the question above seems to suggest that Cobb ascribes this more broadly.  Perhaps the question that gets more to the heart of the matter is why except for some *naive* believers (who unfortunately far outnumber nonbelievers both naive and critical) are the gospels *not* taken as gospel truth that faithfully records just what happened two thousand years ago?  This has an easy answer and the answer has *nothing* to do with miracles: no text is taken this way by a critical reader.  There is a myth among some naive believers that one takes a text measures it by some set of criteria and then either confirms the text as historically valid or tosses out the text.  I suspect this myth comes from the way history is presented in primary and secondary school where certain texts are vested with authority and from writers such as Josh McDowell who pretend to present historical arguments along these lines for their religious program.  In fact most texts used in primary and secondary school history classes ought to be tossed out even the better such texts should not be treated as authoritatively as descibed above and Josh McDowell would not know a historical argument if it bit him on the keister twice.  Let me present the barest outlines of a different view of texts and their use in studying history.  First all texts are historically valid.  ALL texts.  Or to put this another way I have never seen a notion of historical validity that makes any sense when applied to a text.  Second no text should be read as telling the gospel truth about historical events in the way that many students are wont to read history texts in primary and secondary school.  NO text.  (This includes your favorite author\s history of whatever.)  Every text is a historical fact.  Every text was written by some person (or some group of people) for some purpose.  Hence every text can serve as historical evidence.  The question is: what can we learn from a text?  Of what interesting things (if any) does the text provide evidence?  The diaries of the followers of the Maharishi formerly of Oregon are historical evidence.  The gospels are historical evidence.  The letters of the officers who participated in the  vampire inquests in Eastern Europe are historical evidence.  The modern American history textbooks that whitewash great American figures are historical evidence.  These are all historical evidence of various things.  They are *not* much evidence at all that the Maharishi formerly of Oregon could levitate; that Jesus was resurrected; that vampires exist; or that great American figures are as squeaky clean as we learned in school. They are better evidence that some people saw the Maharishi late of Oregon
The universe mirrored in a puddle. Isn\t it amazing how there *always* seems to be *another* bottle of bheer there?  Aleph *one* bottles of beer on the wall Aleph *one* null bottles of beer!  \tyou too are a puddle. \tAs above
I found this on the net at my college. It sounds pretty good to me. What do     you folks think?      >This are the tenets of Stan as handed down and set within the Holy Book      >of Stan.     >     >1: Thou shalt not spill thine drinks or waste thine food for all that      >is is sacred and to waste is the denizen of Luc the Infidel. All who      >waste today shall have not tomorrow.     >     >2: Thou shalt pay heed to those who know the higher calling of Stan so     >that they may teach you the way and that thou shalt become one with     >Stan and the universe shall be in your hands.     >     >3: Thou shalt honor thy loved ones and cherish those near you for they     >are the true path to happiness and happiness is a devine gift of thy     >lord Stan.     >     >4: Stan is the one true God and shall be taken before all others so     >that the false gods will know that he is the one and all who oppose     >him shall forever be banished to the form of the sheep and be sent to     >the flocks of Luc for all eternity.     >     >5: The word is the law and the law is the word. The word is within     >thine own heart follow the path and be true to thine own self and thou     >shalt be blessed by Stan thy lord and saviour.     >         >6: Thou shalt honor the faiths of others for it is their choice to     >follow this path and do not think less of others for being of a     >different faith yet even in the face of these false gods do not     >waiver in thine faith in Stan and hope that the unbeliever will see     >the light that is Stan.     >     >7: Thou shalt not wrong others for being different for Stan cherishes     >the different and holds freedom in the highest regard for to do less     >would be to fall in with Luc the Infidel for Stan does not control     >he merely guides and lets the choice lie within thine own heart.     >     >8: Thou shalt know that thy lord Stan has many names and is called     >differently by many people but know also that Stan is the true name     >and all those of the faith shall know that Stan is God and God is Stan.     >     >9: Thou shalt be to the world what thou art to thineself for to be     >false to others is to be false to yourself. Thy lord Stan asks not that     >you be like him he asks only that you be like yourself for that is all     >you were ever meant to be.     >     >10: Thou shalt not kill the innocent nor spill blood unnecessarily for     >those who are deserving of death shall be dealt with by Stan and sent     >for all eternity to the flocks of Luc and those who harm the children      >of Stan being born of Woman shall be judged as the sheep of     >Luc and spend all of time within his flocks.     >     >These commandments are the words of Stan. Heed them and he shall be     >happy and if thy lord Stan is happy
 Hmm it seems that this is the core of Christianity then you  have to feel guilty and then there\s this single personality that will save you from this universal guilt feeling.  Brian I will tell you a secret I don\t feel guilty at all I do mistakes and I regret them however I\ve never had this huge guilt feeling hanging over my shoulder.  If things happen wrong I will try to learn from the mistakes and go on.  This all is a very clear indication that you need a certain personality type in order to believe and adjust to certain religious doctrines. And if your personality type is  opposite then you are not that easily attached to a certain world view system.   All I know is that I don\t know everything. And frankly speaking I don\t care life is fun anyway. I recognize that I\m not  perfect but that does not hinder me from have a healthy and inspiring life.  There are humans that subscribe to the same notion. The nice thing is that when you finally shake off this huge burden the shoulders feel far more relaxed!  Cheers
 \tI\m not sure that you can distinguish between myth and legend so neatly or at all.  A myth is more than a single story.  The thought  structure and world-paradigm in which that story is interpreted is as important a part of the myth as the story itself.  Thus I can think of no story which is meant to be conveyed understandably from one person to another within a single culture which won\t rest upon that underlying thought structure
 Its just variation within a thread.  The variation at times has been so great that speciation has occurred.  So Albert Sabin is the common ancestor of several threads some of which have themselves speciated.  On a separate topic I subscribed to t.o. just recently.  Albert Sabin existed at that time
 We have reached the point in our society when there are certain crimes that are so heinous that to merely be accused with them one is automaticly considered guilty and deemed not to have any natural rights much less civil  rights. Among these are drug abuse sexual perversion and political  incorrectness. Today Billary accused Koresh of having SEX with infants. He had been accused of a number of differing crimes (inconsistantly) over the last two months but  this is the first time I have heard that one. I had heard child abuse but this is somewhat stronger. It is fairly obvious that Koresh  was hiding behind the children; and ironicly considering his apocalyptic dread believed enough in the American People\s inherent goodness to believe he was protected. It is truly amazing that all these people who 60 days ago had never heard of  the Branch Davidian now believe that he was suicidal crazy
I am pleased to announce that a *revised version* of _The Easy-to-Read Book of Mormon_ (former title: _Mormon\s Book_) by Lynn Matthews Anderson is now available through anonymous ftp (see information below). In addition to the change in title the revised ETR BOM has been shortened by several pages (eliminating many extraneous that\s and of\s) and many (minor) errors have been corrected. This release includes a simplified Joseph Smith Story testimonies of the three and eight witnesses and a Words-to-Know glossary.  As with the previous announcement readers are reminded that this is a not-for-profit endeavor. This is a copyrighted work but people are welcome to make *verbatim* copies for personal use. People can recuperate the actual costs of printing (paper copy center charges) but may not charge anything for their time in making copies or in any way realize a profit from the use of this book. See the permissions notice in the book itself for the precise terms.  Negotiations are currently underway with a Mormon publisher vis-a-vis the printing and distribution of bound books. (Sorry I\m out of the wire-bound first editions.) I will make another announcement about the availability of printed copies once everything has been worked out.  FTP information: connect via anonymous ftp to carnot.itc.cmu.edu then cd pub (you won\t see anything at all until you do).  The Easy-to-Read Book of Mormon is currently available in postscript and RTF (rich text format). (ASCII LaTeX and other versions can be made available; contact dba@andrew.cmu.edu for details.) You should be able to print the postscript file on any postscript printer (such as an Apple Laserwriter); let dba know if you have any difficulties. (The postscript in the last release had problems on some printers; this time it should work better.) RTF is a standard document interchange format that can be read in by a number of word processors including Microsoft Word for both the Macintosh and Windows. If you don\t have a postscript printer you may be able to use the RTF file to print out a copy of the book.  -r--r--r--  1 dba                   1984742 Apr 27 13:12 etrbom.ps -r--r--r--  1 dba                   1209071 Apr 27 13:13 etrbom.rtf  For more information about how this project came about please refer to my article in the current issue of _Sunstone_ entitled Delighting in Plainness: Issues Surrounding a Simple Modern English Book of Mormon.  Send all inquiries and comments to:      Lynn Matthews Anderson     5806 Hampton Street     Pittsburgh
 Faith and intelligence tell me that when a druggie breaks into my house at night with a knife to kill me for the $2 in my wallet


:  : > Surely you are not equating David Koresh with Christianity? The two are : > not comparable. :  : This is always an option: when the sect is causing harm re-label : the cult to something else. :  : Cheers : Kent  Good point.  I would not doubt that DK could have spouted verse and debated with best. According to reports his extensive Bible knowledge was one way he sucked in the fools (followers?).  Quote bible all you want. I too judge what you say be what you do and even more by if it makes sense.  Sense
 That\s right.  Everyone.  Even infants who cannot speak as yet.  Even a little child will rebelliously stick his finger in a light socket. Even a little child will not want his diaper changed.  Even a little child will fight nap-time.  So far as Jesus saying everyone:        A certain ruler asked Jesus Good teacher what must I do to     inherit eternal life?      Why do you call me good?  Jesus answered.  No one is good--     except God alone.  Ken the book of Romans states that we are born sinners.  We do not grow into being a sinner.  We sin because we are sinners.  The common mistake even in Christian circles is to think the reverse true.    So for as surely as you grew to look like you parents you not only inherited their appearance
    Wow this is news to me---it started in Tarsus--you know where Paul of NT fame was from.  Not to be nasty but get a clue
 #Recently I\ve asked myself a rather interesting question: What RIGHT does #god have on our lives (always assuming there is a god of course...!) ?? # #In his infinite wisdom he made it perfectly clear that if we don\t live #according to his rules we will burn in hell. Well with what RIGHT can god #make that desicion? Let\s say for the sake of argument that god creates #every one of us (directly or indirectly it doesn\t matter.). What then #happens is that he first creates us and then turns us lose. Well I didn\t #ask to be created. # #Let\s make an analogue. If a scientist creates a unique living creature #(which has happened it was even patented...!!!) does he then have the #right to expect it to behave in a certain matter or die...?  Dear Joakim let me begin by saying that these are excellent questions but that by asking you will find as many different explanations as there are respondents.  As a Latter-day Saint I believe that all of us (you me etc.) lived once as spirit-children of God the Father (Hebrews 12:9) in the pre-mortal existance. In order to continue our eternal progression an earthly probationary time was required.  (To live by faith not by sight to choose good over evil and to prepare ourselves in all things to become worthy of a higher order of existance.)  We believe that all of God\s spirit-offspring were once assembled to discuss the specifics of this earthly sojourn.  One-third chose for Lucifer\s plan most followed the Firstborn (the pre-mortal Jesus Christ).  Lucifer\s aspirations (I will exalt my throne above the stars of God . . . Isaiah 14:12-17 etc.) resulted into the rebellion of his followers against the Firstborn and those who followed Him resulting in the casting out of Lucifer (who became Satan the father of lies) and one-third of the hosts of heaven (And his tail drew the third part of the stars of heaven and did cast them to the earth . . . Revelation 12:4) as demons (evil spirits).  To get back on OUR choice to be born on this earth and to be subject to God and His plan (for good or bad based upon our obedience and choices) we made that choice individually.  (God speaking to Job: Where wast thou when I laid the foundations of the earth . . . when the morning stars sang together and all the sons of God shouted for joy? Job 38:4-7).  We lost the knowledge of our pre-mortal existance (the Veil of Forgetful- ness somewhere in Psalms) in order to live by faith not by sight.  You may not accept this scenario neither do quite a few who rely on the Bible alone which offers only fragmentary insights into this particular aspect of our existence as individuals as sons and daughters of God.  #Who is god to impose its rules on us ? Who can tell if god is REALLY so #righteous as god likes us to believe? Are all christians a flock of sheep #unable to do otherwise that follow the rest? # #Hmmmmmmmmmmmm.  (All Christians by definition ARE a flock of sheep following the Shepherd as they understand Him  ;-)  --But in any event not all Christians believe in the same theology such as the one Latter-day Saints believe in.  (They will cry heresy and other accusations of perverting the doctrines of the Bible while they themselves believe in a myriad of interpretations as found in their catechisms and various do-it-yourself Bible-study manuals...)  As for me I have a personal conviction that the pre-existance scenario as explained above is most in harmony with Biblical doctrine some Dead Sea Scroll books the pseudographion other (Jewish) sources and last but not least modern-day revelation on the subject.  #I just want to point out that this is not sarcasm I mean it. # #                        How should one deal with a man who is convinced that #                        he is acting according to God\s will
   Word is that the ones he let go were not his. ---  ----------------------------------------------------------------------------  ---------Visit the SOUNDING BOARD BBS +1 214 596 2915
 Good point.  If you haven\t read The True Believer by Eric Hoffer do so at your first opportunity.  I don\t know why Hoffer is out of style now
Brian Kendig first states:   I ask:   Brian Kendig states:   Make up your mind.    And we do not end perfect either.  We are never perfect.  Can you name one person young or old past or present that you deem perfect?  Good luck.   Then you lie to yourself.  You do not know your shortcomings.  I have clearly shown one of your shortcomings if not two.  That is ignorance of the Bible and the arrogance you demonstrate butchering it without even knowing its  contents.   Because you have been too prideful to examine the record of him for yourself. And to demonstate your lack of support for your conclusion I bet you do not even know what the word Christ means.  Or which prophet used Christ to  describe the Son of Man.    Yes.  I agree with that.  So we must learn first.  Read the Bible.  Come up with our own interpretation.   Evaluate what is being said and by whom.  Check the history books as well.  Compare someone else\s interpretation with your own.  Then make a judgment.  But I tell you the truth 99\% of what is being said in the Bible needs interpretation as  much as a coffee cup needs interpretation.  And remember the Bible isn\t a Guru\s Esoteric Guide to Metaphysics.   It doesn\t take a theologian to understand what is being said.    The  Bible is a bunch of testimonies from people like you and I addressed  to people like you and I.  These guys wrote down what they saw and heard.  Is it  their open diary--and they want to tell you something.  And because they want you to know something they make it very clear what they want you to know.   They didn\t encouch their ideas in esoteric rhetoric but in simple straight-forward language.   You have chosen the road that avoids the Bible.  You have chosen the road that avoids a confrontation with the living God because that road doesn\t look appealing to you.  You rather build your own road.  One that goes far away from that confrontation.   But be assured of this you will have to confront him one day willingly or unwillingly.    I see what you mean.  I hear what your saying.  I am not degrading your life.  But I have heard the same irrational excuses for years.  There is nothing  new in what you are saying.  And by your own words you are spouting off  contradictions.   If contradictions give you meaning then your life must be sad.   Bingo.  For God so loved the world he GAVE his only begotton to son so that whososever belives in him will have ever lasting life.   I look what God *did*.  He has given his Son even to his death so that I can have  hope in his resurrection and know that life isn\t for nothing but has glorious purpose.   Because you turn your eyes away from testimony and history.  You choose to lie to yourself that he doesn\t exist for you ignore what has been said for  thousands of years.  You sound exactly almost verbatim like the Lazarus of  Jesus\s story starting in Luke 16:19.  And the conclusion of that story is a  bleak one.  Lazarus wound up in hell.  The story ends like this:        For if Lazarus doesn\t even listen to Moses and the Prophets        he won\t even believe if a man rose from the dead.   Arrogance at its best.   The fact is you are not rational.  Several specific cases  have already been cited.   And again with this new statement you show more irrationality with regards to heaven.  Jesus does tell you something of what to expect in heaven.  Jesus expects you to use your brain to believe in him.  Jesus does not expect you to placate either.  Jesus wants you to willingly come to him but not as his grovelling slave but rather as his brother who will share in his glorious riches.  Why do you not pick up the Bible and read it for yourself.   You maintain you have an open mind.  See whether you are lying to yourself for yourself.    I do understand what you said.   But that\s is not what I feel went amiss here.  You missed the point.  Living a good life has no eternal consequences. Once they close the amusement park of life to you that is the end.  To you it  is over.  To you therefore your time spent in the amusement park is meaningless.  It has no eternal consequences to you nor to anyone left on earth.   But then you contradict yourself.  From a previous post you said doing evil things  is bad.  To you it shouldn\t matter if you do evil things or good things.  It is all meaningless in the end anyway.  So go rob a bank.  Go tell someone you dislike that he is a dirty rotten slime bag.  What\s restraining you? Life after all has no eternal consequences and accountability is irrelevant.   At which time you are truly not the master of yourself.   So you (and your holy book) say.  By the same token therefore Santa Claus delivers toys every xmas.  Don\t you see?  I have NO REASON to believe that what you say is true.  Please give me some reason that I can\t similarly apply to Santa Claus.  You have EVERY reason to believe that what Jesus says and the witnesses of Jesus say are true.  But you choose to be unreasonable and ignore the reasons.  By definition ignorance.   Santa Claus is said to live at the North Pole and have a squad of elves and flying reindeer.   Ever see a flying reindeer?  Has anyone in human history seen a flying reindeer?  Has anyone seen a reindeer whose nose  blinks red?      On the other hand are people born in Bethlehem?  Was Nebuchandezzar really a king?  Was Daniel really one of his court officials?  Were David and Solomon really kings of Israel and Judah?  Was their really a king called Jehoachin? Did Sennecherib really attack Jerusalem 600 years before Christ?  Did Sennacherib really lose his battle--and badly?   Was there really a  Caiaphas who interrogated Jesus?   Yes yes yes . . . history verifies it.  It is NONFICTION.  Do you have a problem discerning truth from fiction?  Perhaps you can\t evaluate the context of Grimm\s Fairy Tales apart from that of the Scientific American.  I suppose you treat both with equal truthfulness or equal falsity.  Is this what you are telling me?  Or is it that just do want to read the Scientific American and find out that it\s not a fairy tale?   Get real.  Have you ever been to Zaire?  Do you have to go there to be  assured that there really is such a place?  Given your  irrationality
 I see what you are getting at (or at least I think I do).  Correct me if I am mistaken but I *think* you are asking me if I still believe that we should uphold all of the Laws pertaining to capital punishment for such things as adultery rape and other heinous crimes.  As you may recall Jesus was confronted by this same question in regards to the adultress who was caught in the act and brought before Jesus.  And His reply Let he who is without sin cast the first stone.  Jesus does not deny the sentence that is to due for this violation of the Law.  What do you think of this?   Agreed.  :)    Agreed also.  If one is to use the Bible as a reference one must always be open to different interpretations.  As a Christian I have the Spirit of God to verify what I believe in the Word.  If what the Spirit tells me is not backed up in scripture then the spirit I am communicating with is not of God.  After all Jesus tells us to test the spirits to know for sure that it is from God.   I obey what the Spirit of God tells me to do.  The Spirit will not violate anything that is written in the Bible because that is the Word of God.  I do not worship pastors preachers my wife my mother or my father.  What they tell me does not carry the weight of what God tells me to do and His commands are rienforced in the Bible.    Eternal damnation is the consequence of the choice one makes in rejecting God.  If you choose to jump off a cliff you can hardly blame God for you  going *splat* at the bottom.  He knows that if you choose to jump that  you will die but He will not prevent you from making that choice.  In fact He sent His Son to stand on the edge of the cliff and tell everyone of what lies below.  To prove that point Jesus took that plunge Himself but He being God was able to rise up again.  I have seen the example of Christ and have  chosen not to jump and I\m trying to tell you not to jump or else you\ll  go *splat*.   You don\t have to listen to me and I won\t stop you if you decide to jump. I only ask that you check it out before taking the plunge.  You owe it to yourself.  I don\t like seeing anyone go *splat*.  God be with you
 According to CNN last night (Saturday 4/24/93) he has now found bullets in two of the corpses in the head (that would indicate that the bullets were aimed at killing the humans).  Cheers
   ...in other words faith in a .357 is far stronger than faith in a  God providing a miracle for his followers. Interesting. Now if  David Korresh was God why couldn\t he use lightning instead of  semi-automatic rifles? It seems even he didn\t trust in himself.  Cheers
 Jesus did and so do I.  Peace be with you
 From whose point of view would you like to know what relativism concludes?  One of the people involved in the argument
 Someone stated that the Davidian cult should not be associated with Christianity. Well I read all those four postings and I\m now even more convinced that Davididians are truly Christian in nature. But sometimes it makes sense to re-label the cult  especially if the ugliness is too much to handle.  Cheers

930425    Rome was under attack by barbarians they sent for advice to some Oracle and she said Worship Cybele and you\ll be saved. They did they were.  Cybele was the quintessential wiccan goddess there was Her and her son & lover Attis. Yucky idea if you ask me. OK the book says she was Phrygian from the neolithic matriarchal society Catal Huyuk (Turkey). Worshipped 1st as Black Stone (that Kaaba in Mecca ring a bell maybe????) Carried to Rome in 205BC to save them from Hannibal.   Response:  Is there some relation between the name \Cybele\ and the phenemenon of the \sibyl\?  Your paragraph above seems to indicate there might be.  My understanding is that Islam was founded on the remains of a goddess cult or two.  Many Muslims would not like to hear that. ;>   You:  It gets more interesting. Romans called her Great Mother (Magna Mater) could be the reason why so many of those Mary statues in Europe are black prob. IS connected to that Ka\aba they\ve got in Mecca 3rd cent. AD She was supreme Goddess in Lyons France . . . Attis was castrated and formed into a pine tree . . . she should be worshiped on 25 Mar . . . in Rome it was an ecstatic cult her priests wore drag worked themselves up in dance and castrated themselves in order to initiate to her lived their lives as women. They wore make up and jewelry and the whole bit.  Only other such primitive transsexualism I know of goes on in India (where else?) where they do that castration thing under some meditation maybe I forget by now...there\s a book on that.)  Of course that excepts that weird Russian / Romanian 18th cent. Xian cult that did all kinds of self-castration too I forget their name.   Response:  I\d love to get details or references on any of the above.  My own exploration of this issue has only extended to a brief examination of the Zuni \berdache\. _The Zuni Man-Woman_ by Will Roscoe University of New Mexico Press 1991 probably has some interesting things to say about them.  I\ve yet to procure it.  Any details or references on:  Ecstatic cults in Rome India Russia/Romania (Christian too?) which exhibit any type of transsexualism or transvestitism male OR female (though I expect mostly the former will be found ;>).   Thanks for your interesting posts
   The whole point is
 It seems faith is the only tool available for emotional purposes due to the tragedy. As such it maybe fills a need however I\m getting tired to see children dying in pain in Sudan due to lack of food and assuming that God takes these sufferers to heaven after a painful death.  Cheers
 Oh yes he did.  You may not agree with his premises and what he proved may not apply to reality (if such a thing exists) but he certainly proved something.   Got it in one.  Similarly a moral relativist will not judge one moral system to be better than another in every possible circumstance.  This does not however preclude him from judging one moral system to be better than another in a specific set of circumstances.  Nor does it preclude a set of moral relativists from collectively judging a moral system from some set of circumstances which they all agree they are in.   Eh?  Could you explain this?  Which that statement are you talking about?   I still don\t quite see what you\re trying to say.  I assume by values you mean moral values yes?  In which case what do you mean by real?  What is a real moral value as opposed to an unreal one?   Sorry but in what way is it an infinite regress?  It looks extremely finite to me.   Sorry but that\s not so.  I can provide a justification for asserting that the moral system of the terrorist is inferior to that of the man of peace.  I just can\t provide a justification which works in all possible circumstances.  Similarly I can provide a justification for asserting that bullets move faster than snails.  That justification won\t hold in all possible frames of reference but it will hold in almost all the frames of reference I am ever likely to be in.   I don\t think I agree with this.  My saying it *does* make it so *from my point of view* and according to *my premises* unless the argument is invalid. It may indeed not make it so from your point of view but I never claimed that it did.  In fact
: :  So what is Kibology? Chopped liver? : Kibo Himself summed it up by saying Kibology is not just a religion

 Didn\t expect to find you in the Devil\s role Stephen but these are the times that try men\s souls. Nine months as I understand it.  No doubt this accounts for a  significant amount of the time as government efficiency in spending our tax dollars would certainly seek its absolute minimum in such an event.  But my gut instinct says there is more at hand.  It took some careful preplanning to demonize D.K. to such an extent.  The attack meshes well with more restrictive gun control legislation that seems to be the agenda of the day.  It also fits a pattern of increased government interference in personal religious beliefs. [Randy Weaver is now on trial].  No quarrel here.  The BIG BANG theory is always apt at appropriation time.  They just don\t have to possess a single motive.    I certainly think publication of the warrant undermines the government\s case since it makes no claims of illegal action.  Therefore the federal judge had reason to seal it.  But I am reminded of Senator Frank Church\s remark that secrecy is the trademark of a totalitarian government. There is rarely sufficient motive to seal a warrant in a nation of free people.  How can I argue with irrefutable logic?  I have long suspected that the government has become a mindless machine and now you go and confirm my worst fears!  Has it become a BEAST that is programmed simply to say Kiss my toe and you get your piece of the pie? I suspect bugs in the program arise when agents or those who love this critter have independent thoughts.    And watching Terminator II.  Yes 186 seeds for a new Republic.  And 86 for...?     Rev. 11:10...And they that dwell upon the earth shall rejoice \t\tover them and make merry and shall send gifts one \t\tto another; because these two prophets tormented them \t\tthat dwelt on the earth.  Stephen
 I recently watched a an episode of The Old West a TV show on the  Discovery Channel (or perhaps the A&E Network) the one hosted by Kenny Rogers.  This episode was all about the Mormons and how they settled Utah etc.  A large portion of the broadcast was about the Mountain Meadows Massacre. The program very specifically pointed out that Brigham Young knew nothing about the incident until long after it had happened (before telegraph)

     In other words the right of might.    In other words the right of might.     In other words he can do it he did it and your in no position to argue about it.        In other words you better do what this God wants you to do
Dear netters  I am wondering about the accident of Koresh. I have heard different  explanations. Without any explanation about your opinions and believes  please kindly tell me:       1)- What was Koresh talking about?. (Or  what was his message)      2)- What was the main reason that Government went in war with              Koresh? (Some say that due to Tax payment

 I don\t think so.  The assumption is there.  If it turns out that their software has a virus then it is up to you to prove that fact to a court to get any damages.  You are theoretically suppossed to  be able to get damages for that but you have to give some evidence that the virus came from that software.  But since the computer company is the defendent they are uninvolved until proven guilty.  Please

The LAW of RETRIBUTION                           Violent crime racism bigotry domestic abuse rape            police brutality and oppression human rights violations            etc. ETC. continue to get worse and worse in spite of more            and more man-made laws on all levels from local ordinances to            international law.                            The man-made laws are NOT working.                  WHAT WE HAVE HERE IS FAILURE TO COMMUNICATE!             Perpetrators remain IGNORANT of The LAW--a universal cosmic            and Spiritual Law--The LAW of RETRIBUTION or KARMA:                            Be not deceived; God is not mocked: for whatsoever a            man soweth that shall he also reap.  Galatians 6:7 KJV.                      He that leadeth into captivity shall go into captivity;            he that killeth with the sword must be killed with the sword.             Here is the patience and faith of the saints.  Revelation            13:10 KJV.                      What goes around comes around.                 This LAW of the Universe is just as real as the physical            law that for every action there is an equal and opposite            REaction.                      It is the ENFORCEMENT the TEETH behind The GOLDEN            RULE: Do unto others as you would have others do unto you.                  ALL perpetrators in the present will become VICTIMS in            the future most likely in a FUTURE INCARNATION.  Most            victims in the present were PERPETRATORS in the past usually            during a PREVIOUS LIFE.                            What is needed is a MASSIVE WORLDWIDE PROGRAM of            EDUCATION to teach ALL present and potential perpetrators in            a convincing manner (with sufficient supporting evidence)            that what they do to others WILL BE DONE TO THEM in this            life or the next.                            Anyone who doubts the FACT of REINCARNATION and the            related LAW of Retribution should read books such as HERE            AND HEREAFTER by Ruth Montgomery which describes several            kinds of evidence supporting REincarnation including            HYPNOTIC REGRESSION to past lives [about 50\% accurate; the            subconscious mind can sometimes make things up especially            with a bad hypnotist] SPONTANEOUS RECALL (especially by            young children some of whom can identify their most recent            previous relatives homes possessions etc.) DREAM RECALL            of past life experiences DEJA VU (familiarity with a far off            land while traveling there for the first time on vacation)            the psychic readings of the late EDGAR CAYCE and EVEN            SUPPORTING STATEMENTS FROM THE CHRISTIAN BIBLE including            Matthew 17:11-13 (John the Baptist was the REINCARNATION of            Elias.) and John 9:1-2 (How can a person POSSIBLY sin before            he is born unless he LIVED BEFORE?!).                            Strong INTERESTS innate TALENTS strong PHOBIAS etc.            typically originate from a person\s PAST LIVES.  For example            a strong fear of swimming in or traveling over water usually            results from having DROWNED at the end of a PREVIOUS LIFE.             And sometimes a person will take AN IMMEDIATE DISLIKE to            another person being met for the first time in their PRESENT            life because of a bad encounter with him during a PREVIOUS            INCARNATION.                  People would behave much better toward each other if            they knew that their actions in the present will SURELY be            reaped by them in the future or in a FUTURE INCARNATION!                    For more information answers to your questions etc.            please consult my CITED SOURCES (books like HERE AND            HEREAFTER
   I use it to refer to those Christians who take a more conservative-literalist approach to the Bible as distinct from liberals.   I would use the word Christian (unqualified) to describe someone to whom the above definition applied.  BTW it applies to me.  [deletia: Joe Gaut indicates his interest in the BD disaster is from a civil liberties issue not an attempt to justify Koresh\s beliefs and/or practices.]  I agree with Joe about this: if some group wants to believe in whatever god or Invisible Pink Unicorns and go off and live together and have group sex or no sex or sex only for the leaders (but NOT with children) then as much as I might believe them to be misguided I think they should have the legal right.  And I hope the investigation will start by determining whether the feds had any *legitimate* reason for going after Koresh in the first place (before moving on to consider the wisdom of various tactics used).  [Joe goes on to dispute the child-abuse allegations.  I\ll (provisionally) accept this unless someone has evidence to support the allegations?]  Actually I wasn\t thinking about the (alleged) child abuse but about the reports that he had sex with and fathered children by several women in the cult.  I agree this is not a legal matter - consenting adults and all that - but Stephen Tice seems to be defending Koresh\s beliefs and practices from specifically *Christian* perspective not a civil liberties perspective.    I think my question is not really aimed at Joe (and possibly not at Ray Cote either who seems to also be taking the political angle)
Welcome to the Peace Run                       You\re invited to join in                      a Global Relay Run... and                      help light the Way.                         ----  Why the Peace Run  ----  There\s a new spirit in the Nineties: a spirit of oneness a growing belief in the possibility of true global peace.  The goal of the Sri Chinmoy Oneness-Home Peace Run is simple: to bring this spirit forward in a concrete way to transform it into a reality in their own lives.  Every other year thousands of men women and children from more than 70 nations - passing a flaming Peace Torch from hand to hand - join together in a relay run that virtually circles the globe. Transcending political and cultural boundaries they go from nation to nation - across mountains jungles and deserts - carrying the message of brotherhood to all humankind.  Each person who holds or runs with the Peace Torch lights a path for those who follow. Each time the Peace Torch changes hands the flame of oneness burns a little brighter - until one day it will shine in the hearts and minds of every individual on earth.   \t\t    ----  Making History  ----  The three Peace Runs since 1987 have achieved some historic break- throughs: in the Middle East a landmark run crossed the Egyptian- Israeli border; in Europe a precedent-setting run linked Eastern and Western Europe with Russia; in the United States Mexico and Canada entire cities were dedicated to the cause of world peace; and in Poland the Peace Torch was blessed by Pope John Paul II.   \t\t ----  Speaking as One: World  ----              ----  Leaders Celebrities - and You  ----  The Peace Run has won the support of leaders the world over - Presidents Prime Ministers religious leaders sports figures and entertainment personalities.  Its message has spread to a half billion people though newspaper reports magazine articles and radio and TV broadcasts including specials on PBS MTV and NBC\s Today Show.  reconciliation. The world must know that God wants us to live amicably as brothers and sisters members of one family the human family God\s family.  - Archbishop Desmond Tutu \t\t\t  Nobel Peace Prize Winner   \t\t   ----  How It All Works  ----  Peace Run 1993 started with a five-borrough relay in New York City on Saturday April 17 converging at various points to lead up to the opening ceremony outside the United Nations Dag Hammarskjold Building. There runners from around the world were gathered for the fourth lighting of the Peace Torch.  From there Peace Torches are now being transported to over seventy countries for a series of concurrent international or cross-country relay runs including the United States Canada Japan Australia Russia and Eastern and Western Europe. Smaller runs will take place in the Philippines Mexico Israel South America Egypt and elsewhere in Africa. Distance to be covered: 31000 miles.  the minds of those who support participate in witness or hear about the event.  - Carl Lewis                      Six-Time Olympic Gold Medalist                     ----  Who\s Behind It  ----  The Peace Run is sponsored by the Sri Chinmoy Marathon Team an international running organization that believes sports can be a powerful instrument for promoting world peace. Each year the Team puts on hundreds of athletic events including several world-class ultramarathons marathons and triathlons in dozens of countries.  The Peace Run itself is inspired by the global peace ambassador Sri Chinmoy who has written and lectured extensively on peace offered hundreds of free peace concerts and met with countless world figures to advance the cause of international harmony.  The Run is managed by Peace Runs International a non-profit organization based in the United States.                  ----  Take a Step For Peace  ----  The Peace Runs in 1987 1989 and 1991 attracted nearly half a million participants. We\re expecting even more people to join Peace Run \93.  You can also join the Run - carrying the Peace Torch a few steps a few blocks or a few miles. Or you can come out and cheer the runners as they carry the Torch through your community.  You can also join local celebrities and government officials in one of the thousands of welcoming ceremonies scheduled along the 70-nation route.  Your inner support is important too. If you\re a runner each time you go out you can dedicate your run to the cause of world peace.   \t\t ----  The Next Step is Yours  ---- \t\t ----  Make It One For Peace  ----   For information contact: Peace Runs International 161-44 Normal Road Jamaica NY 11432 USA tel. 718/291-6637  Fax: 718/291-6978  Peace Run Canada 2456 Agricola Street Halifax
The tongue that brings healing is a \ttree of life
 I agree with your points and I\m glad to hear that you subscribe to the notion of secular humanism humans helping humans instead of hoping for a possible deux ex machina solution!  As for faith you could always use such constructs to dampen your anger or sorrow.  Cheers
 No which is why I want an investigation.      Who ever said he was? What is obvious is that he was defending himself and his followers from the government.  Whether you think he was right or wrong in this is another question.  If he was right
Why should anyone (check: let\s restrict this to Christians why do *we*) want to find commandments in the books regarded as scripture?  What\s going on? I will pass on psychologizing answers (whether dismissive or more open) as not the kind of issue to deal with here -- the question is what is the *theological* point involved?  And it has been quoted at me often enough by those who don\t believe I take it seriously that Jesus (is said to have) said If you love me you will obey my commands.  [John 14:15]  I am like any Christian the slave of Christ and it is my will that I should do as He wills me to do.  I am (also or instead) His younger brother but still under His direction though we both call God Abba.  Christians therefore will try to find what it is that their Lord commands them and discovering it will feel obligated to do it or to confess their failure. Readers here may set aside the theologizing jargon (such as slaves of Christ) -- the point is that adherents of a religion *will* read the texts (whether classified as inspired or not) that are held up as models in an effort to find application to their own situations.  This practice ranges from devotional reading of sermons and the like to the exegesis of canon- ical scripture as the Word of God.  And at the highest pitch this leads to a question of whether we *can* find in inspired scripture something that can act as absolute guidance for our actions.  The problem is in finding out just *what* it is our Lord commands.  I am going to set aside for this essay one major direction in which Christians have looked for these commands namely Christian tradition.  That is not because *I* reject tradition but because my primary audience in this essay is Protestants who deny tradition a determinative value in favor of the witness of Scripture.  The question I want to deal with is WHAT commandments can we find from our Lord in Scripture?  And that turns out to be a hard question.  [ If any of my Protestant Inquisitors would *like* to turn the discussion to the authority of tradition I can accomodate them :-) unlike *most* Protestants Episcopalians admit claims from a) Scripture b) Reason and c) Tradition on roughly equal standing. ]  Earlier in John than my quote above we read [John 13:34] I give you a new  commandment: love one another.  This is the ONLY place in the NT where Christians are given an explicit commandment with the context commenting on its imperative mode pronouncement by Jesus.  At the same meal [so we *readers* infer since it is *not* in John but in the Synoptics] Jesus says Take this [bread]; this is my body.  [Mark 14:22 cf. Matthew 26:26 Luke 22:19 1 Corinthians 11:24]  The mode is imperative (Greek _labete_) and hence this too is a commandment.  In *both* cases we have to *infer* that the command is directed to a wider circle than the immediate collocation of disciples -- because we judge the evangelist\s point in mentioning it (with the disciples by then mostly or entirely dead) is that *we* are expected to follow this as a commandment from our Lord.  In the case of communion Paul\s mention (at least; this is probably true of the evangelists also) implies an ongoing ritual liturgy in which these words operate to bind Christians to the original command to his disciples as a continuing commandment to the Christian community.  I am entirely comfortable with this inference but I *must* point out that it is THERE between us and the occasion on which Jesus spoke the command. I take it as a clear inference at the very least the EVANGELIST\S notion that *all* Christians are called to love one another in Jesus\ command directed at the disciples.  But I have to call attention to the inference. The command CANNOT apply to me without the generalization from the specific context of its statement to my own context as a disciple of Christ.  All reading of scripture has to make such inferences to get any sense out of the text whatsoever.  This is a general problem in reading these texts -- we cannot read them at all without our *own* understanding of our native languages in which we (normally) read the (translated) texts and without *some* appreciation of the original context (and at points the original languages when English misleads us.) I am going to presume in what follows that we have the *general* problem of how to read scripture under control [ I don\t *really* think this is true but it will suffice for my current purposes. ]  I will address ONLY the issues that arise when we have already coped with the understanding of a 2000 year old text from another world than the one we live in.  Questions at THAT level only introduce MORE reser- vations about the commandments issue than will be found stipulating that we can read the texts as the original audience might have done.  Among the reasons we have for seeing John\s _agapate allelou_ as a *general* commandment (not merely an instruction by Jesus to this disciples on that one occasion) and one linking it to the Synoptic Great Commandment is that we have criticism from Jesus about limiting our love to those whom we congenially associate with.  In Matthew 5:43ff we read You have learnt say to you: love your enemies.  In fact the Leviticus context quoted does NOT say \hate your enemy\ -- it is merely the common human presumption. (And Leviticus is at pains to say that the love should extend to strangers amongst the people of Israel.)  Luke in expanding on this same Q context goes on to have Jesus say. Even sinners love those who love them. [6:27] All of this suggests [quite strongly I\d say :-)] that *limiting* the scope of the new commandment is not quite what Jesus has in mind.  In short inference *leads me* to generalizing the actual text to a command that is in force on Christians and with objects not limited to other Christians.  Trickier than the _agapate allelou_ or Institution of communion there is the case of the Great Commission where (Matthew 10 Mark 6) the Twelve are sent out to evangelize Proclaim that the kingdom of heaven is close at hand.  The verb is imperative (_ke:russete_) but the context is rather specific to the Twelve and there are further specifiers (as in Do not turn your steps to pagan territory and do not enter any Samaritan town -- the Lukan parallels are even more specific to Jesus\ final journey to Jerusalem) which make it harder to see this generalizing to all Christians than the previous examples.  That hasn\t prevented Christians from MAKING such an inference; what I have to call attention to is that such inference is NOT justified in the text nor (unlike the first two cases I cite) by the rhetoric of the evangelist urged on the reader.  Still Paul seems to have felt obliged to proclaim that the kingdom of heaven is close at hand even (contrary to Jesus\ instructions to the 12 :-)) to the gentiles to the ends of the earth.  So Christians after him have also taken this as a commandment in the sense of John 14:15.  Do I accept this?  I don\t know.  It is surely rather speculative.  But you see how the ripples of inference spread out from the text that is the pretext -- Christians (may) infer a general commandment applicable to all from what is presented in the gospels as a specific occasion.  I do not (necessarily) object to this kind of generalization -- but I *insist* that people who make it *must* have an understanding that they are *reasoning* (at some considerable length) from what we actually *have* in scripture.  There are *assumptions* involved in this reasoning and *these* are *not* themselves scriptural (though people will do their best to justify their assumptions by OTHER references to scripture -- which simply adds MORE inference into the mix!)  Let\s move on to the Great Commandment -- that we should love God with our whole hearts and minds and souls.  This is perhaps the Synoptic equivalent of John\s _agapate allelou_.  And yet  it is not PRESENTED as a commandment in our texts.  Rather the context is controversy with the Pharisees.  To cite Matthew [22:34ff]  \tBut when the Pharisees heard that he had silenced the Sadducees \tthey got together and to disconcert him one of them put a question \tMaster which is the greatest commandment of the Law?  It is by no means obvious here (though I accept it as such) that Jesus\ answer is meant to be a commandment *to Christians*.  He is answering a polemic from his enemies.  [ Mark\s account in  12:28-34 casts the answer in a far more positive light as (so the scribe in this version says) far more important than any holocaust (I need to point out that this word originates in the context of animal sacrifice; forget the Nazis for this) or sacrifice.  Luke is intermediate -- he has a lawyer posing the question to disconcert Jesus and gets the Good Samarian parable for his pains [ Luke 10:25-37 ].  The contexts here are so confusingly various that one could be forgiven for drawing *no* inferences :-)  In *no* account is this said as if it were obviously to be taken as a commandment binding on Christians -- though I think it an entirely reasonable conclusion in each case that Jesus thinks it to be so.  The point is that our mental gears HAVE to grind a cycle or so to get to any conclusion from all of this about what WE are commanded to do by Jesus.  And all of this is contingent on our understanding the point of Jesus\ use of the Torah in the (all quite different) gospel accounts and the application of such a context to *us*.  The different contexts among the Synoptics are curious.  It should be noted that ONLY in Luke do we get the fixing of this command by the parable of the Good Samaritan.  We may look for an analogous *intent* in Matthew where 7:12 gives the Golden Rule as the meaning of the Law and the Prophets (and where we may also hear an echo of Hillel saying the same a generation before Jesus.)  If we make these associations (which I think are entirely reasonable) we are -- again -- indulging in inference.  The texts do not *explicitly* support us; rather we *read* the texts as having this kind of inter-relationship.  Current literary theory calls this intertextuality.  My discussion of why the _agapate allelou_ has to apply beyond the  community of the disciples and beyound the circle of Christian believers applies again here to buttress a conclusion that this *is* (despite the presentation not saying so explicitly) a commandment to Christians. Few Christians would disagree with my conclusions -- but I *must* point out that they *are* conclusions they *depend* on rather elaborate chains of reasoning that are simply NOT present in the texts themselves.  The contextual problem keeps coming up more and more severely as we look at those sayings of Jesus that are NOT so universally taken by Christians as  commandments.  And we get some really hard cases.  Take divorce.  Mark is  pretty clear The man who divorces his wife and marries another is guilty of adultery against her.  [ 10:11 cf. Luke 16:18 ] -- except that Matthew has an escape clause [ except in the case of fornication 5:31 ]. This seems to be a rather clear commandment (whether or not we take Matthew\s reservation); and some Christians to this day take it so.  But some don\t at least in practice.  This is rather peculiar; it is not as if Jesus were not explicit about this (whereas He says nothing at all about some of the things people gnash their teeth over.)  How is it possible if the commands of Christ are clear that Matthew can so disagree with the other evangelists of the synoptic tradition?  I\m going to continue this examination into ever-murkier waters but this is enough to start with.  The theme is: finding commandments in scripture is an exercise in inference; our inferences are informed by OUR assumptions that is our own cultural biases.  I have so far identified a very few commandments that are generally accepted by all Christians -- and yet in these already some of the difficulties start to surface.  It is these difficulties I want to discuss in my next essay on this topic.  The divorce commandment already strikes at some of the difficulties: I see almost no evidence that the people who are so eager to find commandments to condemn *me* with spend any time at all writing nasty screeds to soc.couples or misc.legal about the horrors or viciousness of divorce or demanding that US law refuse to allow it or refuse unrepentant divorcees places in their churches.  [ That is not to say that divorce *doesn\t* enter into  consideration in general -- it is most definitely a matter of concern in even the most liberal church circles.  For example a (wildly) liberal Episcopalian priest of my aqauintence in a (wildly) liberal diocese has recommended to a couple who approached him to marry them that they have a private secular ceremony before a judge so that the public ceremony he celebrated need not go through an agonizing examination by officials who would just as soon NOT take on this role of interpreting the commands we are faced with as Christians.  This
Would someone be kind enought to document the exact nature of the evidence against the BD\s without reference to hearsay or newsreports. I would also like to know more about their past record etc. but again based on solid not media reports.   \tMy reason for asking for such evidence is that last night on Larry King Live a so-called cult-expert was interviewed from Australia who claimed that it was his evidence which led to the original raid. This admission if true raises the nasty possibility that the Government acted in good faith which I believe they did
Can a theist be truly objective?  Can he be impartial      when questioning the truth of his scriptures or      will he assume the superstition of his parents      when questioning?   I\ve often found it to be the case that the theist      will stick to some kind of superstition when      wondering about God and his scriptures.  I\ve      seen it in the Christian the Jew the Muslim      and the other theists alike.  All assume that      their mothers and fathers were right in the      aspect that a god exists and with that belief      search for their god.       Occasionally the theist may switch religions or      aspects of the same religion but overall the      majority keep to the belief that some Creator      was behind the universe\s existence.  I\ve      known Muslims who were once Christians and vice      versa I\ve known Christians who were once      Jewish and vice versa and I\ve even known      Christians who become Hindu.  Yet throughout      their transition from one faith to another      they\ve kept this belief in some form of higher      being.  Why?       It usually all has to do with how the child is      brought up.  From the time he is born the      theist is brought up with the notion of the      truth of some kind of scripture-- the Bible      the Torah the Qur\an & etc.  He is told      of this wondrous God who wrote (or inspired)      the scripture of the prophets talked about in      the scripture of the miracles performed & etc.      He is also told that to question this (as      children are apt to do) is a sin a crime      against God and to lose belief in the scrip-      ture\s truth is to damn one\s soul to Hell.      Thus by the time he is able to read the      scripture for himself the belief in its truth      is so ingrained in his mind it all seems a      matter of course.       But it doesn\t stop there.  Once the child is able      to read for himself there is an endeavor to      inculcate the child the right readings of      scripture to concentrate more on the pleasant      readings to gloss over the worse ones and to      explain away the unexplainable with mystery.      Circular arguments self-evdent facts and      truths unreasoning belief and fear of      hell is the meat of religion the child must eat      of every day.  To doubt of course means wrath      of some sort and the child must learn to put      away his brain when the matter concerns God.      All of this has some considerable effect on the      child so that when he becomes an adult the       superstitions he\s been taught are nearly      impossible to remove.       All of this leads me to ask whether the theist can      truly be objective when questioning God Hell      Heaven the angels souls and all of the rest.      Can he for a moment put aside this notion that      God *does* exist and look at everything from      a unbiased point of view?  Obviously most      theists can somewhat especially when presented      with mythical gods (Homeric Roman Egyptian
 It seems you lived a fairly \wild life\-- my background is far more traditional mostly working working working. Maybe there\s a clear indication that the way you lived your life produced a certain  amount of anxiety that needed to be released. Religion was one possible medicine. While my more stable environment didn\t and  still does not produce the situation where I feel such guilt.  This is just one possible explanation why you feel this burden while I haven\t felt it so far.  Regards
=>I don\t necessarily agree with Pat Robertson.  Every one will be placed before =>the judgement seat eventually and judged on what we have done or failed to do =>on this earth.  God allows people to choose who and what they want to worship. = =I\m sorry but He does not!  Ever read the FIRST commandment?  I have.  Apparently you haven\t.  The first commandment doesn\t appear to forbid worshipping other gods.  Yahweh\s got to be at the top of the totem pole
 No.   No. The library at Alexandria was perhaps the greatest library ever built in the world. The Greeks had a love of wisdom philo sophos and this great love was reflected in the Alexandrian library. The Christians  got a hold of it and began modifying and purging texts and then the Moslems  invaded and either the Christians burned the library to keep it from falling  into Moslems hands (far more likely since they were the book burners not the  Moslems) or it burned in the sack of the city or the Moslems burned it.  Either way a tremendous amount of information was lost. The destruction of the library of Alexandria was probably one of the greatest crimes of man against man.   Actually the Hebrew almah (young woman) was translated as the Hellenistic  Greek parthenos which may or may not be correctly translated into the modern and technical English term virgin. The Jews did not have the type of virginity cult that the Greco-Romans had in Artemis and Diana.   The standard text used by Christians and Jews is the Masoretic Text. Jews of course use the text in its original Hebrew
 It isn\t.   It\s usually treated as being about as reliable as any other single
 Then delete the unfortunately.   Now tell me that the two statement say effectively the same thing.  And to save everyone a couple of trips round this loop please notice that we are only obliged to use force to preserve self.   We can choose *not* to preserve self which is the point of pacifism.   And in this case they don\t prescribe the same things so.....   If you don\t think the use of force is immoral
Why is the NT tossed out as info on Jesus.  I realize it is normally tossed out because it contains miracles

     Kent with regards to the information contained in the Bible (which is the original context of this thread) Brian Kendig is inside a huge wall.  Brian *IS* inside.  The Bible and the information contained therein are outside the wall.   Brian Kendig proves this very sad fact by the absurd things he says.  For example If I get through into the firey pit
#Frank unless you didn\t realize it you are just now involved #in a debate where we have various opinions and each entity #has its own frame where the opinion is expressed. I think I  #don\t need to state the dreadful r-word.  So it\s _sometimes_ correct to say that morality is objective or what? After all I could hardly be wrong without dragging in the o-word. For your part when you say that relativism is true that\s just your opinion.  Why do folk get so heated then if a belief in relativism is merely a matter of taste?  (to be fair _you_ have been very calm
 Zoroaster is far older than Daniel. If anything one could claim that in a sense Daniel is a descendant of Zoroaster; as Daniel though being Hebrew has assimilated into Zoroastrianism and has successfully introduced the religion into the Tanakh of Judaism. [However the majority  of the book is in Hellenistic Aramaic (not Babylonian Aramaic) and only has Kethuvim or Writing status.]  Ref: Encyclopedia of Religion Mircea Eliade:  DANIEL or in Hebrew Daniyye\l; hero of the biblical book that bears his name. Daniel is presented as a Jew in the Babylonian exile who achieved notoriety in the royal court for his dream interpretations and cryptography and for his salvation from death in a lion\s pit. He also appears in the last chapters of the book as the revealer of divine mysteries and of the timetables of Israel\s restoration to national-religious autonomy. As a practitioner of oneiromancy in the court described in Daniel 1-6 (written in the third person) Daniel per- forms his interpretations alone while as a visionary-apocalyptist in Daniel 7-12 (written in the first person) he is in need of an angel to help him decode his visions and mysteries of the future. It is likely that the name Daniel is pseudonymous a deliberate allusion to a wise and righteous man known from Ugaritic legend and earlier biblical tradition. (Ez. 14:428:3).   The authorship of the book is complicated not only by the diverse narrative voices and content but by its language: Daniel 1:1-2:4a and 8-12 are written in Hebrew whereas Daniel 2:4b-7:28 is in Aramaic. The language division parallels the subject division (Daniel 1-6 concerns legends and dream interpretations; 7-12 concerns apocalyptic visions and interpretations of older prophecies). The overall chronological scheme as well as internal thematic balances (Daniel 2-7 is chiliastically related) suggest an attempt at redactional unity. After the prefatory tale emphasizing the life in court and the loyalty of Daniel and some youths to their ancestral religion a chronological ordering is discernable: a sequence from King Nebuchadrezzar to Darius is reported (Dn. 7-12). Much of this royal dating and even some of the tales are problematic: for example Daniel 4 speaks of Nebuchadrezzar\s transformation into a beast a story that is reported in the Qumran scrolls of Nabonidus; Belshazzar is portrayed as the last king of Babylon although he was never king; and Darius is called a Mede who conquered Babylon and is placed before Cyrus II of Persia although no such Darius is known (the Medes followed the Persians and Darius is the name of several Persian kings). Presumably the episodes of Daniel 2-6 depicting a series of monarchical reversals episodes of ritual observances and reports of miraculous deliverances were collected in the Seleucid period (late fourth to mid-second century BCE) in order to reinvigorate waning Jewish hopes in divine providence and encourage steadfast faith.   The visions of Daniel 7-12 reporting events from the reign of Belshazzar to that of Cyrus II (but actually predicting the overthrow of Seleucid rule in Palestine) were collected and published during the reign of Antiochus IV prior to the Maccabean Revolt for it was then (beginning in 168 BCE) that the Jews were put to the test concerning their allegiance to Judaism and their ancestral traditions and many refused to desecrate the statues of Moses and endured a martyr\s death for their resolute trust in divine dominion. All of the visions of Daniel dramatize this dominion in different ways: for example via images of the enthronement of a God of judgment with a son of man invested with rule (this figure was interpreted by Jews as Michael the archangel and by Christians as Christ) in chapter 7; via zodiacal images of cosmic beasts with bizarre manifestations as in chapter 8; or via complex reinterpretations of ancient prophecies especially those of Jeremiah 25:9-11 as found in Daniel 9-12.   The imagery of the four beasts in chapter 7 (paralleled by the image of four metals in chapter 2) representing four kingdoms to be overthrown by a fifth monarchy of divine origin is one of the enduring images of the book; it sur- vived as a prototype of Jewish and Christian historical and apocalyptic schemes to the end of the Middle Ages. The role and power of this imagery in the fifteenth and sixteenth century work of the exegete Isaac Abravanel the scientist Isaac Newton and the philosopher Jean Bodin and among the Fifth Monarchy Men of seventeenth century England for example is abiding testimony to the use of this ancient topos in organizing the chiliastic imagination of diverse thinkers and groups. The schema is still used to this day by various groups predicting the apocalyptic advent.   The encouragement in the face of religious persecution that is found and propagandized in Daniel 11-12 contains a remarkable reinterpretation of Isaiah 52:13-53:12 regarding the suffering servant of God not as all Israel but as the select faithful. Neither the opening stories about Daniel and the youths nor the final martyrological allusions advocate violence or revolt; they rather advocate a stance of piety civil disobedience and trustful resignation. Victory for the faithful is in the hands of the archangel Michael and the martyrs will be resurrected and granted astral immortality. Persumably the circles behind the book were not the same as the Maccabean fighters and may reflect some proto-Pharisaic group of hasidim or pietists. The themes of resistance to oppression freedom of worship preservation of monotheistic integrity the overthrow of historical dominions
 Ah you taking everything as literal quotation.  No wonder you\re confused.  First can I ask that we decide on a definition of objective?   And?   I\d guess that it might be.   It may be the case that some people are unable to evaluate complex moral issues.  Rather than leaving them to behave immorally it might be better to offer them an abstract (nonexistent objective) system of ethics which they can strive towards
...   Does it matter that the study (yes singular) that showed LSD causing birth defects also holds true for aspirin?  Does it matter that this study is flat-out wrong
 I think you have are addressing the wrong issue. The situation is more like: we both see some elves. This is established as fact since we can both touch them etc. Then one of us says the elves have always been with us. The other says
 [Discussion on Josephus inserts]  Thanks.  Am I correct then in assuming that that Josephus did in fact write about Jesus
  This is always an option: when the sect is causing harm re-label the cult to something else.  Cheers
 Why don\t you tell us Tony?  I\m sure what you THINK you know adds up to a lot more than what Casper has.  Doesn\t it frustrate you to consider how many intelligent thoughtful  people you have prepared for the Mormon missionaries with your rant?  The more you talk the better we look.  Nothing makes the truth look better than a background of falsehood.  Sic \em
.         It should be remembered that all of the first reports came from         the FBI and that independent observers i.e. the press were not         allowed to get close and see things for themselves.  Official         communiques tend to be self-serving for the agencies that issue         them.          People in general tend to believe first reports as these get         the most and the biggest headlines.  Corrections are often         overlooked.           An example is the FBI report that several of the bodies found         in the rubble had bullet wounds.  The local coroner who is         independent of the FBI
My theory is that Koresh was seriously wounded in the initial gunbattle and died on Day 9 of the siege.  On Day 11 of the siege he rose from the dead and periodically appeared to his followers and the FBI over the next 40 days.  Living with someone who\s risen from the dead isn\t easy as Timmy Baterman\s father in *Pet*Sematary* could attest so after 40 days they did what Baterman did--shot themselves and burned the place to the ground.  Consistent with the facts
refrettably you are mistaken.  alt.drugs was used to recruit people for the worldwide pot religion.  I
Jeremiah: 25:27 Therefore thou shalt say unto them Thus saith the LORD of hosts the God of Israel; Drink ye and be drunken and spue and fall and rise no more because of the sword which I will send among you. 25:28 And it shall be if they refuse to take the cup at thine hand to drink then shalt thou say unto them
I see it as the camel\s nose.  I\m willing to take my chances on winning the whole thing
    Wow look at alllthe pretty puddles!!!!    Jimmy crack koan and I don\t care Jimmy crack koan and i don\t care Jimmy crack Koan and i don\t care
  Well the best thing to do is to read the book Parallel Universes by Dr. Fred Wolf.   In essence Dr. Wolf says that one interpretation of the sub-atomic particle/wave duality is that what we perceive as a wave is actually an infinate number of parallel universes overlaid and in each of these universes there is a particle in a different location. When we do something to make a particle appear we are actually causing all the parallel universes to collapse into one. Apparently this is one line of thought on the nature of QM that is going through some of the scientific community.  Dr. Wolf (and many others) claim that somehow the collapse is caused by the mental effort of observing the particle. This implys that mind is more than merely a biological phenomenon. He then extrapolates that if mind is an integral part of the universe then perhaps consciousness is the element that gives order and form to the universe(s) it/themself(s).  It all gets rather interesting but what I find facinating is that this would explain the phenomenon of magick as practiced in my religion. Dr. Wolf speculates that the ordering functionality of mind could be caused by the selection of a future from an infinite number of possible futures; he says that this might be done by some sort of communication between ones current and possible future selves.  I have long speculated that if magick is not merely a form of self delusion then perhaps it could be caused by some sort of a selection of one of many possible futures.  I realize that this gets pretty bizarre but it never hurts to keep  an open mind and at least file it all away as another possibile  explaination of the world in which we find ourselves. After all the more we learn about the universe in which we live
(Anthony   If she doesn\t welcome the excruciating pain of labor
  No.  I also understand it. I have read the Bible from cover to cover examining each book within cross-comparing them
  ra>   Robert you keep making references to orthodox belief and saying ra> things like it is held that... (cf. Kermit thread).  On what ra> exact body of theology are you drawing for what you call orthodox?       Orthodox is a compound word. It comes from \orthos\ (straight true       right) and from \doxa\ (opinion doctrine teaching). I use orthodox to       refer to \right teaching.\ Right teaching is derived from letting God       speak to us through the Bible. This can be from reading simple truths       in the Scriptures and by using the Bible to interpret the Bible.  ra> Who is that holds that Luke meant what you said he meant?       I think that it is apparent from reading the Scriptures that are      pertinent.       Luke 23:43 records Christ\s promise to the repentant thief who hung on      an adjacent cross: Truly I say to you today you will be with Me in      paradise. But was it not until later that Christ rose from the dead      and ascended to heaven? If Christ Himself was not in heaven until      Sunday how could the repentant thief have been there with Him? The      answer lies in the location of paradise when Jesus died.       Apparently paradise was not exalted to heaven until Easter Day.       Jesus refers to it in the middle of the story of the rich man and       Lazarus as Abraham\s Bosom to which the godly beggar Lazarus was      carried by the angels after his decease (Luke 16:19-31).  Thus      Abraham\s Bosom referred to the place where the souls of the redeemed      waited till the day of Christ\s Resurrection.       It was not yet lifted to heaven but it may well have been a section of       hades (Hebrew: Sheol) reserved for believers who had died in the faith      but would not be admitted into the glorious presence of God in heaven      until the price of redemption had actually been paid on Calvary; or      even that none would precede the presence of Jesus back to glory with      the Father.       Doubtless it was the infernal paradise that the souls of Jesus and the      repentant thief repaired after they each died on Friday afternoon. But      on Sunday after the risen Christ had first appeared to Mary Magdalene      (John 20:17) and her two companions (Matthew 28:9) presumably He then      took up with Him to glory all the inhabitants of infernal paradise      (including Abraham Lazarus and the repentant thief). We read in      Ephesians 4:8 concerning Christ: Ascending on high He led captivity      captive; He gave gifts unto men. Verse 9 continues: But what does `He      ascended\ mean but that He also descended to the lowest parts of the      earth? -i.e. to hades. Verse 10 adds: He who descended is the same      as He who ascended above all the heavens. Presumably He led the whole      band of liberated captives from hades (i.e. the whole population of      preresurrection paradise) up to the glory of heaven.  ra> Whenever your personal interpretation of Biblical passages is ra> challenged your only response seems to be that one needs merely to ra> look at the Bible in order to see the truth but what of those who ra> see Biblical things differently from you?       I think that this characterization is faulty. Whenever my \personal       interpretation\ is questioned I usually give a reason.       As for those that see things differently please put forward where      there is a valid difference and we can discuss it.        I seem to be seeing from you the notion that any difference in how one       views the Bible is somehow legitimate except or course for the stuff       that I glean from it. Put forward a contrary view and perhaps we can       have a discussion on that topic. But to decry something that I put       forward without putting forward something else to discuss and to       dismiss what I put forward while giving credence to other alleged views      that have yet to be put forward is simply being contentious.  ra> Are we to simply assume that you are the only one who really ra> understands it?       If you believe that something that I have drawn from Scripture is       wrong then please
  Everything we need to know about the seven seals is already in the bible.  There is no knowledge of the seals that Koresh could have.  Unless the FBI were to kill all publishers of the bible
 \tThis morning on CNN (tues April 27) Texas Cops say Arson is suspected \tbecause of two falsh points. CNN also stated that  _all_ surviors \tclaim the fires are FBI set.  Your argument are made-up untrue \tand unverified at best.      The day of the attack the FBI claimed to have seen two BD\ers setting     the fire outside of the compound. Yesterday the arson squad said two      flash points at the or near the tank entry points      Not good evidence for the FBI hit squad.    is there a difference between thinking that you won\t survive a confrontation   with the FBI (parnoia?) and committing suicide?   \tNo
In <1ren9a$94q@morrow.stanford.edu> salem@pangea.Stanford.EDU (Bruce Salem)     This brings up another something I have never understood.  I asked this once before and got a few interesting responses but somehow didn\t seem satisfied. Why would the NT NOT be considered a good source.  This might be a  literary/historical question but when I studied history I always looked for  firsthand original sources to write my papers.  If the topic was on Mr. X I  looked to see if Mr. X wrote anything about it.  If the topic was on a group  look for the group etc.  If the topic is on Mr. X and Mr. X did not write  anything about it (barring the theistic response about the Bible being  divinely inspired which I can\t adequately argue) wouldn\t we look for people who ate worked walked talked etc. with him?  If someone was at an event  wouldn\t they be a better reporter than someone who heard about it second  hand?  I guess isn\t firsthand better than second hand.  I know there is bias and winners writing history
 What is aluminium siding?  I keep seeing references to it.  Something to do with railway lines perhaps?  E-mail reply please
I baptize you with water for repentance. \tBut after me will come one who is more powerful than I
 WOW! Are you serious! So not everyone who calls themself a Christian is a Christian? WOW! That does make things a bit more complicated doesn\t it?   That seems like very good advice given the above revelation.   Like for example Matthew 5:14-19 right?   Um
 Are you serious?!!!  Here\s an exercise next time you are in the barnyard.  Take *your* model and hold it directly above a fresh cowpie.  Then release the model.  You will observe that on its own *your* model will assume a trajectory earthward and come to rest exactly where it belongs.  Watch out for splatters
 I\m for the moment interested in this notion of the \leap of faith\ established by Kierkegaard. It clearly points out a possible solution to transcendental values. What I don\t understand is that it also clearly shows the existentialism system where any leap to any transcendental direction is equal.   In other words I might not jump off the cliff mentioned above but at the same time I will decide to what direction I will go. Actually I will do it just now.  Cheers
  Special creation has not been observed in action. Bill Rawlin\s assertions that man was created in his present form do not count  as creation. Put another way
 In the hands of a defender
 Just taking a guess perhaps it was that Koresh had peaceably been served with warrants before
 Rome was under attack by barbarians they sent for advice to some Oracle and she said Worship Cybele and you\ll be saved. They did they were.  Cybele was the quintessential wiccan goddess there was Her and her son & lover Attis. Yucky idea if you ask me. OK the book says she was Phrygian from the neolithic matriarchal society Catal Huyuk (Turkey). Worshipped 1st as Black Stone (that Kaaba in Mecca ring a bell maybe????) Carried to Rome in 205BC to save them from Hannibal.  It gets more interesting. Romans called her Great Mother (Magna Mater) could be the reason why so many of those Mary statues in Europe are black prob. IS connected to that Ka\aba they\ve got in Mecca 3rd cent. AD She was supreme Goddess in Lyons France . . . Attis was castrated and formed into a pine tree . . . she should be worshiped on 25 Mar . . . in Rome it was an ecstatic cult her priests wore drag worked themselves up in dance and castrated themselves in order to initiate to her lived their lives as women. They wore make up and jewelry and the whole bit.  Wow.  Only other such primitive transsexualism I know of goes on in India (where else?) where they do that castration thing under some meditation maybe I forget by now...there\s a book on that.)  Of course that excepts that weird Russian / Romanian 18th cent. Xian cult that did all kinds of self-castration too
[ There are actually some talk.abortion related comments below believe it or   not... ]   Well if our observer X is as likely to be in A\s position as B\s and if he agrees that both A and B are making appropriate observations and inferences regarding the situation then I would expect him to conclude that there is no right answer.  Hopefully there would be some other factor which would allow him to make some judgement regarding which answer to accept.  If on the other hand he disagrees with the principles of either A or B I suspect he would make a decision in favour of the other one.  It is unfortunately the case that not all moral arguments have answers from all perspectives.  For instance I am completely unable to come to any conclusion regarding whether abortion should be allowed or not from my perspective.  In an ideal world all living things would have a right to life; but in an ideal world women would have the absolute right to do what they like with their own bodies.  Clearly there is no way to resolve in favour of both these principles.  Therefore I agree with the compromise solution of allowing abortion up to a certain time after conception and deciding on the time based on various (sometimes ill-defined) criteria.  This is also a sensible move I think because it lets people make their own decisions (within reason).  And for what it\s worth I am reasonably happy with current UK abortion law.  Similarly the situation in what\s left of Yugoslavia is a horrible mess and I really can\t see my way to any sort of conclusion.  There
   It wasn\t Jesus who changed the rules of the game (see quote above) it was Paul.  Cheers
  The peaceful attempt to serve the warrant was met with gunfire. Due process was not served because the Branch Davidians wanted it that way.  *You* think on that.   -- Milk is for babies; when you\re a man
  The problem is that you imagine him inside this huge wall unable to see reality. While he imagines the same about you. Clearly we have a case where relativity plays a big role concerning looking at opposite frames of reality.  Cheers
   What makes you say that the guns were illegal?? I understand that the BD\s had a valid Class III Federal Firearms Permit
 If what was being discussed could be established or disproven by  experiment and observation then I would agree with you Chris.   The burden of proof would belong to Bill. But the source document for Christianity the Bible simply assumes God exists and makes it clear (to us Calvinists anyway :-)) that when a person is in fellowship with God it is because God has taken the initiative in revealing Himself to that person. So from a Christian point of view the burden of proof belongs to God. Bill is being consistent with what the Bible teaches in relating his own experience with God but it would be an error on his part to assume that there is a direct
pmoloney@maths.tcd.ie (Paul Moloney) writes...   Never lived out in the country I see. 4 years ago I had a place where I had to carry in propane every month hook the bottle up  to copper line to supply both the stove and a type of water- heater called a flash-heater. A flash heater has a pilot lamp.  Here\s the point. If the Davidians had their propane tanks hooked  up to copper (or some such) lines run through the ceiling spaces -- when the FBI started wrecking the place they could easily have ruptured the lines. Which then would start spreading out through the overhead. And since it was a country home it wasn\t necessarily built with non-flamable insulation.   It\s probably more plausible than anything else that the fire started mainly as a result of accident -- or willful negligence on the part of the FBI
 Ah so you admit newborns are innocent?  Then you cannot say _everyone_ is a sinner.  About the only way top get out of this one is to claim that a newborn is a sinner despite having not committed any sins

...  I had an ehum interesting experience with the Rosicrucians or at least Rosicrucians of some sort last Sunday. They had advertised that they were holding a lecture titled The Graal of the King -- the room of the heart (which rhymes in Swedish). Out of curiosity I went to the lecture.  There were four people there apart from the two Rosicrucians one woman and two men apart from me. The Rosicrucians were male both of them. First one of them told us about the Rosicrucians and Lectorium Rosicrucianum which was founded in Harlem NL in 1925. He read straight from a piece of paper which I at that point was because he lacked experience in talking in front of people but the other guy read too and he was used to holding speeches I could tell. The first guy also said that the R:s are a mystical Christian order and that they base their teachings on the teachings of the Kathars (English?) from the thirteenth century.  The other guy took over reading from his piece of paper in a fairy-tale teller\s voice. What he said sounded like a load of crap to me. Of course that might be because I am unenlightened or something. What made me a bit suspicious was the way they first said that we all contained something divine and could find our way back to divinity then that we couldn\t become divine as the persons we are currently but if we worked really hard we would reach eternal bliss. Maybe I\ve read too much RAW but it sounded very much like the things he talks about in the chapter _How to robotize people and brainwash your friends_ in _Prometheus rising_.   It was very interesting to watch the two Rosicrucians. The one holding the actual lecture obviously was top dog and the other one seemed to be a true believer. I got the impression that the top dog had more distance to the faith than the true believer that he used it to gain power and admiration. He spoke like a fairy-tale teller whenever he remembered. ;)  The information brochure is at home. Should you want their address
 That is indeed the present consensus.  Contrary to what Dr. Fox has been saying however present consensus is *not* that the longer passage in Josephus about Jesus was inserted but only that it was modified.    There is no question that it was *at least* modified (based on what Origen says--that Josephus did not recognize Jesus as the Messiah)
 Hmm.  The police strategy of bursting in with weapons drawn clearly marked as officers and yelling Police repeatedly.  This is used every day to bust drug houses.  The idea is to awe the suspects into submission with surprise and display of firepowere in order to avoid a gun fight.  As for not knocking it\s a sad necessity in many cases since the suspects will attempt to escape or even fight.  Usually this strategy works; if it didn\t then it wouldn\t be used so commonly now would it?  Whether or not it was appropriate to use this strategy on the BD is not my point since I don\t think any of us have enough information to make a clear judgement on this issue.  I merely point out that it IS a valid strategy which is used every day. Furthermore we don\t know of any substitute strategy capable of apprehending potentially dangerous and armed suspects.  Do you suggest that the police always knock with guns holstered and never arrest any suspects until they have been allowed to inspect the officers\s badges?  Just what should the police do when apprehending potentially dangerous and armed suspects?  How far can they reasonably go to identiy themselves?  What do you suggest they can do which can\t be faked by the competition?  Even if you\ve got deadly enemies who may pretend to be cops that\s not an excuse to murder police.  In the case of the BD\s
They looked unto him
[ NOTE: talk.origins removed from crossposting as this had no business   going there in the first place. ]          No but you\re not achieving anything either. If you don\t want to argue the point you\re stating why do you bother stating it?         No. Read the (alt.atheism) FAQ to find out why.         Well enough; if I feel interested I might even listen.         I won\t; the task is impossible
    Sorry Malcolm but I rather believe Jesus than you.  Cheers
stuff deleted - but message is: :    :  : >He is God. :  : In other words the right of might. :  : >He is God. :  : In other words the right of might. :  :  :  : >God granted you the gift of life whether you were sinner or saint. :  : In other words he can do it he did it and your in no position to : argue about it. :   : >one that must be killed by Him.  Note:  I say that God and God alone is : >worthy to be Judge Jury and Executioner.  We are not called to carry out : >such duties because we are not worthy. :   : In other words you better do what this God wants you to do or else! :  : >|> Who is god to impose its rules on us ? Who can tell if god is REALLY so :  :  : >God is God.  Who are we to question the Creator?  If you doubt God\s doing : >in certain situations do you claim to know a better solution?  Would you : >be playing the role of God? :  : In other words its his game he made the rules and if you know whats : good for you you\ll play his game his way. :    Careful there you make God out to be some spoiled little deity that when he can\t have his way takes his ball and goes home.  Now that you mention it....  Naw... Can\t be right
= In article <1993Apr21.231552.24869@organpipe.uug.arizona.edu> =  = Hmm it seems that this is the core of Christianity then you  = have to feel guilty and then there\s this single personality = that will save you from this universal guilt feeling. =  = Brian I will tell you a secret I don\t feel guilty at all = I do mistakes and I regret them however I\ve never had this = huge guilt feeling hanging over my shoulder.  I will tell you another secret.  I get this burning sensation in my hand every time I hold it over a candle.  The pain does not fill my entire body and I\m told the longer I hold it here the less it\ll hurt (it\ll eventually burn up the nerves or so I\m told).  So I suppose I should just ignore the pain because holding my hand over the candle is something I just want to do. I\ve got the right don\t I?  Your body feels pain to let you know something is wrong.  It\s your body\s alarm system informing you that something needs your attention.  A fever tells you that you are sick and need some sort of care.  Guilt can be seen as that emotional or spiritual alarm just informing you that there is something that you\ve done that requires your attention.  It doesn\t require a personality type to become a believer.  It requires someone who is willing to listen to themselves their body & soul.    = All I know is that I don\t know everything. And frankly speaking = I don\t care life is fun anyway. I recognize that I\m not  = perfect but that does not hinder me from have a healthy = and inspiring life.  For several years all I knew is I really liked dropping \cid (LSD). Frankly speaking I didn\t really care.  It was fun anyway.  It didn\t matter that every child my wife and I want to have are at a  *tremendously* greater risk of serious birth defects.  For several years all I knew is I really liked having sex with as many women as I could convice.  Frankly speaking I didn\t care.    I didn\t care that I was putting each one of them at risk (as well as their future partners).  It didn\t matter that for the first decade of my marriage my wife and I will have the worry that possibly that last sneeze meant something *much* worse than a cold.  =  = There are humans that subscribe to the same notion. The nice = thing is that when you finally shake off this huge burden = the shoulders feel far more relaxed!  The nice thing about pain killers if you take enough you won\t care about  the fever
 Um

[Note the Followup-To redirect(s) to alt.conspiracytalk.politics.misc.]  (Timothy J Brent) said in response to P.VASILION:   (1) You have no evidence that David Koresh or his followers were packing that heavy weaponry with any intent to use for other that recreational and self-defense purposes.  (2) Your statement that the public also has rights is correct only is parsed as the individuals who comprise the public also have rights. There is no separate rights-bearing entity known as the public.  (3) Since the rights of the public of which you spoke are in fact only rights of individuals the statement that the rights of the public should be placed above the rights of the individual has no meaning.  (4) You have artificially created an illusionary conflict of individuals\ rights when you speak of my right to rape your daughter. No person has the right to rape another person
 Well where is he?  Another false Messiah shot down in flames.  Matthew 24:4    Watch out that no one deceives you.  For many will come in my     name claiming \I am the Christ\ and will deceive many.  Matthew 24:23    At that time if anyone says to you \Look here is the Christ!\     or \There he is!\ do not believe it.  For false Christs and      false prophets will appear and perform great signs and miracles     to deceive even the elect - if that were possible.  See I have     told you ahead of time.  Do we listen?  Sadly not all of us do.  Peace be with you
Please excuse the length of this post but for personal reasons  I must go on at some length.      [...more deleted...]      Perhaps it would be instructive to see what my original post had to say:       [followed by my signature]      I was extremely careful in this posting not to say anything which was not factual.  I made no judgement about Hitching or the quality of  the quotation attributed to him.  I have not read any of the books  listed (although I did glimpse briefly at Earth Magic I saw nothing  that I would care to comment on).  It was solely in response to an inquiry by Warren about Hitching and your assertion that he is a paleontologist.  I do not know whether he is or is not a paleontologist. I do not claim to know anything about him except this listing of his publications.      However I get the decided impression that I am being included among the Branch Atheists on the basis of this post.  If that  impression is mistaken please let me know.  Otherwise I should let you know that the implications are very offensive to me
I wasn\t sure if this was the right newsgroup to post this to but I guess the misc is there for a reason.  Here goes...  I am getting married in June to  a devout (Wisconsin Synod) Lutheran.  I would classify myself as a strong  agnostic/weak athiest.  This has been a a subject of many discussions between us and is really our only real obstacle.  We don\t have any real difficulties  with the religious differences yet but I expect they will pop up when we have  children.  I have agreed to raise the children nominally Lutheran.  That is Lutheran traditions but trying to keep an open mind.  I am not sure if this is even possible though.  I feel that that the worst quality of being devoutly religous is the lack of an open mind.       Anyway I guess I\ll get on with my question.  Is anyone in the same  situation and can give some suggestions as to how to deal with this?  We\ve  taken the attitude so far of just talking about it a lot and not letting  anything get bottled up inside.  Sometimes I get the feeling we\re making this  much bigger than it actually is.  Any comments would be greatly appreciated.   Also
    And maybe they do.  But without somebody to set the time that doesn\t do them any good.   Humph.  Deleted there was my list of non-religious reasons one might want a moment of silence for a dead classmate.  Maybe everyone doesn\t want to be silent for teachers to give their pompous non-religious speeches in assembly.  I know I didn\t.  So?    Please provide documentation that opposing only things that are actively religious (e.g. actual prayer Amen after a moment of silence mandatory classes in religion) and not things that have possible but uncertain religious implications (e.g. moments of silence
nelson_p@apollo.hp.com (Peter Nelson) writes...   The rest of the story seems to be that the agreement for the broadcast was for prime-time and that Koresh never even heard it played. Wasn\t even tuned in to the radio when it aired -- so no reason to come out.  If later they had given him a copy of the grossly twisted newswire  transcript -- I\m certain Koresh would think he was at the mercy of evil itself.   As to coming out after Passover
Brian Ceccarelli presents us with the fallacy of False Dichotomy in stating that we must accept every thing in the books attributed to Peter or we must discount every other book of antiquity:   Mr Ceccarelli you seem to be stating that we must accept accept everything written in every historical document.  Somehow I doubt do that yourself that.  Thus since I doubt you accept everything written in every historical document I would ask how you can thereby objectively justify complete faith in the words of the books attributed to Peter.   I shall now give an example of a document from antiquity which I am sure you reject; it dates from the time of Ramses II (This was first presented here by Matthew Wiener).  These inscriptions were carved soon after a battle and were carved with the Pharoah\s specific approval so we have true originals rather than mere copies.  This account records the the battle of Kadesh (circa 1285 BC) which occurred on the river Orontes (about 100 miles south of Aleppo).  The Egyptians won this battle with the Hittites and Ramses had his victory inscribed all over the place.  A few of of these inscriptions have survived in near perfect form.  It is a record of how the Pharoah pretty much single-handedly defeated the Hittites after being separated from his troops.   Note that the Egyptian wavers back and forth between first and third person.  The following is from Miriam Lichtheim`s _Ancient Egyptian Literature_ volume II.  \tMy majesty caused the forces of the foes from Hitti to fall \ton their faces one upon the other as crocodiles fall into \tthe water of the Orontes.  I was after them like a griffin; \tI attacked all the countries I alone.  For my infantry and \tmy chariotry had deserted me; not one of them stood looking \tback.  As I live as Ra loves me as my father Atum favors \tme everything that my majesty has told I did it in truth \tin the presence of my infantry and my chariotry.  (Note: This paragraph records not only Ramses divine word but also that there were thousands of witnesses to the event.  Now from the heart of  battle.)  \tThen his majesty drove at a gallop and charged the forces \tof the Foe from Hitti being alone by himself none other \twith him.  His majesty proceeded to look about him and \tfound 2500 chariots ringing him on his way out ...  \tNo officer was with me no charioteer \tNo soldier of the army no shield-bearer; \tMy infantry my chariotry yielded before them \tNot one of them stood firm to fight with them. \tHis majesty spoke: What is this father Amun? \tIs it right for a father to ignore his son? \tAre my deeds a matter for you to ignore? \tDo I not walk and stand at your word? \tI have not neglected an order you gave. \tToo great is he the great lord of Egypt \tTo allow aliens to step on his path! \tWhat are these Asiatics to you O Amun \tThe wretches ignorant of god? \tHave I not made for you many great monuments \t... \tI call to you my father Amun \tI am among a host of strangers; \tAll countries are arrayed against me \tI am alone there\s none with me! \t... \tThe labors of many people are nothing \tAmun is more helpful than they; \tI came here by the command of your mouth \tO Amun I have not transgressed your command!  \tNow though I prayed in a distant land \tMy voice resounded in Southern Thebes. \tI found Amun came when I called to him \tHe gave me his hand and I rejoiced. \tHe called from behind as if near by: \tForward I am with you \tI your father my hand is with you \tI prevail over a hundred thousand men \tI am lord of victory lover of valor! \tI found my heart stout my breast in joy \tAll I did succeeded I was like Mont. \t... \tI slaughtered among them at my will \tNot one looked behind him \tNot one turned around \tWhoever fell down did not rise. \t... \tOne called out to the other saying: \tNo man is he who is among us \tIt is Seth great-of-strength Baal in person; \tNot deeds of man are these his doings \tThey are of one who is unique \tWho fights a hundred thousand without soldiers and chariots \tCome quick flee before him \tTo seek life and breathe air; \tFor he who attempts to get close to him \tHis hands all his limbs grow limp. \tOne cannot hold either bow or spears \tWhen one sees him come racing along! \tMy majesty hunted them like a griffin \tI slaughtered among them unceasingly.  So you see Brian we have a few original manuscripts recording the miraculous  battle between the Ramses and the Hittites.  Do you reject them as being *completely* true? I suspect you do and if so then do you also in your own words:       question the existence of Alexander the Great Tilgrath Pilisar III      Nero Caligula Josephus Cyrus the Great Artexerxes?  Do you also thereby question all their documents? That`s the problem with your all or nothing approach.  Many ancient people used to mix a bit of fancy with their facts.  So for you to say that we must either accept all of Peter (and the rest of the New Testament) or accept no records of antiquity at all forces you thereby to accept the verity of documents you probably do not find completely credible.   As to your other argument that so many people have testified to Jesus that he must be true:    I have three points.    First this is argumentum ad populum (ie: appeal to popular opinion); you cannot vote on truth.  For instance do the millions of Hindu\s past and present who testify to the reality of Brahma constitute actual evidence for the existence of Brahma? How would you answer your own question in regards to the testimony of Hindus:  \tWith a scoff of your keyboard with near complete ignorance of  \t the testimonies are you going to say that that is all complete  \t hooey?  If you do so scoff then how do you objectively justify your own special pleading?  Second it is not at all clear that King Solomon or King David testified to Jesus.  You can claim it to be clear but that does not make it true.   Third it is quite arguable that Abraham Lincoln was not Christian and that he had both a public and a private view of Christianity.  In fact there was much discussion about it in his day (yes he was publically accused of being a deist.  Oh my).  I am presently collecting a FAQ for Lincoln as I\ve previously done for Tyre Jefferson and etc.    \t\t\t\tLater

 No this is far from clear.  We only have the word of the FBI spokepeople that a survivor made this claim.  We have the contradictory word of the lawyers who spoke with the survivors individually that ALL of them agreed that they did NOT have a suicide pact and did not intentionally start the fire.  In the absense of any more evidence I don\t see how we can decide who to believe. Furthermore its quite possible that there was no general suicide pact and that some small inner circle took it upon themselves to kill everyone else. With the state of the area now we may never know what happened.   Again we have only the word of the FBI on this claim.  The lawyers who have also talked to the survors deny that any of them are making that claim.   I will agree on your assessment as to the relative probabilities.  Its more likely that the BD\s started the fire than did the FBI.  But there is currently NO way to decide what actually happened based on the publically available evidence (which is nearly none).      D.   The fire was an started accidentally by the BDs.  I am truely amazed that         I have heard (or read) of no one suggesting this possibility.         With all the tear gas and the lack of electical power in the compound and         the adults wearing gas masks it had to have been chaotic inside.         I can easily image someone leaving a lamp too close to something or         accidentally dropping a lamp or knocking one over.  With the winds it         would have quickly gotten out of control.      No I think that D is also quite reasonable.  I personally can\t really asses any relative probablities to either of these 3 probabilities although if forced to bet on the issue I would probably take an accident (either FBI or BD) over intential setting of the fire).     I would also like to add a comment related to the reports that bodies recovered had gunshot wounds.  The coroner was on the Today Show this morning and categorically denied that they\ve reach any such conclusions.  He pointed out that under intense heat sufficient pressure builds up in the head that can cause it to explode and that this can look very much like a massive gunshot wound to the head which is quite consisted with te reports I\ve read and heard.     In short
 Krishna.  BG10:20(Miller) I am the self abiding in the heart of all creatures; I am their beginning their middle and their end. BG10:32(Miller) I am the beginning the middle and the end of creations Arjuna; of sciences I am the science of the self; I am the dispute of orators. BG10:41(Miller) Whatever is powerful lucid splendid or invulnerable has its source in a fragment of my brilliance. (42) What use is so much knowledge to you
 First and foremost I honestly do not believe that Jesus was anything more than a man who lived and died two thousand years ago.  I know your Bible provides wonderful stories of the things he said and did but I simply do not believe that he still exists as an entity that has any bearing on this universe or the lives in it and I similarly do not believe that the god that you worship exists or has ever existed.  Period.  I view religion in general and Christianity in specific as a \cultural virus\ that has been passed down from generation to generation because people are often too afraid to think for themselves and claim responsibility for their own fate so they brainwash themselves and their children into believing the popular myths and it goes on from there.  And eventually Christianity becomes a given -- if so many other people believe in it it must be right no?  I don\t believe in any life after death.  I believe that when I die I die so therefore it\s up to me to try to bring meaning and purpose to my life in the meantime.  I don\t believe that it\s a good thing to humble myself and view pride as a sin -- pride in moderation is a constructive thing.  I see nothing at all wrong with homosexuality and nothing inferior about women and my priests lost a lot of my trust when they patronizingly tried to explain the \faults\ of these opinions to me.  I don\t believe in \loving everyone\ especially people I\ve never met; while I try to show respect to everyone my love and admiration is something not easily earned and I do not feel guilty about denying my respect and consideration to someone who has abused it.  If you want me to take your religion the least bit seriously
 Tell me are you really this stupid or are you just pretending.    A fire insurance is not an offensive weapon.   A spare tire is not an offensive weapon.  \t\t \tHow should one deal with a man who is convinced that \t\t \the is acting according to God\s will
      i guess i ought not conclude from this then that since you didn\t ask to be created you don\t care if you go to hell.  :)      i don\t consider myself an unthinking sheep.  the bible says god created us to be in communion and obedience to him.  the first and only rule was to not eat of a certain tree
  When Robert refers to the orthodox he is talking about the Historical position of the Christian Faith. Such things are derived from Biblcal texts through the centuries by the apocolic fathers of the faith.  You are right that people read things differently in the Bible and this is alright in parts like parables and such forth. However when it comes to the essential doctrines of the Historical Orthodox Christan Beliefs there is only one correct way to read it. For example either the doctrine of the Trinity is true or it is false. Yes people read the texts differently but only one position is true. They both cannot be. According to the text
  So instead you are asking individual citizens to place themselves at risk by assuming that everyone who claims to be a cop actually is a cop. Around here the police have actually made public service announcements saying that if you are a lady driving by yourself at night and you see blue lights flashing behind you. Do not pull over until you reach a well lit preferably occupied place gas station etc.   It wouldn\t be murder
    ...     ...      Interesting idea.      This suggestion has inspired me to post under the title Theories  of Creation a collection of various philosophies of creation that  I am aware of.  Could you explain which of these theories you would want taught and which ones you would not?  Or perhaps I haven\t included a favorite theory of yours (if so
Actually if Mr X had something to gain by his claims his account of the events would nmot be the most respected. Case and point the resurrection. By claiming that the resurrection actually happened the early preachers were able to convert many to Christianity. However
   [it is Big Bang]  Since you asked... from the Big Bang to the formation of atoms is about 10E11 seconds. As for the color: bright. Very very bright.    I don\t. I believe the current theory of cosmology because it is fairly well supported by observational evidence (not as well supported as say evolution or relativity
  An extremely good example of circumstantial evidence! Every time these right-wing control-freaks start spouting about prayer in schools I get this nagging commentary from the Sermon on the Mount [Matt: 6:5-6] And when you pray do not imitate the hypocrites: they love to say their prayers standing up in the synagogues and at the street corners for people to see them.  I tell you solemnly they have had their reward.  But when you pray go to your private room and when you have shut your door pray to your Father who is in that secret place.  But no. THEY want PUBLIC prayers
930425   Let\s start with the name Rosicrucian. I took me a long time to come to the conclusion that there is a difference between a *member* of a rosicrucian body and BEING *a* ROSICRUCIAN. So when you say that you met some \rosicrucians\ you mean members of a group that calls themselves rosicrucian. At least that is what your observation suggests :-)   Response:  This makes much sense to me.  This is also true of most religions. There is a difference between being a *member* of a group of people who call themselves \Hindus\ or \Christians\ or \Pagans\ and actually *BEING* any of these.  The social groups tend to make very important requirements about not belonging to other \religions\.  I find that the ideal described by the holy texts of most religions can be interpreted in very similar ways so that one could presume that \mysticism\ is the core of every religion and Huxley\s \Perennial Philosophy\ is the Great Secret Core of all mystical trads. :>   Tony:  I\d prefer if you would have stated up front that it was the Lectorium Rosicrucianum only because they may be confused by some readers of this newsgroup with the Rosicrucian Order AMORC based (the USA Jurisdiction) in San Jose CA; this being the RC org with the most members (last time I looked). Of course most members does not *necessarily* mean best.   Response:  Certainly true.  I didn\t know there WERE any groups which called themselves \Rosicrucians\ that didn\t associate with AMORC.  Sure I\ve heard all the hubbub about the Golden Dawn and Rosae Crucis in relation to all these Western esoteric groups but hadn\t heard about other \Rosicrucians\. I\ll admit my bias.  I live in San Jose. :>   Tony:  You\ll have to trust me when I tell you that if that lecture/class/whatever had been presented by AMORC it is unlikely that you would have had the same impression i.e. you\d probably have had a positive impression more likely than a negative one IMHO.    Response:  This may be slightly off.  I\ve met some of these Rosicrucians and have a couple friends in AMORC.  The stories I\ve heard and the slight contact I\ve had with them does not give me the hope that I\d be received with any kind of warm welcome.  I still like to think that most people who are involved with stratified relationships (monogamy religion etc.) are in DEEP pain and hope to heal it within such a \cast\.   Tony:        It is curious to know that 3 other RC \orders\ (in the USA) claim to be *non- sectarian*.   Response:  I\d like to know at least the addresses of the \other orders\ which call  themselves \Rosicrucians\ and especially those which are \nonsectarian\. Is this \nonsectarian\ like the Masons who require that a member \believe in God by his/her definition\?              Tony:  I don\t see nothing *fundamentally* wrong with us containing something divine... And yes I don\t like phrases like eternal bliss either! :-)   Response:  Let alone us *BEING* something divine. ;>   Tony:  BTW I have read the intro letters of the LRC which they will mail you free of charge.   Response:  Addresses

In the King James Version of the Bible there are three differents words  translated into the word hell.  These Greek words have totally different  meanings.  The words are Hades Tartaros and Gehenna.      In bibical usage the Greek word Hades is used only 11 times in the  New Testament and is roughly the equivalent to the Old Testament word Sheol... meaning the grave or pit (compare Acts 2:27 with Psalms 16:10).  Hades may be  likened to a hole in the ground. (In the Bible it has nothing to do with fire!)      Most modern bibical translators admit that the use in the English word hell to translate Hades and Sheol are an unfortunate and misleading practice.        Why?  Because when seeing the word hell many readers impute to it the  traditional connotation of an ever-burning inferno when this was never  remotely intended in the Greek language or in Old English!      In its true bibical usage Hades does indeed refer to the state or abode of  the dead but not in the sense of spirits walking around in some sort of  shadowy realm.  Hades is simply the abode we call the grave.  All dead go to  this hell.      The second hell of the Bible Tartaros is mentioned only once in  scripture 2 Pet.2:4; For if God spared not the angels that sinned but cast  them down to hell (TARTAROS) and delivered them into chains of darkness to be  reserved unto judgment...      Following their rebellion to unseat God from His throne (Isa.14:12-14;  Rev.12:4) the archangel Lucifer (now Satan) and a third of the created angels  (now demons) were ejected from heaven (Luke 10:18).  They were cast down to  Tartaros a place or condition of restraint that God has imposed on the  mutinous angels as they await ultimate judgment (Jude 6; 1 Cor.6:3).      Tartaros then is a hell that applies only to evil rebellious angels or demons (It is interesting that the ancient Greeks used this word to describe  the place in which Zeus confined the rebellious Titans).  Nowhere in the Bible  is there any mention of men being put into this particular hell.      The the third word that is translated as hell in the Bible is Gehenna. It comes from the Hebrew GAI HINNOM meaning valley of Hinniom.  Hinnom is a  deep narrow ravine located to the south and southwest of Jerusalem.      In Old Testament times it was a place of abominable pagan rites including  infant sacrifice (It was there that the apostate kings Ahaz and Manasseh made  their children pass through the fire to the god Molech.  The rites were  specifically celebrated in Tophet the place of abhorrence one of the chief  groves in the valley).      King Josiah of ancient Judah finally put an end to these abominations.  He  defiled the valley rendering it ceremonially unclean (2 Kings 23:10).  Later  the valley became the cesspool and city dump of Jerusalem; a repository for  sewage refuse and animal carcasses.  The bodies of dispised criminals were  also burned there along with the rubbish.  Fires burned continuously feeding  by a constant supply of garbage and refuse.      Aceldama the field of blood purchased with the money Judas received for the betrayal of Christ (Matt.27:8) was also in part of the valley of Hinnom.      So what does this valley called Gehenna have to do with hell?        In Rev.19:20: the Satan inspired political dictator and a miracle-working  religious figure the False Prophet working with him will resist the  re-establishment of the government of God by Jesus Christ at His Second Coming. Their fate is revealed by the apostle John: And the beast was taken and with  him the false prophet...  These both were cast alive into a lake of fire  burning with brimstone.          Where will this temporary lake of fire (this hell) be?      The prophet Isaiah wrote of this lake of fire prepared for the Beast: For  Tophet (in the valley of Hinnom) is ordained of old yea for the king it is  prepared he hath made it deep and large the pile thereof is fire and wood  the breath of the Lord like a stream of brimstone doth kindle it (Isa.30:33).      One thousand years later Satan himself will be cast into this rekindled  fiery lake where the Beast and False Prophet were cast! (Rev.20:10).      But what of the wicked who have died over the millennia?  Does the Bible  say that they are now suffering fiery punishment for their sins in a lake of  fire?      In the sequence of Rev.20 the incorrigibly wicked are resurrected to be  thrown into the lake of fire after Satan is cast there! (Rev.20:15). What will  become of these wicked?  Will they writhe in flames for eternity?        The wicked will be burned up from the intense heat of the coming Gehenna  fire on the earth.  They wil be consumed annihilated destroyed!  This  punishment will be everlasting (permanent and final).  The Bible calls it the  second death (Rev.20:14; 21:8) from which there is no possibility of a  further resurrection.      The Bible does teach eternal punishment but not eternal punishing.                                 The prophet Malachi provides a graphic description. For behold the day  cometh that shall burn as an oven and all the proud yea and all that do  wickedly shall be stubble and the day that cometh shall burn them up... (4:1).  To the righteous God says that the wicked shall be ashes under the  soles of your feet...(Mal.4:3).      Gehenna was a place of destruction and death not a place of living  torture!  Jesus was talking to Jews who understood all about this Gehenna or  valley of Hinnom.  Utter destruction by fire was complete.  Nothing was left  but ashes!       Every text in the Bible translated from this Greek word Gehenna means  complete destruction not living torture (not eternal life in torment)!  The  Bible says in Romans 6:23 The wages of sin is death
 This all would also implicate that in order for the sinning 2 month old baby to get forgivance he or she has to ask for help from Jesus. Somehow I find this a little bit amuzing.  Cheers
Here is someones biblical claim for the characteristics of Satan:   And separately:   We have here three distinct claims concerning the results of the devil\s decision making a specific desire and a physical description.  Now in support (aside from the minor detail that an author seldom writes an unbiased account of the opposition) we see:   ISA 14:12  How art thou fallen from heaven O Lucifer son of the morning!  how art thou cut down to the ground which didst weaken the nations!  ISA 14:13  For thou hast said in thine heart I will ascend  into                                               -------------------- heaven I will exalt my throne above the stars of God: I will sit ----------------------------------------------------- also upon the mount of the congregation  in  the  sides  of the north:  ISA 14:14  I will ascend above the heights of the clouds; I  will be like the most High.  ISA 14:15  Yet thou shalt be brought down to hell to  the  sides of the pit.   Doesn\t say sits on God\s throne.  Says will exhault throne above the stars.   DAN 10:12  Then said he unto me Fear not Daniel: for  from the first  day  that thou didst set thine heart to understand and to chasten thyself before thy God thy words were heard  and  I am come for thy words.  DAN 10:13  But the prince of the kingdom of Persia  withstood me                     ------------------------------ one  and twenty days: but lo Michael one of the chief princes                                         ------------------------ came to help me; and I remained there with the kings of Persia.  DAN 10:14  Now I am come to make thee understand what  shall be- fall  thy  people  in  the latter days: for yet the vision is for many days.   See who is being discussed?    EZE 28:12  Son of man take up a lamentation  upon  the  king of                                                      ----------- Tyrus and say unto him Thus saith the Lord GOD; Thou sealest up ----- the sum full of wisdom and perfect in beauty.  EZE 28:13  Thou hast been in Eden the garden of God;  every  pre- cious  stone  was  thy covering the sardius topaz and the dia- mond the beryl the onyx and the jasper the sapphire the em- erald  and  the  carbuncle and gold: the workmanship of thy ta- brets and of thy pipes was prepared in thee in the day that  thou wast created.  EZE 28:14  Thou art the anointed cherub that covereth; and I have set  thee  so: thou wast upon the holy mountain of God; thou hast walked up and down in the midst of the stones of fire.  EZE 28:15  Thou wast perfect in thy ways from the day  that  thou wast created till iniquity was found in thee.  EZE 28:16  By the multitude of thy merchandise they  have  filled the  midst of thee with violence and thou hast sinned: therefore I will cast thee as profane out of the mountain  of  God:  and  I will  destroy  thee  O  covering  cherub  from the midst of the stones of fire.  EZE 28:17  Thine heart was lifted up because of thy beauty  thou hast  corrupted  thy  wisdom  by reason of thy brightness: I will cast thee to the ground I will lay thee before kings that  they may behold thee.  EZE 28:18  Thou hast defiled thy sanctuaries by the multitude of thine iniquities by the iniquity of thy traffick; therefore will I bring forth a fire from the midst  of  thee  it  shall  devour thee  and I will bring thee to ashes upon the earth in the sight of all them that behold thee.  EZE 28:19  All they that know thee among the people shall be as- tonished at thee: thou shalt be a terror

 Rick I think we can safely say 1) Robert is not the only person who understands the Bible and 2) the leadership of the LDS church historicly never has.  Let\s consider some personal interpretations and see how much trust we should put in Orthodox Mormonism which could never be confused with Orthodox Christianity.          In one of his attacks on Christians the Mormon Apostle Bruce R. McConkie said they thrash around in...darkness in trying to identify Elohim and Jehovah and to show their relationship to the promised Messiah. He also said Christians are wrong to believe that Jehovah is the Supreme Deity [God the Father] and that Christ came into mortality as His Only Begotten Son. McConkie then stated what Mormons believe today to be the truth about the matter. He said that Elohim is the Father and Jehovah is the Son.    Being thus aware of how far astray the religious intellectualists   have gone in defining their three-in-one God it comes as no surprise   to learn that they thrash around in the same darkness in trying to   identify Elohim and Jehovah and to show their relationship to the   promised Messiah. Some sectarians even believe that Jehovah is the   Supreme Deity whose Son came into mortality as the Only Begotten. As   with their concept that God is a Spirit this misinformation about the   Gods of Heaven is untrue. The fact is and it too is attested by Holy   Writ that Elohim is the Father and that Jehovah is the Son who was   born into mortality as the Lord Jesus Christ the promised Messiah.   (Promised Messiah p. 100)          Notice that McConkie said the Christians are as wrong about their three-in-one God and their belief that God is a Spirit as they are in their understanding of who Elohim and Jehovah are. Before examining McConkie\s attack and its validity we shall read a few more statements by McConkie and other Mormon sources concerning the words Elohim and Jehovah. McConkie stated:    ...the chief designation of Christ that has been preserved for us in   the Old Testament as that ancient work is now published is the   exalted name-title Jehovah. (Promised Messiah p. 367)    _Elohim_ plural word though it is is also used as the exalted   name-title of God the Eternal Father a usage that connotes his   supremacy and omnipotence he being God above all Gods. (Mormon   Doctrine p. 224)          Agreeing with McConkie on the question of who Elohim and Jehovah are the Apostle James E. Talmage stated:    _Elohim_ as understood and used in the restored Church of Jesus   Christ is the name-title of God the Eternal Father whose firstborn   Son in the spirit is _Jehovah_ -- the Only Begotten in the flesh   Jesus Christ. (Jesus the Christ p. 38)          A Doctrinal Exposition by The First Presidency and the Twelve apostles of the Mormon Church states that God the Eternal Father...[is] designate[d] by the exalted name-title \Elohim\... (Articles of Faith p. 466) ...Christ in His preexistent antemortal or unembodied state...was known as Jehovah... (Articles of Faith p. 471)          Today Mormon leaders teach that Elohim in the OT refers to God the Father and Jehovah refers to Christ. McConkie attacked Christians for saying Jehovah can refer to the Father. He stressed that these two name-titles should not be changed around so that Christ is called Elohim and the Father is called Jehovah. ...the Father...is Elohim not Jehovah.... Jehovah is Christ and Christ is Jehovah; they are one and the same person. (Promised Messiah p. 111)          In the OT of the KJV of the Bible the Hebrew word Elohim is used to refer to the true God false gods and goddesses and the judges of Israel. When referring to the true God Elohim is translated with a capital G. When referring to false gods and goddesses and the judges of Israel it is translated with a small g. It is translated four times as judges (Exod. 21:6; 22:8-9) once as judge (1 Sam. 2:25) twice as mighty (Gen. 23:6; Exod. 9:28) once as angels (Ps. 8:5) once as godly (Mal. 2:15) once as great (Gen. 30:8) and once as very great. (1 Sam. 14:15)          The word Jehovah is the traditional pronunciation of the tetragrammation YHWH or YHVH with the vowel points taken from the word Adonai.  Many people believe the true pronunciation of the tetragrammation was Yahweh or Yahveh. However since Jehovah rather than Yahweh is the word used by Mormonism this section will also use Jehovah instead of Yahweh to examine the validity of the claims of Mormon leaders regarding that name. Jehovah unlike Elohim is never used of false gods. It is the personal name of the triune God of the Bible. In the KJV Jehovah is rendered primarily LORD sometimes GOD and rarely Lord.          Now that we understand something about the words Elohim and Jehovah and their use by Mormon leaders we shall consider the Apostle McConkie\s attack on Christians for believing the Father is Jehovah. In trying to prove that Jehovah refers exclusively to Christ McConkie cited several verses from the Bible. Some of these verses and McConkie\s interpretation of them will be examined to see whether he was right. Remember McConkie said the Father is not Jehovah; He is only Elohim. The first example we shall consider involves McConkie\s interpretation of Ps. 110:1. Of this verse he stated:    Of whom spake David when his tongue was touched by the Holy Spirit   and he testified The Lord said unto my Lord Sit thou at my right   hand until I make thine enemies thy footstool? (Ps. 110:1.) Two   Lords are here involved: one is speaking to the other; one is greater   than the other; one is making provision for the triumph and glory of   the other. Who are they and what message is contained in this   Messianic prophecy?   What think ye of Christ? our Lord asked certain of his detractors   toward the end of his mortal ministry. Whose son is he? Is Christ   the Son of God or of someone else? Is he to be born of a divine Parent   or will he be as other men -- a mortal son of a mortal father? That he   was to be a descendant of David was a matter of great pride to all the   Jews. And so they answered The Son of David.   David\s son? Truly he was. But he was more much more. And so our   Lord with irrefutable logic and to their complete discomfiture   asked How then doth David in spirit call him Lord saying The Lord   said unto my Lord Sit thou on my right hand till I make thine   enemies thy footstool? If David then call him Lord how is he his   son? That is if he is only the Son of David how is it that the   great King acting under inspiration calls him Lord and worships him   as such? And we might add: _Who is the other Lord the one who spake   unto David\s Lord?_ Can there be any question as to how Jesus is   interpreting the words of the Psalm? He is saying that it means: \_The   Father said unto the Son Elohim said unto Jehovah_ sit thou on my   right hand until after your mortal ministry; then I will raise you up   to eternal glory and exaltation with me where you will continue to   sit on my right hand forever.\ (Promised Messiah pp. 101-102)   (emphasis added)          Agreeing with the above statement by McConkie the following remark in the Mormon pamphlet _What the Mormons Think of Christ p. 6 reads: The Lord [Elohim the Father] said unto my Lord [Jehovah the Son]... (brackets in original)          McConkie clearly stated that it is Elohim the Father who is speaking to Jehovah the Son in this Psalm. However when one looks at the Hebrew word translated LORD it becomes apparent that either the first LORD is not the Father or else the Father is Jehovah. Either way McConkie is wrong. The Psalm reads:    The LORD [Jehovah] said unto my Lord [Adon] Sit thou at my right   hand until I make thine enemies thy footstool. (Ps. 110:1)          The first LORD in this verse is Jehovah who Mormonism says is Christ not the Father. The second Lord is the Hebrew word Adon (singular for Adonai meaning master or lord). If the first LORD is the Father and the second Lord is the Son then the Father is Jehovah and the Son is Adon. However if the Father is not Jehovah as McConkie claimed then the first LORD is Jehovah the Son but who then is Adon? Obviously the Father is Jehovah in this Psalm and His Son is Adon.          Another example involves Isa. 42:6 about which McConkie stated the following:    I the Lord have called thee in righteousness _Isaiah quoted the   Father as saying of Christ_ and will hold thine hand and will keep   thee and give thee for a covenant of the people for a light of the   Gentiles. (Isa. 42:6.) (Promised Messiah p. 81) (emphasis added)          McConkie said the Father was speaking of Christ in this passage which reads:    I the LORD [Jehovah] have called thee in righteousness and will hold   thine hand and will keep thee and give thee for a covenant of the   people for a light of the Gentiles. (Isa. 42:6)          According to McConkie I the LORD refers to the Father and thine and thee refer to Christ. However the LORD who is speaking is Jehovah which means either McConkie was wrong about who is speaking or else the Father is Jehovah.          Another example involves Ps. 22:7-8. Of these verses McConkie stated:    shoot out the lip they shake the head saying He trusted on the Lord   that he would deliver him: let him deliver him seeing he delighted in   him. (Ps. 22:7-8.) _The fulfillment as Jesus hung on the cross_ is   found in these words: The chief priests mocking him with the scribes   and elders said He saved others; himself he cannot save. If he be   the King of Israel let him now come down from the cross and we will   believe him. He trusted in God; let him deliver him now if he will   have him: for he said I am the Son of God. The thieves also which   were crucified with him cast the same in his teeth. (Matt.   27:41-44.) (Promised Messiah pp. 530-531) (emphasis added)          Ps. 22:7-8 reads as follows:    All they that see me laugh me to scorn: they shoot out the lip they   shake the head saying He trusted on the LORD [Jehovah] that he would   deliver him: let him deliver him seeing he delighted in him.          McConkie said these verses had their fulfillment as Jesus hung on the cross. That means the person who was scorned in these verses was Christ. Who then was the LORD in whom he trusted? It was Jehovah the Father.          Another example involves Ps. 31:13 and Ps. 41:9. Regarding them McConkie stated the following:    With reference to the conniving and conspiring plots incident to our   Lord\s arrest and judicial trials the prophecy was: They took counsel   together against me they devised to take away my life. (Ps. 31:13.)   Mine own familiar friend in whom I trusted which did eat of my   bread hath lifted up his heel against me. (Ps. 41:9.) (Promised   Messiah p. 532)          Apostle McConkie said these Psalms refer to Christ\s arrest and judicial trials. We shall first consider Ps. 31 and then Ps. 41. While McConkie only quoted verse 13 of Ps. 31 verse 14 will also be included to give a complete understanding of the matter.    For I have heard the slander of many: fear was on every side: while   they took counsel together against me they devised to take away my   life. But I trusted in thee O LORD [Jehovah]: I said Thou art my God   [Elohim]. (Ps. 31:13-14)          McConkie said verse 13 referred to Jesus Christ. Verse 14 goes on to tell that He (Christ) trusted in the LORD who is called His God or Elohim. Mormonism teaches that the God above Jesus is Elohim the Father. Verse 14 however reveals that the Elohim of the man Jesus is Jehovah the Father.          In Ps. 41 McConkie only quoted one verse; however two verses will be considered in this examination.    Yea mine own familiar friend in whom I trusted which did eat of my   bread hath lifted up his heel against me.   But thou O LORD [Jehovah] be merciful unto me and raise me up that   I may requite them. (Ps. 41:9-10)          McConkie stated above that verse 9 referred to Judas\ role in Christ\s death. Since it was Judas who was the familiar friend who lifted up his heel the pronouns mine I my and me in verse 9 must refer to Christ. Notice that at the beginning of verse 10 there is a change of pronoun to thou which refers to the LORD (Jehovah). Then the pronouns me and I which refer to Christ are used again. That means Christ was speaking to Jehovah the Father in these verses.          Another example involves McConkie\s following remark about Ps.         110:4.    One of the great Messianic prophecies spoken by the mouth of David   ever after the order of Melchizedek. (Ps. 110:4.) (Promised Messiah   p. 450)          McConkie admitted this is a Messianic prophecy involving Christ. The question is What in this verse refers to Christ?    The LORD [Jehovah] hath sworn and will not repent Thou art a priest   for ever after the order of Melchizedek. (Ps. 110:4)          Does the LORD which is Jehovah refer to Christ? If McConkie is right and Jesus is Jehovah but the Father is not then the LORD would have to refer to Christ. But who then is the one addressed as the priest forever after the order of Melchizedek? The Bible reveals that the one referred to is Jesus Christ (Heb. 5:8-10; 6:20; 7); therefore the LORD (Jehovah) in Ps. 110:4 is the Father.          Another example involves Isa. 53:4-12. Of these verses McConkie stated:    Of the atoning sacrifice of the future Messiah Isaiah said...      The _Lord_ has laid on him the iniquities of us all....      It pleased the _Lord_ to bruise him... (Promised Messiah p. 234)      (emphasis added)          McConkie rightly said these verses refer to the atoning sacrifice of the future Messiah. However what he failed to mention is that they also prove that the Father is Jehovah. Verse 6 reads: All we like sheep have gone astray; we have turned every one to his own way; and the LORD [Jehovah] hath laid on him [Christ] the iniquity of us all and verse 10 reads: Yet it pleased the LORD [Jehovah] to bruise him [Christ]...          Obviously the LORD who laid on Christ the iniquity of us all and who bruised Him is God the Father who is called Jehovah in these verses.          Remember McConkie stated that some sectarians even believe that Jehovah is the Supreme Deity and that Christ came into mortality as His Only Begotten Son. He called this concept misinformation that is untrue. To prove that it is McConkie who is misinformed and believing untruth two Scriptural references (2 Sam. 7:14; Ps. 2:7) will be examined. McConkie stated the following regarding these Scriptures:    In the midst of a passage that is clearly Messianic the Lord says of   the Seed of David: I will be his father and he shall be my son. (2   Sam. 7:14.) In the second Psalm the whole of which is also clearly   Messianic occurs this statement: Thou art my Son; this day have I   begotten thee. (Ps. 2:7.) Paul quotes both of these statements in   Hebrews 1:5 and says they are prophecies that Christ would come as the   Son of God. (Promised Messiah p. 143)          McConkie cited Heb. 1:5 to show that 2 Sam. 7:14 and Ps. 2:7 refer to Christ who would come as the Son of God. Since McConkie first referenced 2 Sam. 7:14 this examination will too. However along with verse 14 verses 11-13 will also be included.    And as since the time that I commanded judges to be over my people   Israel and have caused thee to rest from all thine enemies. Also the   LORD [Jehovah] telleth thee that he will make thee an house.   And when thy days be fulfilled and thou shalt sleep with thy fathers   I will set up thy seed after thee which shall proceed out of thy   bowels and I will establish his kingdom.   He shall build an house for my name and I will stablish the throne of   his kingdom for ever. I will be his father and he shall be my son. (2   Sam. 7:11-14)          These verses teach that the LORD (Jehovah) would have a Son the Messiah.         In the second example McConkie cited Ps. 2:7. This examination will include verse 8. Notice that it is the LORD (Jehovah) who says Thou art my Son; this day have I begotten thee.    I will declare the decree: the LORD [Jehovah] hath said unto me Thou   art my Son; this day have I begotten thee.   Ask of me and I shall give thee the heathen for thine inheritance   and the uttermost parts of the earth for thy possession.          McConkie said these verses of Scripture are clearly Messianic and he acknowledged they teach that Christ would come as the Son of God. What he is not willing to acknowledge however is that these Scriptures also teach that the Father is Jehovah and that the sectarians who believe Jehovah is the Supreme Deity whose Son is Jesus Christ the Only Begotten are right in their belief.          Another example involves Mic. 5:4. Of this verse McConkie stated the following:    And so truly did our Lord act _during his mortal ministry! Truly   this is he of whom it is written_: He shall stand and feed in the   strength of the Lord in the majesty of the name of the LORD his   God... for now shall he be great unto the ends of the earth. (Mic.   5:4.) (Promised Messiah p. 182) (emphasis added)          According to McConkie the pronoun He at the beginning of Mic. 5:4 refers to Christ during his mortal ministry. Who then is the LORD his God? Mic. 5:4 reads:    And he [Christ] shall stand and feed in the strength of the LORD   [Jehovah] in the majesty of the name of the LORD [Jehovah] his God   [Elohim]... for now shall he be great unto the ends of the earth.          Obviously the LORD of Jesus Christ is Jehovah the Father who is referred to as Jehovah his Elohim.          Another example involves Ps. 2:2 and Isa. 61:1. Of these verses McConkie stated the following:    A number of Messianic passages speak of the Lord and...his   anointed (Ps. 2:2) signifying that the Chosen One was consecrated   and set apart for the ministry and mission that was his. _Jesus   applied these passages to himself_ by quoting Isaiah\s prophecy. The   Lord hath anointed me to preach good tidings unto the meek (Isa.   61:1) and then saying: This day is this scripture fulfilled in your   ears (Luke 4:21). (Promised Messiah pp. 182-183) (emphasis added)          The first source McConkie quoted -- Ps. 2:2 -- reads as follows:    The kings of the earth set themselves and the rulers take counsel   together against the LORD [Jehovah] and against his anointed.          McConkie said the anointed one was Christ. If that is true who was Jehovah? If Jehovah is always Christ who was the anointed one? Obviously Jehovah is referring to God the Father and the anointed is indeed referring to Christ. The second source McConkie cited is Isa. 61:1 which states:    The Spirit of the Lord [Adonai] GOD [Jehovah] is upon me; because the   LORD [Jehovah] hath anointed me to preach good tidings unto the meek;   he hath sent me to bind up the brokenhearted to proclaim liberty to   the captives and the opening of the prison to them that are bound;          The one who was anointed to preach bind up proclaim and open was Jesus Christ. Who then was the one who anointed Him? This verse says the LORD (Jehovah) did the anointing. Again we face the same problem. If Jehovah does not refer to the Father but only to Christ then Jesus anointed someone but who? As McConkie pointed out Jesus applied these passages to himself. Therefore the Jehovah who anointed Christ is God the Father.          Other examples could be cited to show that McConkie and other Mormon leaders are wrong when they say God the Father is not Jehovah. However these should be enough to expose their error.          Now what about Mormonism\s claim that Jesus is Jehovah but He is not Elohim? It is true that Jesus is Jehovah. The following Scriptures prove this fact:    Thus saith the LORD [Jehovah] the King of Israel and his redeemer   the LORD [Jehovah] of hosts; I am the first and I am the last; and   beside me there is no God. (Isa. 44:6)   [Jesus said] ...I am the first and the last: I am he that liveth and   was dead... (Rev. 1:17-18)    ...saith the LORD [Jehovah]...they shall look upon me whom they have   pierced and they shall mourn for him as one mourneth for his only   son... (Zech. 12:110)   Behold he [Christ] cometh with clouds; and every eye shall see him   and they also which pierced him... (Rev. 1:7)    ...I am the LORD [Jehovah] thy God the Holy One of Israel... (Isa.   43:3)   ...Ye denied the Holy One [Christ] and the Just... (Acts 3:14)    And it shall come to pass that whosoever shall call on the name of   the LORD [Jehovah] shall be delivered... (Joel 2:32)   ...the name of Jesus Christ of Nazareth...there is none other name   under heaven given among men whereby we must be saved. (Acts 4:1012)    Behold the Lord GOD [Jehovah] will come with strong hand...his   reward is with him... (Isa. 40:10)   ...Behold I [Christ] come quickly; and my reward is with me... (Rev.   22:12)    ...the LORD [Jehovah] my God shall come and all the saints with   thee. (Zech. 14:5)   ...at the coming of our Lord Jesus Christ with all his saints. (1   Thess. 3:13)    The LORD [Jehovah] is my shepherd... (Ps. 23:1)   [Jesus said] I am the good shepherd... (John 10:14)    ...saith the Lord GOD [Jehovah]. I will seek that which was lost...   (Ezek. 34:15-16)   ...the Son of man is come to seek and to save that which was lost.   (Luke 19:10)    For I am the LORD [Jehovah] thy God the Holy One of Israel thy   Saviour... (Isa. 43:3)   Looking for that blessed hope and the glorious appearing of the great   God and our Saviour Jesus Christ. (Tit. 2:13. See also Jer. 42:5 and   Rev. 1:5; Mal. 3:6 and Heb. 13:8; 1 Kin. 8:2839 and John 2:24-25;   Isa. 25:8 and 2 Tim. 1:10; Ps. 107:2429 and Matt. 8:26; Prov.3:12 and   Rev. 3:19)          While Mormons are right when they say Jesus is Jehovah they are wrong when they say He is not Elohim. The Bible reveals that Jehovah is the only true Elohim there is; all others are false. Remember Jehovah is the personal name of the triune God who has revealed Himself in the Bible.          Before we consider Biblical quotes which show that Jehovah and Elohim are not two separate gods as Mormons claims let us first note that not only are both God the Father and Christ addressed as Jehovah and Elohim but so is the Holy Spirit.    Whereof the _Holy Ghost_..._said_...This _is_ the covenant that I   will make with them after those days saith the Lord I will put my   laws into their hearts and in their minds will I write them; And   their sins and iniquities will I remember no more. (Heb. 10:15-17)   (emphasis on Holy Ghost and said added)   Behold the days come _saith the LORD_ [Jehovah] that I will make a   new covenant with the house of Israel and with the house of Judah...   I will put my law in their inward parts and write it in their hearts;   and will be their God [Elohim] and they shall be my people.... I will   forgive their iniquity and I will remember their sin no more. (Jer.   31:3133-34) (emphasis added)    For the prophecy came not in old time by the will of man: but holy   men of God spake as they were moved by the _Holy Ghost_. (2 Pet. 1:21)   (emphasis on Holy Ghost added)   The Spirit of the LORD [Jehovah] spake by me and his word was in   my tongue. (2 Sam. 23:2. See also Heb. 3:7-11 with Ps. 95:6-11)          Let us now continue with the Biblical quotes which show that Jehovah and Elohim are not two separate gods as Mormons claim.    And when the LORD [Jehovah] saw that he [Moses] turned aside to see   God [Elohim] called unto him out of the midst of the bush and said   Moses Moses. And he said Here am I.... [Bruce R. McConkie   acknowledged that it was Christ\s voice that spoke to Moses in the   burning bush... Promised Messiah p. 394]   And the LORD [Jehovah] said...   And Moses said unto God [Elohim] Behold when I come unto the   children of Israel and shall say unto them The God [Elohim] of your   fathers hath sent me unto you; and they shall say to me What is his   name? what shall I say unto them?   And God [Elohim] said unto Moses I AM THAT I AM: and he said Thus   shalt thou say unto the children of Israel I AM hath sent me unto   you.   And God [Elohim] said moreover unto Moses Thus shalt thou say unto   the children of Israel the LORD [Jehovah] God [Elohim] of your   fathers the God [Elohim] of Abraham the God [Elohim] of Isaac and   the God [Elohim] of Jacob hath sent me unto you: this is my name for   ever and this is my memorial unto all generations. (Exod.   3:4713-15)    And God [Elohim] spake unto Moses and said unto him I am the LORD   [Jehovah]. (Exod. 6:2)    I am the LORD [Jehovah] and there is none else there is no God   [Elohim] beside me: I girded thee though thou hast not known me:   (Isa. 45:5)    But the LORD [Jehovah] is the true God [Elohim] he is the living God   [Elohim] and an everlasting king... (Jer. 10:10)    Thus saith the LORD [Jehovah] the King of Israel and his redeemer   the LORD [Jehovah] of hosts; I am the first and I am the last; and   beside me there is no God [Elohim]. (Isa. 44:6)    Therefore will I cause you to go into captivity beyond Damascus   saith the LORD [Jehovah] whose name is The God [Elohim] of hosts.   (Amos 5:27)    Behold the heaven and the heaven of heavens is the LORD\s   [Jehovah\s] thy God [Elohim] the earth also with all that therein   is. (Deut. 10:14)    Wherefore thou art great O LORD [Jehovah] God [Elohim]: for there is   none like thee neither is there any God [Elohim] beside thee   according to all that we have heard with our ears. (2 Sam. 7:22)    And he said unto them I am an Hebrew; and I fear the LORD [Jehovah]   the God [Elohim] of heaven which hath made the sea and the dry land.   (Jon. 1:9)    For who is God [Elohim] save the LORD [Jehovah]? or who is a rock   save our God [Elohim]? (Ps. 18:31)    Blessed is the nation whose God [Elohim] is the LORD [Jehovah]...   (Ps. 33:12. See also Ps. 144:15)    Hast thou not known? hast thou not heard that the everlasting God   [Elohim] the LORD [Jehovah] the Creator of the ends of the earth   fainteth not neither is weary? there is no searching of his   understanding. (Isa. 40:28)    The mighty God [Elohim] even the LORD [Jehovah] hath spoken and   called the earth from the rising of the sun unto the going down   thereof. (Ps. 50:1)    Sing unto God [Elohim] sing praises to his name: estol him that   rideth upon the heavens by his name JAH and rejoice before him. (Ps.   68:4) [Regarding the word Jah Bruce R. McConkie stated: Jah   (Hebrew Yah) is a contracted form of Jehovah Jahveh or Yahweh -- all   of which names have reference to Christ the God of Israel. Mormon   Doctrine p. 391]    And David arose and went with all the people that were with him from   Baale of Judah to bring up from thence the ark of God [Elohim] whose   name is called by the name of the LORD [Jehovah] of hosts that   dwelleth between the cherubims. (2 Sam. 6:2)    ...the Great the Mighty God [Elohim] the LORD [Jehovah] of hosts is   his name. (Jer. 32:18)    O my God [Elohim] make them like a wheel; as the stubble before the   wind....   Fill their faces with shame; that they may seek thy name O LORD   [Jehovah]....   That men may know that thou whose name alone is JEHOVAH art the most   high over all the earth. (Ps. 83:131618)          The Bible clearly teaches that Jehovah is Elohim. In fact He is the only Elohim there is. He is the true the living the mighty the great and the everlasting Elohim. He is the Elohim of Israel of all the kingdoms of the earth and of the heavens. He is the Creator who made the heavens and all their host and the earth and all that dwell thereon. Jehovah\s name is Elohim of hosts. (Amos 5:27)          Not only is Jehovah Elohim but Elohim is Jehovah. The Bible reveals that Elohim\s name is Jah (Ps. 68:4) Jehovah (Ps. 83:18) and Jehovah of hosts. (2 Sam. 6:2; Jer. 32:18)   The nation whose Elohim is Jehovah is blessed. (Ps. 33:12) Clearly this is not the Jehovah and Elohim of the Mormons.          Another Mormon error regarding Elohim and Jehovah is the belief that Elohim not Jehovah is the Father of all the spirits including Jesus. In the Articles of Faith by Apostle James E. Talmage A Doctrinal Exposition by The First Presidency and The Twelve apostles states that God the Eternal Father...\Elohim\ is the literal Parent of...the spirits of the human race. (p. 466) This Doctrinal Exposition also states explicitly that Jesus Christ is not the Father of the spirits who have taken or yet shall take bodies upon this earth for He is one of them. He is The Son as they are sons and daughters of Elohim. (p. 473)          The Apostle Talmage stated that _Elohim_...is the name-title of God the Eternal Father whose firstborn Son in the spirit is _Jehovah_-- (Jesus the Christ p. 38)          The Apostle Bruce R. McConkie stated the following about this matter: ...Jehovah-Christ...did in fact create the earth and all forms of plant and animal life on the face thereof. _But when it came to placing man on earth there was a change in Creators_. That is the Father himself became personally involved. All things were created by the Son using the power delegated by the Father except man. _In the spirit and again in the flesh man was created by the Father_. There was no delegation of authority where the crowning creature of creation was concerned. (Promised Messiah p. 62) (emphasis added)          Mormon leaders claim that Jehovah-Christ did not create either man\s spirit or his body. They maintain that the Mormon Elohim who is the father created man both in spirit and body. The Bible reveals the truth about who created man.    And Moses spake unto the LORD [Jehovah] saying   Let the LORD [Jehovah] the God [Elohim] of the _spirits of all   flesh_ set a man over the congregation. (Num. 27:15-16. See also   16:20-23) (emphasis added)    ...the LORD [Jehovah] which stretcheth forth the heavens and layeth   the foundation of the earth and _formeth the spirit of man within   him_. (Zech. 12:1) (emphasis added)    ...the LORD [Jehovah]...made us this soul... (Jer. 38:16)    For I will not contend for ever neither will I be always wroth: for   the spirit should fail before me and the _souls which I have   made_....   ...saith the LORD [Jehovah]... (Isa. 57:1619) (emphasis on souls...I   have made added)    Behold I am the LORD [Jehovah] the God [Elohim] _of all flesh_...   (Jer. 32:27) (emphasis added)    Thus saith the LORD [Jehovah] thy redeemer and he that _formed thee   from the womb_.   I am the LORD [Jehovah] that maketh all things... (Isa. 44:24)   (emphasis added)    Thus saith the LORD [Jehovah]...   I have made the earth and _created man_ upon it... (Isa. 45:11-12)   (emphasis added)    ...God [Elohim] created man upon the earth...   Unto thee it was shewed that thou mightest know that the LORD   [Jehovah] he is God [Elohim]; there is none else beside him. (Deut.   4:3235)    Thus saith God [El] the LORD [Jehovah]...he that spread forth the   earth and that which cometh out of it; he that giveth breath unto the   people upon it and spirit to them that walk therein. (Isa. 42:5)    ...Thus saith the LORD [Jehovah] of hosts the God [Elohim] of   Israel... I have made the earth _the man_ and the beast that are upon   the ground... (Jer. 27:4-5) (most emphasis added)          The Bible reveals that it is Jehovah who is the Elohim of the spirits of all flesh and of all flesh itself that it was He who formed the spirit of man within him that He made us this soul and formed us from the womb. He did indeed create man.          If Mormon leaders are right when they say Jesus is Jehovah then they are wrong when they say he did not create man. If they are right when they say the father is the one who created man then they are wrong when they say he is not Jehovah.          Although Mormon leaders teach that Jesus did not create man Mormon scriptures teach that he did. The BoM states the following:    Behold I am Jesus Christ. I am the Father and the Son....   And never have I showed myself unto _man whom I have created_ for   never has man believed in me as thou hast....   Behold this body which ye now behold is the body of my spirit; and   _man have I created_ after the body of my spirit... (Eth. 3:14-16)   (emphasis added)    For it is I that taketh upon me the sins of the world; for it is _I   that hath created them_... (Mos. 26:23) (emphasis added)    ...the God of Abraham and the God of Isaac and the God of   Jacob...is that same God who created the heavens and the earth and   all things that in them are.   Behold _he created Adam_... (Mor. 9:11-12) (emphasis added)          D&C 93:10 states that the worlds were made by him [Christ]; _men were made by him_; all things were made by him and through him and of him. (emphasis added)          Another error by Bruce R. McConkie involving Jehovah and his creation is the belief that Jehovah had many pre-mortal spirits helping him create. Included in this alleged group was Joseph Smith Jr.    That he [Christ] was aided in the creation of this earth by many of   the noble and great spirit children of the Father is evident from   go down for there is space there and we will take of these   materials and we will make an earth whereon these may dwell. (Abra.   3:22-24.) Michael or Adam was one of these. Enoch Noah Abraham   Moses Peter James and John Joseph Smith and many other noble and   great ones played a part in the great creative enterprise. (Doctrines   of Salvation vol. 1 pp. 74-75.) (Mormon Doctrine p. 169)          The Bible reveals the truth about this matter:    Thus saith the LORD [Jehovah] thy redeemer and he that formed thee   from the womb I am the LORD [Jehovah] that maketh all things; that   stretcheth forth the heavens alone; that spreadeth abroad the earth by   myself. (Isa. 44:24)    Which alone spreadeth out the heavens and treadeth upon the waves of   the sea. (Job 9:8)          Jehovah by Himself created all things. He had no alleged preexistent spirit helpers assisting Him.          Regarding the Mormon \Elohim the Apostle McConkie stated: Elohim. plural word though it is is also used as the exalted name-title of God the Eternal Father a usage that connotes his supremacy and omnipotence he being God above all Gods. (Mormon Doctrine p. 224) He also stated that Jesus...is above all save the Father only. (Promised Messiah p. 363)          The Bible states that the One who is God above all so-called gods is the triune God Jehovah.    For the LORD [Jehovah] is a great God [El] and a great King above   all gods [Elohim]. (Ps. 95:3)    For thou LORD [Jehovah] art high above all the earth: thou art   exalted far above all gods [Elohim]. (Ps. 97:9)    Now I know that the LORD [Jehovah] is greater than all gods   [Elohim]... (Exod. 18:11. See also Ps. 135:5; Deut. 10:17)          If Mormon leaders are right when they say Jehovah is god the son and Elohim is god the father these verses from the Bible would be teaching that the Mormon son is above his father. However as McConkie clearly stated Mormons believe Elohim the father not Jehovah the son is the God above all Gods -- that Jesus is above all except the father; yet the Bible teaches that Jehovah is above all Elohim.          At a BYU Dev. on March 2 1982 Bruce R. McConkie made the following remark about praying to Jesus:    Another peril is that those so involved often begin to pray directly   to Christ because of some special friendship they feel has been   developed....   This is plain sectarian nonsense. Our prayers are addressed to the   Father and to him only....   ...Perfect prayer is addressed to the Father in the name of the Son;   it is uttered by the power of the Holy Ghost... (Our Relationship With   the Lord pp. 19-20)          McConkie states on p. 335 of his book Promised Messiah that the Mormons pray to the Father not the Son... On p. 306 of the same book McConkie states that Christ [the Son] is Jehovah. This is important to remember because although McConkie said prayer is not to be offered to the Mormon Christ who is Jehovah the Bible states repeatedly in the OT that people prayed to Jehovah and He not only heard those prayers but He accepted them as valid requests. The following is but a small sample of the vast number of times people prayed to Jehovah.    In my distress I called upon the LORD [Jehovah] and cried unto my   God [Elohim]: he heard my voice out of his temple and my cry came   before him even into his ears. (Ps. 18:6)    And the LORD [Jehovah] said unto him I have heard thy prayer and thy   supplication that thou hast made before me: I have hallowed this   house which thou hast built to put my name there for ever; and mine   eyes and mine heart shall be there perpetually. (1 Kin. 9:3)    And said unto Jeremiah the prophet Let we beseech thee our   supplication be accepted before thee and pray for us unto the LORD   [Jehovah] thy God [Elohim] even for all this remnant... (Jer. 42:2)    O LORD [Jehovah] I beseech thee let now thine ear be attentive to   the prayer of thy servant and to the prayer of thy servants who   desire to fear thy name... (Neh. 1:11)    And it was so that when Solomon had made an end of praying all this   prayer and supplication unto the LORD [Jehovah] he arose from before   the altar of the LORD [Jehovah] from kneeling on his knees with his   hands spread up to heaven. (1 Kin. 8:54)    He went in therefore and shut the door upon them twain and prayed   unto the LORD [Jehovah]. (2 Kin. 4:33)    Go and say to Hezekiah Thus saith the LORD [Jehovah] the God   [Elohim] of David thy father I have heard thy prayer I have seen thy   tears: behold I will add unto thy days fifteen years. (Isa. 38:5)    I acknowledge my sin unto thee and mine iniquity have I not hid. I   said I will confess my transgressions unto the LORD [Jehovah]; and   thou forgavest the iniquity of my sin.   For this shall every one that is godly pray unto thee in a time when   thou mayest be found... (Ps. 32:5-6)          Notice above in Ps. 32:6 that the godly pray to Jehovah. According to McConkie and other Mormon leaders that is Christ the very one to whom McConkie said people should not pray.          The Bible reveals there is only one true Elohim and His name is Jehovah. All other Elohim are false. They are idols that cause their followers to commit adultery against the true Elohim and idolatry.    For the LORD [Jehovah] is great and greatly to be praised: he is to   be feared above all gods [Elohim].   For all the gods [Elohim] of the nations are idols: but the LORD   [Jehovah] made the heavens. (Ps. 96:4-5)    Thou shalt have no other gods [Elohim] before me. (Exod. 20:3)    Now I know that the LORD [Jehovah] is greater than all gods   [Elohim]... (Exod. 18:11)    And it shall be if thou do at all forget the LORD [Jehovah] thy God   [Elohim] and walk after other gods [Elohim] and serve them and   worship them I testify against you this day that ye shall surely   perish. (Deut. 8:19)    Thou shalt make no covenant with them nor with their gods [Elohim].   They shall not dwell in thy land lest they make thee sin against me:   for if thou serve their gods [Elohim] it will surely be a snare unto   thee. (Exod. 23:32- 33)    Take heed to yourselves that your heart be not deceived and ye turn   aside and serve other gods [Elohim] and worship them. (Deut. 11:16)    That ye come not among these nations these that remain among you;   neither make mention of the name of their gods [Elohim] nor cause to   swear by them neither serve them nor bow yourselves unto them.   (Josh. 23:7)    ...neither walk after other gods [Elohim] to your hurt. (Jer. 7:6)    But the LORD [Jehovah] is the true God [Elohim] he is the living God   [Elohim]... (Jer. 10:10)    And they forsook the LORD [Jehovah] God [Elohim] of their fathers   which brought them out of the land of Egypt and followed other gods   [Elohim] of the gods [Elohim] of the people that were round about   them and bowed themselves unto them and provoked the LORD [Jehovah]   to anger. (Jud. 2:12)    Shall a man make gods [Elohim] unto himself and they are no gods   [Elohim]? Therefore behold I will this once cause them to know I   will cause them to know mine hand and my might; and they shall know   that my name is the LORD [Jehovah]. ( Jer. 16:20-21)    And if it seem evil unto you to serve the LORD [Jehovah] choose you   this day whom ye will serve; whether the gods [Elohim] which your   fathers served that were on the other side of the flood or the gods   [Elohim] of the Amorites in whose land ye dwell: but as for me and my   house we will serve the LORD [Jehovah].   And the people answered and said God [Elohim] forbid that we should   forsake the LORD [Jehovah] to serve other gods [Elohim]. (Josh.   24:15-16)          These verses teach that the only true living Elohim in heaven and on earth is Jehovah -- the triune God who made heaven and earth and all therein.          Jehovah is greater than any Elohim because all other Elohim are idols. The reality behind them is demonic. (Deut. 32:17) Jehovah Elohim has given explicit warnings and guidelines regarding these false Elohim. He told His people not to have any Elohim but Him. He told the people that if they left Him for the false Elohim those Elohim would be a snare to them and they would be hurt and would perish. He warned the people to take heed that their heart be not deceived into worshiping serving swearing by and making covenants with false Elohim. Jehovah Elohim told His people He would eventually judge all false Elohim and their followers.          Despite these warnings and guidelines Elohim\s covenant people forsook Him and believed in and worshiped the false Elohim\s of the people they came in contact with. Ju. 10:6 states that the children of Israel did evil again in the sight of the LORD [Jehovah] and served Baalim and Ashtaroth and the gods [Elohim] of Syria and the gods [Elohim] of Zidon and the gods [Elohim] of Moab and the gods [Elohim] of the children of Ammon and the gods [Elohim] of the Philistines and forsook the LORD [Jehovah] and served not him.          This examination has shown that the Elohim of Mormonism like the Elohim in Ju. 10:6 is not the true Jehovah Elohim. Therefore the people who leave the true Elohim for the Mormon Elohim will do evil...in the sight of the LORD [Jehovah].          Although McConkie attacked Christians for their belief in a triune God who is Spirit and for their belief that God the Father [Jehovah] sent His Son into the world these beliefs are true. God is triune; He is Spirit; He is Jehovah; and He did send His Son into the world to redeem mankind.          It is obvious from this examination that it is not the Christians who thrash around in...darkness about who Elohim and Jehovah are. One wonders what Holy Writ McConkie had in mind when he stated that it attests to the fact that Elohim is the Father and that Jehovah is the Son. He certainly did not mean the Bible which teaches that the Father Son and Holy Spirit are all the one Jehovah Elohim. He apparently did not mean the D&C either because chapter 109 verses 149-10 1419222429344247566877 refer to the Father as Jehovah.  Summary          Obviously Joseph Fielding Smith\s statement that the Mormons have a clear and perfect understanding of the nature of God (Doctrines of Salvation 1:279) is not accurate. The Mormon gods are not the true God as Mormonism claims but are idols which cause their followers to commit adultery against God and idolatry.          In answer to Jesus\ question But whom say ye that I am Mormons say Jesus is someone different from the Jesus who is revealed in the Bible and whom the apostles preached. Therefore anyone trusting in the Mormon Jesus is believing in another Jesus whom Paul warned about.          Bernard P. Brockbank of the First Quorum of the Seventy admitted in the May 1977 issue of The Ensign a Mormon publication that the Mormon Jesus is different from the Christian Jesus. He stated that it is true that many of the Christian churches worship a different Jesus Christ than is worshipped by the Mormons or The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints. (p. 26)          The people who believe in the Mormon Jesus are committing adultery against God and idolatry. They do not have the Son; therefore they do not have the Father and they do not have eternal life. As the Apostle Bruce R. McConkie rightly stated: Salvation comes only by worshiping the true God. (Promised Messiah p. 163) McConkie also rightly stated that the mere worship of a god who has the proper scriptural names does not assure one that he is worshiping the true and living God because the true names of Deity can be applied to false concepts of God. (Mormon Doctrine p. 270) Remember that the Apostle Stephen L. Richards admitted that Joseph Smith Jr. gave a new conception of God and the Godhead. (Contributions of Joseph Smith p. 1)          It is important for the people who have left the true triune God revealed in the Bible to repent and return to Him. They must forsake the sins of idolatry and adultery which they are committing in Mormonism.    ...all that forsake thee shall be ashamed and they that depart from   me shall be written in the earth because they have forsaken the LORD   [Jehovah] the fountain of living waters. (Jer. 17:13)    And it shall be if thou do at all forget the LORD [Jehovah] thy God   [Elohim] and walk after other gods [Elohim] and serve them and   worship them I testify against you this day that ye shall surely   perish. (Deut. 8:19)    Thou shalt make no covenant with...their gods [Elohim]. (Exod. 23:32)    ...Put away the strange gods [Elohim] that are among you and be   clean and change your garments. (Gen. 35:2)    ...flee from idolatry. (1 Cor. 10:14)          It is necessary that Christians heed the warnings of the Bible. If they do they will not fall into the sins of adultery against God and idolatry. Remember
                                                           ^^-- name?  Other than it tells quite a lot about the Man himself.    Are you the spokesman for most people?   That you don\t recognize the Biblical commentary used.  Those in the church know the language though and have no such excuse.     You missed the point -- which is that the Prophets the Psalms and  Revelation all together provide a very rich view of a very special event -- a wedding.   How are you able to make such a conclusion?  Please note that the first part of Revelation makes it clear that the address is to those in the church. That said it doesn\t hurt to try to see what the  prophecies are ahead of time -- for those outside the church.   So you say. It should be interesting to see what the investigators  conclude and what the final judgments are.   So much for war and government eh.   Very glad you asked since I goofed -- it should be Philippian 1:14-19:  (here from NIV)  \tBecause of my chains most of the brothers in the Lord \thave been encouraged to speak the word of God more \tcourageously and fearlessly.  \tIt is true that some preach Christ out of envy and  \trivalry but others out of good will. The latter do so \tin love knowing that I am put here for the gospel.  \tThe former preach Christ out of selfish ambition not \tsincerely supposing that they can stir up trouble for \tme while I am chains. But what does it matter?   \tThe important thing is that in every way whether from \tfalse motives or true Christ is preached. And because \tof this I rejoice. \t My comment stems from the realization that we who love the Lord are human and imperfect. Whatever we preach no matter how eloquent
   Apparently you *didn\t* read the whole thing.  You continue to miss the point.    [deletions]    Counselling that only provides alternatives to abortion would be just as biased as counselling that only provides *abortion* information.  How about providing counselling that will give a woman help in finding what *she* is comfortable with.  Your adoption-funding idea may be a good one.  Any idea if it is feasable?     Making adoption easier on the birth-mother may help reduce abortion but it will *not* eliminate the need for it.  Abortion is not done just because the mother can\t care for the child and doesn\t feel good about giving it to strangers.  Abortion is done because the mother can not afford the *pregnancy*.        Then please justify why being human automatically makes something valuable. And why that includes the unborn.     No they are not guaranteed to become productive members of society.  Even if they do that is *MANY YEARS* in the future--until which they are a burden on someone or society.  There is also the matter of the mother.  Forcing her to carry a pregnancy to term at a critical time in her life could prevent her from being a productive member of society.       Ok look.  It\s like this.  We *are* footing the bill.  Maybe they will take choice A.  Maybe they will take choice B.  Maybe they will take choice C.  They can\t afford any *one* of them.  If they take choice A we\d have to pay them say $5.  If they take choice B it would cost us $20.  If they take choice C it will cost us $20 now and a hell of a lot more for the next 18 years.  Which one sounds the most realistic for us to be willing to pay for?  Now some people happen not to like choice A.  Other people happen not to like choice C (paying for it that is).  C has been around and paid for for years.  Even though it means we spend a lot of money we can\t in conscience refuse to pay for it.  Now A has been around and is perfectly legal but it hasn\t been funded in the past.  Now A is going to be funded but some people object.  They don\t like the idea of their tax money going to pay for choice A.  So we could refuse to fund A at all.  Then those women who can\t afford any of those choices will be forced to take choice B or C which will cost *all of us* more money.  Most of us don\t see any reason at all why *more money* should be spent to the effect of *removing personal choice* from some women.  The alternative is to fund A if that is what the mother chooses.  We will also still fund B and even C if *that* is what the mother chooses.  However some women will certainly choose A and that will then save us $15 we otherwise would have had to spend.  Your taxes are not being raised to fund a choice you object they are being *lowered* because we will fund a choice that is *legal* despite your objections to it.  (Actually your taxes are not really going to go down as I\m sure you would point out.  But the amount that is saved in that area can help out in another--like our massive debt.)      Those other procedures you mention only cost money.  There is no savings in other procedures that would be required down the road without them. (In fact there could be additional costs down the road *because* of them.) This is quite different from the case of abortion.   This is bullshit.  We are *not* refusing to make the alternative affordable too.  If we refused to pay for the more expensive choice of birth *then* your statement would make sense.  But that is not the case so it doesn\t. If Clinton tried to block funding for pre-natal care and delivery (or left it out of his health-care plan) I would certainly object.  I would also be quite surprised.    Yes but probably not your definition of it or for the reasons you think.   YOU STUPID FUCK!  *WE DO* want to fund *all* the choices.  *YOU* are the one who wants to *NOT* fund all the choices.   Your humble opinion is still wrong.  Even with easy adoption there is still the fact that pregnancy takes several months.  Months in which a young woman could need to be getting an education.  (like finishing High School entering college finishing college getting a job...things that are much harder to do if you have to take a break for a few months...things that have a massive impact on her future productivity.)     You *can* have a conversation with the mentally incompetant.  And even though *you* personally may refuse to have a conversation with people you just don\t like it is still *possible* for others to have a conversation with them.  It is *not* possible for *anyone* to have a conversation with a fetus.    He was still biologically independent.  At least to the same extent you are now.  He consumed nutrients and digested them in the normal manner.  He breathed his own air.  A fetus on the other hand gets it\s nutrients already digested by the mother.  It gets its oxygen from the mother as well.  That is not biologically independent.    Awareness is only *part* of what makes a member of society.  It is the minimal conceivable requirement yet many people seem to think that something without awareness could still be important enough to justify the suffereing of a true member of society.  I keep asking but I still haven\t seen a real justification for why the life of a non-sentient creature should be worth the suffering of a sentient being.  (I haven\t read every response on the threads I\ve been asking on yet
\tPersonally
 Sorry if this is late for the thread but...  I thought God was supposed to be constant and never-changing.  How do you reconcile this common Christian view with the paragraph above?  Also while we\re at it:  1. How do you reconcile A KIND and LOVING God!! with the Judeo-Christian view that sin was at one time immediately punishable by death?  Was killing people for sinning God\s way of showing KINDness and LOVE?  2. Is the fact the He no longer does this an admission on His part of having made a mistake?  3. Now that we are living in the age of grace does this mean that for our sins God now damns us to eternal hell after we die rather than killing us immediately?  If so
: |> Let me begin by saying I think this is the world\s first religion to use : |> the net as its major recruitment medium.  Therefore even if this : |> religion does not take off its founding members will be very important : |> historically as this method of soliciting membership will eventually become  : |> common. :   :  So what is Kibology? Chopped liver?  Kibo Himself summed it up by saying Kibology is not just a religion it is also a candy mint ... and a floor wax. I personally think that it is more like Spam Clear. :    :  You really should check out alt.religion.kibology as Kibo\s religion is  : slightly older than yours makes more sense and has more slack.  Yes! Why send money to B0B when Kibo will pay you to worship him. (Funny he doesn\t seem to have paid me...)  : ------------------------------------------------------------------ :      __  Live from Capitaland heart of the Empire State... :  ___/  | Jim Kasprzak computer operator @ RPI Troy NY USA : /____ *|   I understand the causes and sympathize your motivations

  I am not exactly known as a Flower Child Pacifist but lets call cowpoop cowpoop.  The peaceful attempt to serve the warrant consisted of the following actions in order:  1) BATF agents forcing their entry of the compound through second story windows.  2) BATF agents loosing some grenades (allegedly stun or flash grenades) which promptly detonated.  *After* which according to the tapes I have seen


Recently I\ve asked myself a rather interesting question: What RIGHT does god have on our lives (always assuming there is a god of course...!) ??  In his infinite wisdom he made it perfectly clear that if we don\t live according to his rules we will burn in hell. Well with what RIGHT can god make that desicion? Let\s say for the sake of argument that god creates every one of us (directly or indirectly it doesn\t matter.). What then happens is that he first creates us and then turns us lose. Well I didn\t ask to be created.   Let\s make an analogue. If a scientist creates a unique living creature (which has happened it was even patented...!!!) does he then have the right to expect it to behave in a certain matter or die...?  Who is god to impose its rules on us ? Who can tell if god is REALLY so righteous as god likes us to believe? Are all christians a flock of sheep unable to do otherwise that follow the rest?   Hmmmmmmmmmmmm.  I just want to point out that this is not sarcasm I mean it.  \t\t \tHow should one deal with a man who is convinced that \t\t \the is acting according to God\s will
   You have clearly demonstrated that you do not even know what my religion is in order to make that assumption.   How I can present any argument when you put your hands over your eyes and devise new irrevelant excuses each time?  The fact remains you want to argue about something that you do not know anything about. Do you not have to learn a topic first before you can reasonably debate the topic?    Which brings us about to the start of this thread.  You began perverting Bible verses interpreting them without investigation. For if you desired 